
Novo Nordisk Sales Guidance and Wegovy Pill in Focus — Market Talk

Novo Nordisk's sales guidance and momentum of its Wegovy weight-loss pill will be key focus points in theDanish pharma giant's first-quarter report, UBS analyst Matthew Weston writes. Wegovy pill prescription growth continues to impress and UBS expects the pill generated first-quarter sales of $235 million. There could be potential for an upgrade to group sales guidance at the results, the bank says. "A key assumption for Novo's guidance was expected limited sequential volume growth in Wegovy pen, which through 1Q has seen a strong pick up." However, uncertainty remains around the impact of Eli Lilly's rival obesity pill launch and the sustainability of oral Wegovy momentum throughout the year, the bank says. Gross margin development is also a key unknown, UBS adds. Shares rise 1.8%. (dominic.chopping@wsj.com)
https://www.tradingview.com/news/DJN_DN20260410002438:0/



Key facts: Novo Nordisk GLP‑1 share 33% post‑patent; semaglutide cuts mortality; Wegovy 30°C OK
Apr 10, 2026, 04:03 GMT+2
Novo Nordisk (NOVO_B): India GLP-1 share rose to 33% in March from 25% in February after March 20 patent expiry. Competitors sell low-cost semaglutide; Novo cut Ozempic/Wegovy prices up to 48%.
1
Novo Nordisk (NOVO_B): two-year study of 47,199 cardiovascular patients on semaglutide showed higher doses linked to greater weight loss, lower all-cause mortality and reduced MI and stroke risk.
2
EMA allows Wegovy pens to be stored/transported up to 30°C for 48 hours in EU. Change only affects injectable Wegovy labeling; no patient use change. Novo Nordisk shares fell ~1.4% premarket.
3
4
https://www.tradingview.com/news/tradingview:a22318c37f6f3:0-key-facts-novo-nordisk-glp-1-share-33-post-patent-semaglutide-cuts-mortality-wegovy-30-c-ok/



Health Rounds: Genetic variations linked to weight loss, side effects from GLP-1 drugs
Apr 9, 2026, 21:57 GMT+2
By Nancy Lapid

Hello Health Rounds readers! Today we feature a pair of studies that took a deeper dive into the effects of GLP-1 drugs being widely used for weight loss and diabetes. We also report on a fascinating Israeli study in mice that found gender development can be affected and even reversed by a minuscule DNA variation.

Genetic variants predict responses to GLP-1 drugs

Weight-loss responses to GLP-1 obesity drugs, and risks of side effects, may be linked to genetic variants, according to a study conducted by DNA-testing service 23AndMe.

The study of nearly 28,000 23AndMe users who reported taking the weight-loss drugs found that a mutation in GLP1R, the gene for the protein targeted by GLP-1 drugs, is modestly but significantly associated with increased efficacy of the medications, researchers reported in Nature.

People carrying one copy of that variant lost, on average, 1.7 pounds (0.76 kilograms) more over a median of eight months of treatment than people who had no copies. People carrying two copies of the variant lost some 3.3 pounds more.

Mutations in the GLP1R gene and in another gene – GIPR, which is related to insulin secretion and energy production – were associated with medication-related nausea or vomiting.

The GIPR side effect association was only seen in people using Eli Lilly's tirzepatide, however. People carrying that variant were 83% more likely than non-carriers to vomit after taking tirzepatide, sold as Mounjaro for diabetes and Zepbound for obesity.

The genetic effect on weight loss was relatively small, researchers acknowledged.

“These findings provide direct genetic evidence that variation in the drug-target genes contributes to inter-person variability in response and lay the foundation for precision medicine approaches in the treatment of obesity,” they said.

GLP-1 heart benefits may be distinct from obesity effects

The cardiovascular benefits derived from GLP-1 drugs may be more directly tied to dosage than to degree of weight loss, according to a study that suggests the effects of the medicine on the heart may be separate from the impact on obesity.

If that proves to be the case, doctors might someday optimize patients’ GLP-1 regimens for long-term cardiovascular benefits, not just for diabetes management and weight loss, researchers said in a report published online ahead of peer review.

Researchers studied 47,199 patients with cardiovascular disease who received Novo Nordisk's GLP-1 drug semaglutide, sold as Ozempic for diabetes and Wegovy for obesity, for up to two years.

They found, as expected, that higher doses were associated with greater weight loss.

Two years after stopping treatment, those who had received higher doses had lower risks of death from any cause. They also had lower risk of heart attack, stroke or cardiovascular-related death, clogged blood vessels in the brain, heart failure, and heart valve problems.

But those risks were not affected by how much weight people had lost, the researchers said.

When they analyzed tissues from the heart and other organs, they found the cell-surface proteins targeted by GLP-1 drugs were most numerous in the pancreas, which one would expect given the drugs’ benefit in diabetes.

The heart had the second-highest number, however.

“All the focus has been on the pancreas but... is it possible that this medicine is directly acting in the heart?” said study leader Venky Soundararajan of Cambridge, Massachusetts data analytics firm nference.

“It’s purely a hypothesis,” Soundararajan added. “But we can say at this point that heart benefits are not directly correlated to weight loss, and there is enough molecular data to warrant actual experiments in the heart to begin to understand what the drug does.”

Researchers trigger sex reversal with one DNA mutation

Insertion of one tiny mutation outside a gene caused mice to develop as males instead of females, researchers found.

Working with so-called XX mice embryos – bred to develop into females - they introduced the mutation into a section of DNA known as Enh13, which controls the activity of Sox9. The Sox9 gene is essential for testis development. For ovaries to develop normally, Sox9 must be kept turned off.

When the researchers introduced the mutation using CRISPR genome editing, the needed female repression failed. As a result, Sox9 was activated and testes developed, leading to complete internal and external male development, they reported in Nature Communications.

The outcome is especially striking, they said, because the mutation was not made in a gene itself, but in a part of DNA known as the non-coding genome - the 98% of DNA that does not make genes but helps regulate when and how they are turned on and off.

The fact that such a tiny change - just one DNA letter out of roughly 2.8 billion - was enough to produce a dramatic developmental outcome, "shows that non-coding DNA can have a profound effect on development and disease,” study leader Nitzan Gonen from Bar-Ilan University in Israel said in a statement.

The researchers say their study may have important implications for people with Differences of Sex Development, a group of conditions affecting about 1 in 4,000 births worldwide.

More than half of cases lack a genetic diagnosis even after sequencing the protein-coding parts of the genome, the researchers said.

“Our findings show that it is not enough to look only at genes,” study co-author Elisheva Abberbock, also of Bar-Ilan University, said in a statement.

“Important disease-causing mutations may also lie in the non-coding genome, in DNA regions that control gene activity,” Abberbock said.

https://www.tradingview.com/news/reuters.com,2026:newsml_L1N40S0YL:0-health-rounds-genetic-variations-linked-to-weight-loss-side-effects-from-glp-1-drugs/




Novo Nordisk A/S - share repurchase programme
Apr 13, 2026, 12:36 GMT+2
Bagsværd, Denmark, 13 April 2026 – On 4 February 2026, Novo Nordisk initiated a share repurchase programme in accordance with Article 5 of Regulation No 596/2014 of the European Parliament and Council of 16 April 2014 (MAR) and the Commission Delegated Regulation (EU) 2016/1052 of 8 March 2016 (the "Safe Harbour Rules"). This programme is part of the overall share repurchase programme of up to DKK 15 billion to be executed during a 12-month period beginning 4 February 2026.

Under the programme initiated 4 February 2026, Novo Nordisk will repurchase B shares for an amount up to DKK 3.8 billion in the period from 4 February 2026 to 4 May 2026.

Since the announcement 7 April 2026, the following transactions have been made:

 	Number ofB shares	Averagepurchase price	Transactionvalue, DKK
Accumulated, last announcement	9,967,992	 	2,586,404,548
7 April 2026	260,000	235.50	61,229,022
8 April 2026	260,000	242.28	62,993,029
9 April 2026	260,000	236.25	61,424,153
10 April 2026	260,000	242.79	63,126,047
Accumulated under the programme	11,007,992	 	2,835,176,799
The details for each transaction made under the share repurchase programme are published on novonordisk.com.

With the transactions stated above, Novo Nordisk owns a total of 28,397,791 B shares of DKK 0.10 as treasury shares, corresponding to 0.6% of the share capital. The total amount of A and B shares in the company is 4,465,000,000 including treasury shares.

Novo Nordisk expects to repurchase B shares for an amount up to DKK 15 billion during a 12-month period beginning 4 February 2026. As of 10 April 2026, Novo Nordisk has since 4 February 2026 repurchased a total 11,007,992 B shares at an average share price of DKK 257.56 per B share equal to a transaction value of DKK 2,835,176,799.

Novo Nordisk is a leading global healthcare company founded in 1923 and headquartered in Denmark. Our purpose is to drive change to defeat serious chronic diseases built upon our heritage in diabetes. We do so by pioneering scientific breakthroughs, expanding access to our medicines and working to prevent and ultimately cure disease. Novo Nordisk employs about 68,800 people in 80 countries and markets its products in around 170 countries. Novo Nordisk's B shares are listed on Nasdaq Copenhagen (Novo-B). Its ADRs are listed on the New York Stock Exchange (NVO). For more information, visit novonordisk.com, Facebook, Instagram, X, LinkedIn and YouTube.

Contacts for further information

Media:	 
Ambre James-Brown +45 3079 9289globalmedia@novonordisk.com 	Liz Skrbkova (US) +1 609 917 0632lzsk@novonordisk.com 
Investors:	 
Michael Novod+45 3075 6050nvno@novonordisk.com	Jacob Martin Wiborg Rode+45 3075 5956jrde@novonordisk.com
Max Ung+45 3077 6414 mxun@novonordisk.com	Sina Meyer +45 3079 6656azey@novonordisk.com
Alex Bruce +45 34 44 26 13axeu@novonordisk.com	Christoffer Sho Togo Tullin+45 3079 1471cftu@novonordisk.com
Frederik Taylor Pitter +1 609 613 0568fptr@novonordisk.com 	 Mads Berner Bruun+45 3075 2936mbbz@novonordisk.com
Company announcement No 25 / 2026

Attachments

20260413_safe harbour transaction details.JUJT
CA260413_Safe Harbour
https://www.tradingview.com/news/globenewswire:19c0ea6f9094b:0-novo-nordisk-a-s-share-repurchase-programme/



Novo Nordisk Sales Guidance and Wegovy Pill in Focus — Market Talk
Apr 10, 2026, 11:00 GMT+2
Novo Nordisk's sales guidance and momentum of its Wegovy weight-loss pill will be key focus points in theDanish pharma giant's first-quarter report, UBS analyst Matthew Weston writes. Wegovy pill prescription growth continues to impress and UBS expects the pill generated first-quarter sales of $235 million. There could be potential for an upgrade to group sales guidance at the results, the bank says. "A key assumption for Novo's guidance was expected limited sequential volume growth in Wegovy pen, which through 1Q has seen a strong pick up." However, uncertainty remains around the impact of Eli Lilly's rival obesity pill launch and the sustainability of oral Wegovy momentum throughout the year, the bank says. Gross margin development is also a key unknown, UBS adds. Shares rise 1.8%. (dominic.chopping@wsj.com)
https://www.tradingview.com/news/DJN_DN20260410002438:0/
















Novo Nordisk: Delivery of Wegovy(R) Can Occur Within 48-Hours at Temperatures Up to 30degC
https://www.tradingview.com/news/DJN_DN20260409004384_20260409004521:0/




The $190 Billion 'Diabesity' Market Is Set to Explode. Lilly and Novo Face These Stock Catalysts. — Barrons.com

Apr 7, 2026, 23:47 GMT+2
By Mackenzie Tatananni

The recent fixation on weight-loss drugs, a catchall term referring to GLP-1 medications like Wegovy and Zepbound, has brought Eli Lilly and Novo Nordisk squarely into the limelight. But the race to conquer the "diabesity" market is just beginning.

GLP-1 adoption among the eligible obesity population reached 6% in the U.S. by the end of 2025. That's up from 3% at the start of the year, but relatively low compared with adoption among patients with Type 2 diabetes, which came in at around 26% last year.

The combined market for both indications — chronic weight management and diabetes — is projected to be enormous. Morgan Stanley forecasts a "diabesity" total addressable market in the neighborhood of $190 billion in 2035. That's up from earlier calls for $150 billion.

Remaining overhangs on branded GLP-1 uptake, namely injectable supply and pricing dynamics, "were largely resolved last year," analysts wrote in a lengthy research note on Tuesday.

The Food and Drug Administration declared an end to the shortage in 2025 and ordered compounding pharmacies to wind down production of drugs that were "essentially a copy" of FDA-approved products (though some telehealth providers like Hims & Hers Health found a way around the rule).

But there are other growth catalysts on the horizon, namely the expansion of Medicare access in the U.S. and the launch of oral GLP-1 therapies. Taken together, these factors "have the potential to meaningfully broaden adoption," analysts wrote.

Both Lilly and Novo struck agreements with the Trump administration last November to expand patient access to GLP-1 drugs, leading to what Morgan Stanley describes as an "opening of the U.S. Medicare obesity channel."

Medicare and Medicaid generally don't cover the medications for weight loss due to their cost. However, the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services last month detailed a pilot program aiming, in part, to increase access to certain GLP-1 medications.

Under the model, CMS will negotiate drug pricing and coverage terms with manufacturers on behalf of state Medicaid agencies and Medicare Part D plans. Medicare Part D beneficiaries who meet certain requirements can participate in a so-called bridge to the model starting in July.

Already, the patient cost burden for GLP-1s appears to be easing. Roughly 60% of respondents to a recent Morgan Stanley survey reported full coverage, up from 53% last year, with average monthly out-of-pocket costs falling to $119 from $172 in 2025 and $196 the year prior.

The firm's analysis indicates GLP-1 insurance coverage for diabetes is expected to remain stable at around 70% in 2026, and increase modestly to 75% by 2027. Meanwhile, obesity coverage is set to expand rapidly, from 48% in 2025 to around 65% by 2027.

Questions remain around the uptake of new oral GLP-1 drugs, which are set to encompass around a quarter of the total GLP-1 market by 2030. Lilly's franchise should capture the lion's share of that amount, at 61%.

For the time being, patients have better awareness of Novo's oral Wegovy than Foundayo, survey responses indicate. However, analysts noted that Lilly's rival treatment only recently received regulatory clearance, as opposed to oral Wegovy, which has been on the market since January.

Moreover, Lilly's tirzepatide, the active ingredient in its Mounjaro and Zepbound injectables, "has a superior profile" to Novo's Ozempic and Wegovy, analysts asserted.

While claims of this nature are open to debate, tirzepatide generally has been shown to be more effective at promoting weight loss. This advantage likely stems from its dual-agonist mechanism, targeting both GIP and GLP-1 receptors, whereas semaglutide targets only the latter.

While Morgan Stanley is broadly constructive on the development of obesity medications, the haves and have-nots in the industry are beginning to emerge. Lilly, in the firm's view, is one of the clear winners, alongside smaller players Viking Therapeutics and Structure Therapeutics, which are at work developing their own weight-loss drug candidates.

The firm remains sidelined on Novo Nordisk, whose U.S.-listed shares have been beaten down considerably this year. Amgen and Pfizer, similarly, give analysts pause. Amgen is at work developing a once-monthly GLP-1 shot, while Pfizer has pivoted to acquiring other drugmakers to secure next-generation treatments.

Write to Mackenzie Tatananni at mackenzie.tatananni@barrons.com

This content was created by Barron's, which is operated by Dow Jones & Co. Barron's is published independently from Dow Jones Newswires and The Wall Street Journal.
https://www.tradingview.com/news/DJN_DN20260407007806:0/

















How to Play Lilly Stock Post Oral Obesity Pill Foundayo's Approva
Apr 6, 2026, 18:55 GMT+2
Eli Lilly and Company LLY, last week, gained the much-anticipated FDA approval for its once-daily oral GLP-1 pill orforglipron for treating obesity. The pill will be marketed under the name Foundayo. The company expects Foundayo shipments to begin this week, with the drug expected to soon become widely available across U.S. retail pharmacies and telehealth platforms. 

Foundayo’s approval was based on data from the phase III ATTAIN clinical program, which showed that the pill delivered an average of 12.4% weight loss at the highest dose.

Oral pills will be a more convenient alternative to the once-weekly injectable GLP-1 obesity treatments like Lilly’s Zepbound and rival Novo Nordisk NVO Wegovy. Oral pills may significantly lower treatment burden and potentially broaden patient adoption versus injections. They can also be manufactured at scale to meet global demand, which, in turn, can drive billions in additional sales.

NovoNordisk had gained approval for an oral version of its obesity drug, Wegovy, in December 2025 and launched the pill in January 2026. The Wegovy pill gave NVO a first-to-market advantage and will initially bring in additional revenues. However, we believe Lilly may be able to close the gap quickly now that the FDA has approved Foundayo. Also, Foundayo offers better patient convenience as it can be taken at any time of day, with or without food. In contrast, NVO’s Wegovy pill has to be taken on an empty stomach, followed by a waiting period of 30 minutes before eating. However, in terms of side effects, Wegovy has a slight edge as it seems to have a more stable safety and tolerability profile than Foundayo, whose use is associated with some gastrointestinal side effects.

Overall, Foundayo’s approval was a huge win for Lilly’s, as evidenced by the stock’s 6.5% rise last week. However, a single positive news is not so important for long-term investors to make an investment decision. Let’s understand the company’s strengths and weaknesses to better analyze how to play LLY’s stock in this scenario.

Strong Growth of LLY’s GLP-1 Drugs Mounjaro and Zepbound

Lilly boasts a robust portfolio of treatments for diabetes and other cardiometabolic conditions, with its cardiometabolic division emerging as the company’s strongest segment. This success is largely attributed to strong sales of Mounjaro and Zepbound. Despite being on the market for slightly more than three years, Mounjaro and Zepbound have become key top-line drivers for Lilly, with demand rising rapidly. These therapies account for more than 50% of the company’s total revenues.

Mounjaro is the market leader in new prescriptions within type II diabetes incretin analogs in both the United States and ex-U.S. markets, while Zepbound also holds a leading market share in the branded obesity market with nearly 70% share of new prescriptions.

In 2025, the drugs generated combined sales of $36.5 billion, comprising around 56% of the company’s total revenues. Robust growth trends in the U.S. incretin analogs market and positive uptake trends of Mounjaro and Zepbound in new international markets led to strong sales growth in 2025, with the trend expected to continue in 2026.

New Drugs Also Contributing to LLY’s Growth

In addition to Mounjaro and Zepbound, Lilly has secured approvals for several other new therapies over the past few years. These include Omvoh for treating ulcerative colitis and Crohn’s disease, BTK inhibitor Jaypirca for mantle cell lymphoma and chronic lymphocytic leukemia, Ebglyss for moderate-to-severe atopic dermatitis and Kisunla (donanemab) for early symptomatic Alzheimer’s disease. These newly approved drugs are also contributing to Lilly’s revenue growth.

Lilly’s Broad Obesity Pipeline

Lilly is developing several next-generation, more powerful and more convenient GLP-1–based treatments, including oral options and multi-acting candidates.

Foundayo can prove to be a commercial game-changer for Lilly with the potential to bring in $1 billion-$2 billion in sales as early as in 2026. In international markets, Lilly expects to launch orforglipron for obesity during 2027. For the type II diabetes indication, Lilly has filed a regulatory application in the EU and plans to file regulatory applications in the United States and other countries later in 2026.

Lilly is also evaluating orforglipron in late-stage studies in other disease areas like obstructive sleep apnea, osteoarthritis pain of the knee, stress urinary incontinence and hypertension. These multiple late-stage studies on orforglipron can expand the candidate’s revenue potential beyond obesity/type II diabetes

The company is evaluating another key candidate, triple-acting incretin, retatrutide in type II diabetes and obesity, along with other indications like obstructive sleep apnea, knee osteoarthritis, and chronic low back pain, in late-stage studies. Retatrutide represents a new generation of “triple-action” therapy as it targets three biological pathways — GLP-1, GIP and glucagon — whereas existing medicines mostly act on one or two biological pathways.

Data from a phase III study on retatrutide in obesity and knee osteoarthritis pain showed that the drug delivered significant weight loss with substantial relief from osteoarthritis pain. Lilly expects data readouts from additional phase III studies on retatrutide for treating obesity in 2026. It plans to seek approval for retatrutide for obesity and knee osteoarthritis pain in 2026.

Efforts to Diversify Beyond Obesity & Diabetes

In the past couple of years, Lilly has upped its efforts to diversify beyond GLP-1 drugs by expanding into cardiovascular, oncology and neuroscience areas. In 2025, it announced several M&A deals. It acquired Verve Therapeutics to add gene therapies for heart disease to its pipeline. Lilly also acquired Scorpion Therapeutics’ oncology drug and SiteOne Therapeutics’ non-opioid pain candidate. The acquisition of Adverum Biotechnologies in December 2025 added its lead candidate, Ixo-vec, an intravitreal single-administration gene therapy being developed in phase III to treat vision loss associated with wet age-related macular degeneration.

In January 2026, Lilly announced a definitive agreement to buy Ventyx Biosciences to deepen its exposure in oral small-molecule therapies targeting inflammatory-mediated diseases. In February, it announced a deal to acquire private biotech Orna Therapeutics, which is making in vivo CAR-T therapies to treat a wide range of B-cell-driven autoimmune diseases. Last week, Lilly announced a deal to acquire Centessa Pharmaceuticals to expand its presence in sleep disorder therapies and the broader neuroscience space.

Race to Make Oral Obesity Pill Intensifies

The global obesity drug market is projected to grow dramatically, reaching nearly $95 billion by 2030 and potentially $125 billion by 2035, according to Goldman Sachs estimates. While Lilly and Novo Nordisk currently dominate this space, smaller biotechs like Structure Therapeutics GPCR and Viking Therapeutics VKTX are also developing oral GLP-1 drugs for treating obesity.

Viking Therapeutics’ dual GIPR/GLP-1 receptor agonist, VK2735, is being developed both as oral and subcutaneous formulations for the treatment of obesity. Viking plans to advance oral VK2735 into phase III development for obesity in the third quarter of 2026.

Structure Therapeutics’ phase II ACCESS study on its orally GLP-1 RA, aleniglipron, demonstrated significant weight loss across all doses. Structure Therapeutics expects to initiate the late-stage program of aleniglipron in obesity in the second half of 2026.

Novo Nordisk’s key novel candidate in its obesity pipeline is CagriSema, a once-weekly injection, which is a combination of cagrilintide (amylin analogue) and semaglutide (GLP-1). In phase III studies, this candidate has shown 22.7% weight loss. NVO has already filed a new drug application with the FDA seeking approval of CagriSema for obesity. Other key candidates are cagrilintide, a long-acting amylin analogue in phase III and amycretin, a single molecule combining GLP-1 + amylin, which is expected to enter phase III in 2026.

LLY’s Stock Price, Valuation and Estimates

Lilly’s stock has risen 10.9% in the past six months against the industry’s decrease of 0.3%.

LLY Stock Outperforms Industry

From a valuation standpoint, Lilly’s stock is expensive. Going by the price/earnings ratio, LLY’s shares currently trade at 25.85 forward earnings, much higher than 20.30 for the industry. However, LLY’s stock is trading below its 5-year mean of 34.57.

LLY Stock Valuation

The Zacks Consensus Estimate for 2026 has risen from $33.24 to $34.16 per share over the past 60 days, while that for 2027 has risen from $41.48 to $41.90 per share over the same timeframe.

LLY Estimate Movement

Stay Invested in LLY Stock

Lilly has its share of problems. Prices of most of Lilly’s products are declining in the United States. Price is expected to continue to be a drag on top-line growth in the low to mid-teens percentage in 2026. Rising competition in the GLP-1 diabetes/obesity market is a key headwind. Also, sales of late-life cycle products like Trulicity, Taltz and Verzenio are expected to be flat to down in 2026.

However, exceptional growth from Mounjaro and Zepbound has made Lilly the largest drugmaker. It delivered robust financial performance in 2025 with revenues surging 45% and EPS growing 86%. Expectations for continued growth in 2026 remain high with projected revenues of $80-$83 billion and EPS of $33.50-$35.00.

Despite its expensive valuation, Lilly is a great stock to have in one’s portfolio, given its significant price appreciation, its product and pipeline portfolio in high-growth therapeutic areas like obesity, robust growth prospects and bullish analyst sentiment. Consistently rising estimates also reflect analysts’ optimistic outlook for the stock. Investors should stay invested in this Zacks Rank #3 (Hold) stock. You can see the complete list of today’s Zacks #1 Rank (Strong Buy) stocks here. 

Research Chief Names "Single Best Pick to Double"

From thousands of stocks, 5 Zacks experts each have chosen their favorite to skyrocket +100% or more in months to come. From those 5, Director of Research Sheraz Mian hand-picks one to have the most explosive upside of all.

This company targets millennial and Gen Z audiences, generating nearly $1 billion in revenue last quarter alone. A recent pullback makes now an ideal time to jump aboard. Of course, all our elite picks aren’t winners but this one could far surpass earlier Zacks’ Stocks Set to Double like Nano-X Imaging which shot up +129.6% in little more than 9 months.Free: See Our Top Stock And 4 Runners Up

Want the latest recommendations from Zacks Investment Research? Today, you can download 7 Best Stocks for the Next 30 Days. Click to get this free report

Novo Nordisk A/S (NVO): Free Stock Analysis Report

Eli Lilly and Company (LLY): Free Stock Analysis Report

Viking Therapeutics, Inc. (VKTX): Free Stock Analysis Report

Structure Therapeutics Inc. Sponsored ADR (GPCR): Free Stock Analysis Report

This article originally published on Zacks Investment Research (zacks.com).

Zacks Investment Research
https://www.tradingview.com/news/zacks:f6189adda094b:0-how-to-play-lilly-stock-post-oral-obesity-pill-foundayo-s-approval/












Key facts: Novo Nordisk GLP‑1 share 33% post‑patent; semaglutide cuts mortality; Wegovy 30°C OK

Apr 10, 2026, 04:03 GMT+2
Novo Nordisk (NOVO_B): India GLP-1 share rose to 33% in March from 25% in February after March 20 patent expiry. Competitors sell low-cost semaglutide; Novo cut Ozempic/Wegovy prices up to 48%.
1
Novo Nordisk (NOVO_B): two-year study of 47,199 cardiovascular patients on semaglutide showed higher doses linked to greater weight loss, lower all-cause mortality and reduced MI and stroke risk.
2
EMA allows Wegovy pens to be stored/transported up to 30°C for 48 hours in EU. Change only affects injectable Wegovy labeling; no patient use change. Novo Nordisk shares fell ~1.4% premarket.
3
4
https://www.tradingview.com/news/tradingview:a22318c37f6f3:0-key-facts-novo-nordisk-glp-1-share-33-post-patent-semaglutide-cuts-mortality-wegovy-30-c-ok/










Key facts: Novo Nordisk Wegovy -50% Ozempic -33% U.S.; Oral Wegovy Used
Apr 7, 2026, 04:03 GMT+2
Novo Nordisk to cut U.S. list prices next year: about 50% for Wegovy (obesity) and ~33% for Ozempic (diabetes/weight-loss), aiming to expand patient access amid rising demand.
1
Since U.S. approval, physicians have begun prescribing Novo Nordisk’s oral Wegovy (NOVO_B); some patients start directly on the oral GLP‑1 rather than switching from injectables.
2


https://www.tradingview.com/news/tradingview:c1210cc89c152:0-key-facts-novo-nordisk-wegovy-50-ozempic-33-u-s-oral-wegovy-used/







Novo Nordisk's $475-billion rise and fall as Wegovy-era gains wiped out
Feb 23, 2026, 17:55 GMT+1

Novo Nordisk 
NOVO_B
 shares slumped by more than 16% on Monday, wiping away the remaining gains brought by its blockbuster weight-loss drug Wegovy, after the drugmaker said its next-generation obesity drug CagriSema underperformed Eli Lilly's 
LLY
 rival.

Novo, which in 2024 was worth more than $650 billion, has since shed around $475 billion, with the shares back at levels last seen before Wegovy transformed it into Europe's most valuable drugmaker.

Novo's shares fell to their lowest level since June 2021, when Wegovy was first launched, driving a long sales and share price boom that even helped propel Denmark's wider economy.

Novo shares were among the biggest decliners in Europe's benchmark STOXX 600 index 
SXXP
. Meanwhile, shares of Eli Lilly rose about 4% in U.S. morning trade.

UPHILL BATTLE TO WIN BACK MARKET SHARE

J.P. Morgan analysts said the trial miss was a significant setback that could curb demand for CagriSema, temper long-term sales hopes and leave Novo struggling to win back share in the fast-growing obesity treatment market.

The setback adds to investor worries about intensifying competition in obesity treatments, where demand is increasingly driven by drugs offering the greatest weight-loss results.

Shares of Novo's Danish peer Zealand declined 7%, but analysts brushed off broader concerns about its own weight-loss drug, similarly targeting the amylin hormone.

https://www.tradingview.com/news/reuters.com,2026:newsml_L8N3ZJ1JK:0-novo-nordisk-s-475-billion-rise-and-fall-as-wegovy-era-gains-wiped-out/















Novo Nordisk Shares Jump After Hims & Hers Scraps Plan for Copycat Weight-Loss Pill — Update
Feb 9, 2026, 12:52 GMT+1

By Dominic Chopping

Shares in Wegovy and Ozempic maker Novo Nordisk rose after Hims & Hers said it would not offer a copycat version of the Danish drugmaker's weight-loss pill.

In afternoon European trade, shares were up 8.6% on Monday, continuing a volatile few days for the stock.

Meanwhile, Hims & Hers shares traded 16% lower in U.S. premarket trading.

Novo Nordisk last week said that sales and earnings would drop sharply this year as prices of its GLP-1 drugs come down following a recent deal with the U.S. government. The company also faces intense competition from rival drugs, imminent patent expirations and continued problems from compounding pharmacies in the U.S. that produce lower-cost versions of its blockbuster drugs.

That news saw its shares close 17% lower in Copenhagen on Wednesday.

However, investors have been encouraged by a strong launch of the company's new Wegovy weight-loss pill following its U.S. market introduction last month. The Wegovy tablet is the first of its kind and executives at the company hope that the pill will open the market further, boosting overall volumes to help offset the impact of lower prices.

Shares took another leg down Thursday, though, after telehealth provider Hims & Hers said it would introduce a copycat pill with the same active ingredient used in Wegovy for an initial $49 a month before rising to $99 a month. This undercut Novo Nordisk's Food and Drug Administration-approved Wegovy pill that sells at $149 a month for a standard dose for self-paying customers.

The Danish company threatened legal action, but the news sent its shares 7.9% lower Thursday in Copenhagen, before they rebounded 5.3% Friday after FDA Commissioner Marty Makary promised swift action to clamp down on illegal copy drugs.

Over the weekend, the Health and Human Services Department referred Hims to the Justice Department for investigation into potential violations of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.

Hims has now scrapped its plan to offer the compounded weight-loss pill. "Since launching the compounded semaglutide pill on our platform, we've had constructive conversations with stakeholders across the industry. As a result, we have decided to stop offering access to this treatment," the company said over the weekend.

The developments could have wider implications, SEB analysts said. "Hims & Hers has teased the bear, which we believe could lead to increased scrutiny of the company's entire GLP-1 compounding business, not just the tablet."

Other players that compound GLP-1 might also be affected, SEB said.

"Overall, we see this as a positive for Novo."

Write to Dominic Chopping at dominic.chopping@wsj.com
https://www.tradingview.com/news/DJN_DN20260209003677:0-novo-nordisk-shares-jump-after-hims-hers-scraps-plan-for-copycat-weight-loss-pill-update/









NOVO_B: Record Wegovy pill launch drives patient growth, but 2026 outlook faces price-driven headwinds
Feb 5, 2026, 16:26 GMT
Sales and profit more than doubled over five years, with strong cash conversion and a record Wegovy pill launch. 2026 guidance reflects price-driven top-line decline, offset by disciplined cost management and continued volume growth, amid a dynamic and competitive obesity market.

Based on Novo Nordisk A/S Class B [NOVO_B] Q4 2025 London conference call Audio Transcript — Feb. 5 2026
https://www.tradingview.com/news/urn:summary_document_transcript:quartr.com:2754885:0-novo_b-record-wegovy-pill-launch-drives-patient-growth-but-2026-outlook-faces-price-driven-headwinds/















EMA Approves Novo Nordisk's Wegovy Injection For 48 Hours Controlled-Temperature Delivery
Apr 9, 2026, 15:11 GMT+2

Novo Nordisk A/S 
NOVO_B
:

WEGOVY® INJECTION BECOMES FIRST GLP-1 WEIGHT-LOSS TREATMENT APPROVED FOR 48-HOUR CONTROLLED-TEMPERATURE DELIVERY IN THE EU

EMA APPROVES WEGOVY INJECTION DELIVERY AT UP TO 30°C FOR 48 HOURS

WEGOVY BECOMES FIRST GLP-1 FOR WEIGHT MANAGEMENT IN EUROPE WITH DELIVERY FLEXIBILITY
https://www.tradingview.com/news/reuters.com,2026:newsml_TUA7THBQ8:0-ema-approves-novo-nordisk-s-wegovy-injection-for-48-hours-controlled-temperature-delivery/












Americans want weight-loss pills for cost and convenience
Apr 7, 2026, 18:45 GMT+2
Key points:
Doctors say pills appeal for convenience, lower cost, and needle-free use
Lilly's Foundayo and Novo's Wegovy pills to compete for market share
Weight-loss drugs remain unaffordable for many, despite lower pill prices
By Leah Douglas

Americans starting weight-loss medicines for the first time want lower cost and greater convenience as they consider pills from Novo Nordisk 
NOVO_B
 or Eli Lilly 
LLY
, according to seven doctors who specialize in obesity.

Novo's Wegovy pill has been on the market since January, while Lilly's just-approved Foundayo joins the fray this week.

Reuters interviews with the specialists show a promising landscape for oral weight-loss drugs as the companies compete for share in the fast-changing obesity treatment market seen topping $100 billion a year in the next decade.

Danish drugmaker Novo Nordisk launched injectable Wegovy in 2021. The pill, like injectable Wegovy and Ozempic for diabetes, has the active ingredient semaglutide.

In the three months since its approval, the oral version has appealed to patients for its lower cost and ease, the doctors said.

The pills don't need refrigeration, are more discreet and don't require the use of needles, said Dr. Christina Nguyen, an obesity and family medicine physician in Atlanta.

"One person said I'd rather stay fat than ever use a needle. That's a true fear," she said.

Lilly's Foundayo pill, with active ingredient orforglipron, will begin shipping on Monday.

PILLS VS INJECTIONS

All seven doctors said they had begun prescribing oral Wegovy, and three said they have prescribed the pill to about 10% of their patients.

Of those patients, most are taking a GLP-1 for the first time, rather than switching from injectables, and have not yet reached the highest dose, the doctors said.

"It is expanding access to people who are not sure that an injectable is something they would feel comfortable doing on themselves, might be leery of needles, and they're excited to have an option that is easier and more familiar to take," said Dr. Stefie Deeds, an internal and obesity medicine specialist in Seattle.

If patients are tolerating an injectable GLP-1, doctors are reluctant to switch them to pills unless requested.

"The patients we see who are taking medicines, whether it's Wegovy or (Lilly's) Zepbound, we're not telling them to switch to oral Wegovy if they're doing well," said Dr. Louis Aronne, director of the Comprehensive Weight Control Center at Weill Cornell Medical College. Aronne has consulted for Lilly and was an investigator on the orforglipron clinical trial, and is an advisory board member of both Lilly and Novo.

Zepbound, with the active ingredient tirzepatide, has been shown in trials to reduce weight by some 20% or more. That makes it the preferred option for treating patients with severe obesity, especially those with more complex cases, doctors said.

"For somebody who is in the lower end of the weight spectrum, people who are more likely to be seen by primary care physicians, they would be more likely to use the orals," Aronne said.

In trials, Foundayo led to an 11% reduction in body weight over 72 weeks and oral Wegovy led to about a 14% reduction over 64 weeks.

LILLY PILL EXPANDS OPTIONS

Several of the doctors said they were eager for Lilly's pill, chemically known as orforglipron, to be approved so they would have a more flexible option to present to patients.

Oral Wegovy must be taken on an empty stomach with just a sip of water 30 minutes before any other medications or food and drink. Lilly's Foundayo can be taken any time of day without food or water restrictions.

Nguyen said that if the Lilly pill is competitive on price with oral Wegovy, "most likely everyone will go with the orforglipron."

Novo spokesperson Liz Skrbova said that based on its survey results, most patients would not find the timing restrictions to be disruptive.

Semaglutide has also been found in trials to have other health benefits like reducing cardiovascular risks.

"I can’t guarantee that this totally different type of molecule is going to carry the same benefits," Dr. Michael Weintraub, an endocrinologist at NYU Langone Health, said of the new Lilly drug.

A Lilly spokesperson said the company is still studying Foundayo and that many participants in its clinical trial saw some reduction in markers of cardiovascular risk.

DRUGS STILL PRICEY

Patients consider many factors when picking a GLP-1, but by far the most significant is cost, the doctors said.

And there, pills have an advantage. The self-pay price for both oral Wegovy and Foundayo starts at $149 per month for the lowest dose, compared to $299 for Zepbound and $349 for Ozempic and injectable Wegovy.

Because of restrictions introduced on insurance coverage for GLP-1 medications, doctors said they spend significant time discussing with patients how to afford the drugs. When covered, out-of-pocket costs could be as little as $25 or $50 per month.

"I feel more like a financial planner these days than a physician," said Dr. Catherine Varney, an obesity medicine physician and associate professor at the University of Virginia School of Medicine who is also part of the Lilly speakers bureau and advisory board.

Varney and other doctors expressed concern that even with lower-cost pills, weight-loss drugs are still largely unaffordable.

"This still is a market for upper-middle-class and above," Varney said.
https://www.tradingview.com/news/reuters.com,2026:newsml_L6N40Q0YP:0-americans-want-weight-loss-pills-for-cost-and-convenience/







Novo Nordisk launches higher-dose Wegovy in the United States

Apr 7, 2026, 14:50 GMT+2
Novo Nordisk 
NOVO_B
 said on Tuesday that it has made a higher-dose version of its blockbuster weight-loss drug Wegovy available across the United States.

The 7.2-milligram dose, branded as Wegovy HD, gained approval under the FDA Commissioner's National Priority Review Voucher program last month.

Before the approval, the highest authorized dose of the injectable Wegovy for weight loss was 2.4 mg.

The company said the higher-dose Wegovy will be available through U.S. pharmacies, NovoCare Pharmacy and select telehealth providers.

Cash-paying adults prescribed Wegovy HD can expect to pay $399 per month, while commercially insured patients may pay as little as $25 per month using the Wegovy savings offer, Novo said.

Last month, Novo said it plans to launch a discounted subscription plan for U.S. Wegovy patients paying for the drug themselves, offering steep discounts to regain ground ceded to Eli Lilly 
LLY
 in the obesity-drug market.

https://www.tradingview.com/news/reuters.com,2026:newsml_L4N40Q0WL:0-novo-nordisk-launches-higher-dose-wegovy-in-the-united-states/









Novo Nordisk Says Wegovy Pill Shows Greater Weight Loss Vs Orforglipron In New Indirect Comparison
Apr 2, 2026, 14:00 GMT+2

Novo Nordisk A/S 
NOVO_B
:

NOVO NORDISK: WEGOVY PILL 25 MG SHOWED GREATER MEAN WEIGHT LOSS VERSUS. ORFORGLIPRON 36 MG IN POPULATION-ADJUSTED INDIRECT TREATMENT COMPARISON

NOVO NORDISK: POPULATION-ADJUSTED INDIRECT TREATMENT COMPARISON USES DATA FROM OASIS 4 & ATTAIN-1 CLINICAL TRIALS

NOVO NORDISK: IN SEPARATE PATIENT PREFERENCE STUDY, 84% FAVORED WEGOVY PILL 25MG-LIKE TREATMENT PROFILE VERSUS. ORFORGLIPRON-LIKE PROFILE

NOVO NORDISK: ORFORGLIPRON 36MG TREATMENT HAD ABOUT 14 TIMES HIGHER DISCONTINUATION ODDS DUE TO GASTROINTESTINAL ADVERSE EVENTS VERSUS WEGOVY PILL 25MG

https://www.tradingview.com/news/reuters.com,2026:newsml_P8N3S5045:0-novo-nordisk-says-wegovy-pill-shows-greater-weight-loss-vs-orforglipron-in-new-indirect-comparison/







US FDA clarifies policies on compounding of GLP-1 medicines  
Apr 1, 2026, 22:07 GMT+2
The U.S. Food and Drug Administration on Wednesday clarified its policies on compounded versions of popular GLP-1 drugs, signaling tighter limits on their production as national supply conditions improve.

The agency said compounders are permitted to produce copies of approved medicines only while those drugs are listed on the FDA's shortage database.

Once a product is no longer in shortage, pharmacies and outsourcing facilities must stop making versions that are "essentially copies" of commercially available treatments.

The FDA said this exemption is temporary and strictly tied to supply disruptions. As availability of GLP-1 therapies begins to stabilize, the agency said compounders should transition away from routine production of these drugs.

It also warned that any continued manufacturing outside these boundaries could prompt enforcement action.

GLP-1 drugs, widely used for diabetes and weight loss, saw demand surge in recent years, prompting temporary shortages that allowed compounders to step in under existing rules.

The FDA's clarification follows tensions between Novo Nordisk and telehealth firm Hims & Hers Health 
HIMS
.

Novo's launch of an oral version of Wegovy led to a legal dispute over the offer of compounded alternatives, before the two companies struck a deal.

Earlier in the day, the FDA approved Lilly's weight-loss pill, Foundayo, which the company will begin selling on April 6 through its LillyDirect program.

The regulator said compounded drugs do not undergo FDA approval and must meet specific conditions under federal law, including restrictions on bulk manufacturing and requirements that prescriptions be patient-specific in many cases.

https://www.tradingview.com/news/reuters.com,2026:newsml_L4N40K22Q:0-us-fda-clarifies-policies-on-compounding-of-glp-1-medicines/







Why 2026 Is Biotech's Comeback Year — Barrons.com
Apr 1, 2026, 22:07 GMT+2

By Nilesh Kumar

About the author: Nilesh Kumar is head of biotech private investments at Wellington Management.

As pharmaceutical companies raced to develop a Covid-19 vaccine in 2020, the biotech industry boomed. Investors eager to capitalize on the momentum poured money into biotech companies and sought opportunities to back new drugs, regardless of where they were on the path to clinical success and regulatory approval.

The sector has struggled to maintain the fervor in years since. Market sentiment is currently cautious at best. IPO activity and venture capital funding for biotechs, particularly those backing more exploratory new treatments, have dropped off meaningfully.

At the peak of the biotech boom in 2021, more than half of the 104 companies that went public in the U.S. were either preclinical or in Phase 1 trials — the earliest stages of testing for new medicines — and therefore the most speculative stage from an investment standpoint. By 2024, the number of new offerings had dwindled to 24. Last year, only 11 biotech companies joined the market. Just one was a company whose leading drug candidate was in early-stage trials.

VC biotech activity has experienced a similar drop off. Venture firms invested just shy of $50 billion across 2,413 biotech deals in 2021 in the U.S. That fell to $14 billion across 702 investments in the first half of 2025.

The biotech sector lost enthusiasm because of variety of factors, including the underperformance of many of the early-stage companies that went public over the past few years. Macro factors, including uncertain regulatory environment and drug pricing policies, have created headwinds — although it feels that the worst of those issues are in the past.

Some uncertainty around the Food and Drug Administration remains, but we believe scientifically rigorous and evidence based approaches will win this year; good drugs that address unmet medical needs won't sit on the shelves.

That is good news for the venture firms seeking liquidity and for a stock market looking for promising growth stories.

The biotech industry's mood has been lifted recently by the combination of a surge in mergers and acquisitions, driven by a need among Big Pharma to replenish pipelines to offset the impact of drug patents expiring, and hopes for scientific breakthroughs in important treatment areas.

Last year's standout deal was Pfizer's acquisition of Metsera for an upfront $7 billion with a potential additional $3 billion in milestone payments. The transaction was emblematic of one of the most significant medical trends of recent years: The widespread uptake of obesity drugs.

The launch in January of the first oral obesity drug by Novo Nordisk was the beginning of several new obesity treatments being developed and licensed, which bodes well for investors looking for exposure to blockbusters. Eli Lilly announced Wednesday that their oral obesity drug will enter the market soon. Eli Lilly, Amgen, and Novo Nordisk have said they plan to unveil late-stage clinical trial results for next-gen obesity treatments this year.

There is likely going to be more M&A activity in the obesity space as incumbents and challengers position for this large market segment. Novel obesity drugs that improve on the current standard of care in obesity are being developed by a number of biotechs and will be of interest to pharma acquirers.

Besides obesity, arguably the biggest unmet need in biotech today are therapies for dementia. Effective treatments, let alone a cure, for Alzheimer's disease and other neurodegenerative diseases have been extraordinarily difficult to develop — but that may change soon. Drug candidates aimed at treating Alzheimer's are due to present late-stage clinical trial results this year. The industry is hopeful that at least some of these candidates will show effectiveness in slowing or reversing cognitive decline.

A host of other potential new dementia treatments in development will follow these trailblazers, and these too may attract excitement among private and public market investors. The two go hand in glove. An active IPO market provides encouragement to venture capital players of the viability of that route as an exit possibility, as well as providing a guide as to which therapeutic areas are of most interest to the stock market.

While policy can always shift, the industry remains grounded in an evidence-based approach that supports long-term biotech investing. For investors burned by recent experiences of false hope and over-exuberance, this year is more likely to be one where expectations are reset.

Guest commentaries like this one are written by authors outside the Barron's newsroom. They reflect the perspective and opinions of the authors. Submit feedback and commentary pitches to ideas@barrons.com .

This content was created by Barron's, which is operated by Dow Jones & Co. Barron's is published independently from Dow Jones Newswires and The Wall Street Journal.

https://www.tradingview.com/news/DJN_DN20260401007797:0/









Weight-loss drug developers line up to tap lucrative market as competition heats up
Apr 1, 2026, 20:58 GMT+2

The weight-loss drug market is surging, with biotech firms racing to corner a share in a sector dominated by Novo Nordisk 
NOVO_B
 and Eli Lilly 
LLY
.

Analysts forecast the industry will generate about $150 billion in annual sales in the next decade.

Eli Lilly on Wednesday became the second company to secure approval for a weight-loss pill, as the multibillion-dollar market shifts toward more convenient oral therapies.

Novo Nordisk won a key first-mover advantage after U.S. Food and Drug Administration approved a pill version of its blockbuster obesity injection Wegovy in December.

The following is a list of weight-loss drugs in development by Novo, Lilly and other companies chasing the next blockbuster treatment:

NOVO NORDISK

The FDA approved the oral version of Novo Nordisk's injectable weight loss drug Wegovy in December.

The company is also developing several experimental weight-loss drugs, a next-generation injection called amycretin, and CagriSema, touted as a potent successor to Wegovy.

Amycretin, which targets GLP-1 and amylin hormones, showed statistically significant weight loss of up to 14.5% at 36 weeks in patients with type 2 diabetes in a mid-stage study.

CagriSema produced weaker-than-expected data in two separate late-stage trials. The drug helped overweight patients cut their weight by 22.7% in one of the trials, below Novo's expectations of 25%.

Novo filed a marketing application for potential U.S. approval of CagriSema in December.

Novo also has struck licensing deals for drugs in earlier stages of testing, including a deal worth up to $2 billion with China-based United Laboratories for its "triple-G" weight-loss drug candidate that targets three hormones.

PFIZER

Through a buyout last year, the company 
PFE
 gained access to Metsera's obesity drugs, such as MET-097i, a GLP-1 therapy designed for a once-monthly injection, compared with weekly treatments from Lilly and Novo.

The drug, now known as given PF-3944, led to up to 12.3% weight loss in patients without diabetes, with no plateau observed at week 28, when given as a monthly injection, Pfizer said in February.

Pfizer added that it is targeting 2028 for its first approval in the fast-growing weight-loss drug market.

The drugmaker plans to advance more than 20 clinical trials involving obesity treatments this year.

ELI LILLY

Lilly's orforglipron, branded as Foundayo, became the second oral pill for weight-loss to gain U.S. approval.

Orforglipron helped maintain weight loss in patients switching from its GLP-1 injection, Zepbound, and rival Novo Nordisk's Wegovy, Lilly said in December.

Lilly's next-generation obesity drug retatrutide showed a significant reduction in blood sugar levels and weight in a late-stage trial in March.

Last year, Lilly said it is advancing its experimental once-weekly amylin-based obesity drug, eloralintide, into late-stage trials after it helped patients lose up to 20.1% of their weight in a mid-stage study.

The company also signed a deal worth up to $1.3 billion with Superluminal Medicines last year to discover and develop small-molecule drugs through AI to treat obesity and other cardiometabolic diseases.

ROCHE

Roche's (ROG.S) experimental obesity drug, which works in a similar way to Lilly's Zepbound, produced as much as 22.5% weight loss in a mid-stage trial in January, underpinning the Swiss drugmaker's efforts to catch up with dominant rivals.

Roche's experimental obesity drug CT-388 - a once-weekly injection - was acquired through a $2.7 billion purchase of U.S. biotech firm Carmot Therapeutics in 2023.

Its other experimental obesity drug, which it is developing with Denmark's Zealand Pharma 
ZEAL
, helped patients lose up to 10.7% of their body weight in a mid-stage study in March.

AMGEN

Amgen 
AMGN
 is currently conducting six late-stage trials of experimental drug MariTide across obesity and related conditions such as heart disease and sleep apnea. It plans to begin late-stage of the drug for diabetes patients this year.

In January, an extension study of found that MariTide helped people maintain weight loss when given at a lower dose or less frequently.

In 2024, data showed MariTide helped overweight patients shed up to 20% of their body weight in a year-long mid-stage trial.

MERCK

In 2024, Merck 
MRK
 signed a licensing deal worth up to $2 billion for Chinese biotech Hansoh Pharma's 
3692
 experimental oral drug to treat obesity, becoming a late contender in the race to offer a weight-loss pill to replace weekly shots.

The drug, HS-10535, is a GLP-1 receptor agonist candidate similar to Wegovy and Zepbound.

VIKING THERAPEUTICS

The company 
VKTX
 in February said it plans to test its experimental oral obesity drug in a late-stage study later this year.

The company plans to advance a tablet form of its experimental weight-loss drug, VK2735, into late-stage studies in the third quarter of this year.

Last year, Viking Therapeutics 
VKTX
 said its oral weight-loss drug, VK2735, helped patients lose 12.2% of their body weight after 13 weeks in a mid-stage trial of 280 overweight adults, missing Wall Street's top-end expectations of 15%.

SCHOLAR ROCK

Last year, the company 
SRRK
 said its experimental drug, apitegromab, combined with Lilly's Zepbound, helped patients preserve significantly more lean mass in a mid-stage trial.

In Scholar Rock's study, patients who received a combination of tirzepatide - the active ingredient in Zepbound - and Scholar's apitegromab lost 3.4 pounds of lean mass after 24 weeks, compared with those on tirzepatide alone, who lost 7.6 pounds of lean mass.

ASTRAZENECA

AstraZeneca 
AZN
 in January said it will license experimental drugs for obesity and weight-related conditions from CSPC Pharmaceutical Group 
1093
 and collaborate on other projects, paying $1.2 billion upfront and up to $17.3 billion more if milestones are met.

The newly licensed drug candidates from CSPC include SYH2082, which is designed for once-monthly dosing, which can help patients stick to weight-loss therapy for longer.

The British-Swedish drugmaker has also licensed an experimental weight-loss pill from China's EccoGene.

STRUCTURE THERAPEUTICS

The company 
GPCR
 said its once-daily pill, aleniglipron helped patients lose up to 16.3% or 39 lbs on the 180 mg dose after 44 weeks, compared with a placebo, in a mid-stage trial.

In another study, patients receiving a lower dose experienced 16.2% weight loss at 56 weeks.

The company said the results support advancement to late-stage development, expected to initiate in the second half of 2026, following an FDA meeting in the second quarter.

https://www.tradingview.com/news/reuters.com,2026:newsml_L4N40K1QZ:0-weight-loss-drug-developers-line-up-to-tap-lucrative-market-as-competition-heats-up/






Novo Nordisk strikes deal for Hims to sell Wegovy and Ozempic, drops lawsuit
Mar 9, 2026, 14:08 GMT+1
Key points:
Hims to sell FDA-approved Wegovy and Ozempic at Novo's self-pay prices
FDA warned telehealth firms over misleading promotions of compounded drugs
Novo Nordisk withdraws lawsuit but reserves right to refile
By Stine Jacobsen and Maggie Fick

Novo Nordisk (NOVb.CO) said on Monday it will sell its blockbuster Wegovy and Ozempic drugs through the U.S. telehealth company Hims & Hers Health 
HIMS
 platform, ending a legal dispute that erupted last month.

The Danish drugmaker sued Hims in February over compounded versions of the Wegovy weight-loss pill that Hims launched and then pulled two days later, as well as compounded versions of Novo's injectable GLP-1s. The U.S. Food and Drug Administration had also planned legal action against Hims over the unauthorized drugs.

Shares of the telehealth company jumped more than 40% on Monday.

Novo has been grappling with telehealth firms selling cheaper compounded copycat versions of its obesity treatments, while Hims has been faced with the high cost of its personalized GLP-1 offerings, which it said is raising product costs.

Under the agreement, Hims will offer approved Ozempic and Wegovy injectables, as well as the Wegovy pill, to U.S. consumers on its platform at Novo's self-pay prices. Hims had a short-lived agreement with Novo in 2025 to sell branded Wegovy.

Hims will no longer advertise compounded GLP-1 drugs, though it will continue offering them when providers deem it clinically necessary. U.S. regulations allow companies to sell compounded versions of drugs in personalized doses not available in the branded forms, or with special ingredients.

"Glad to see HIMS will stop advertising unapproved compounded drugs and instead sell FDA-approved products through its new partnership with Novo Nordisk. Importantly, they will keep them affordable (no increase in price) and limit compounded GLP-1s for rare (FDA compliant) cases," FDA commissioner Marty Makary wrote in a post on X.

"I'd like to congratulate both parties on this deal following our recent action."

The FDA last month said it would take decisive steps against companies mass-marketing illegal copycat drugs, including Hims, spurring the company to reverse course on selling a copy of Novo's pill.

COMPETITION DRIVES PRICE CUTS

Novo Nordisk CEO Mike Doustdar said the Wegovy pill had generated more than 600,000 prescriptions since its launch two months ago, with telehealth partnerships accelerating uptake.

The Danish company faces stiff competition from U.S. rival Eli Lilly 
LLY
, which has become the weight-loss drug market leader. To boost sales, Novo cut prices for its weight-loss drugs from about $1,000 per month to $149 to $299 on its websites.

Doustdar said lower pricing was a key part of the partnership, adding that "authentic products are now very similarly priced as the compounded ones".

The deal followed a warning last week from U.S. regulators to 30 telehealth companies over misleading promotions of compounded GLP-1 drugs. The FDA said some firms falsely equated compounded products with approved medications.

Hims CEO Andrew Dudum said the partnership with Novo followed his company's decision to shift its U.S. weight-loss business away from compounded GLP-1 drugs and toward branded, FDA-approved treatments, reflecting what he said was rising demand for a wider range of lower-cost options.

"That's where we see growth in the business," Dudum said in an interview.

Dudum, during a call to discuss financial results, said most subscribers accessing GLP-1s were using branded options.

“While both parties lack trust, they remain bound by mutual necessity,” said Jailendra Singh, an analyst at Truist.

In light of the agreement, Novo Nordisk said it was withdrawing the patent infringement lawsuit "while reserving the right to refile".

Novo ended a similar agreement last year over concerns about compounded drug marketing and sales.

https://www.tradingview.com/news/reuters.com,2026:newsml_L1N3ZX0JZ:0-novo-nordisk-strikes-deal-for-hims-to-sell-wegovy-and-ozempic-drops-lawsuit/











Wegovy maker Novo sharpens consumer focus with board role for Mars CEO
Mar 26, 2026, 16:09 GMT+1Refinitiv2 min read


Key points:
Novo explores consumer behaviour to enhance obesity treatment strategies
Chairman Sorensen emphasises consumer insights from fast-moving goods sector
Company targets telehealth, retail partnerships and direct-to-consumer access
By Stine Jacobsen and Maggie Fick

Novo Nordisk 
NOVO_B
 has appointed Poul Weihrauch, CEO of U.S. candy giant Mars, as board observer as the Danish drugmaker seeks to strengthen its position in the highly competitive U.S. obesity market.

The maker of weight-loss drug Wegovy announced the appointment at Thursday's annual general meeting, where shareholders also elected pharmaceutical veterans Jan van de Winkel and Ramona Sequeira to the board, along with Helena Saxon, a board member at fashion retailer H&M 
HM_B
.

Novo Nordisk and its majority shareholder, the Novo Nordisk Foundation, carried out a leadership shake-up last year, replacing the CEO and restructuring the board. This included the consolidation of Lars Rebien Sorensen's leadership role through his appointment as board chairman in addition to his role of chairman of the foundation.

NOVO AIMS TO BOOST CONSUMER CREDENTIALS

Sorensen has promised to strengthen the board's pharmaceutical and commercial expertise after criticising the previous board for being slow to address U.S. market challenges.

Novo is trying to boost consumer credentials in the U.S. market in a number of ways under its new management. In January it launched its Wegovy pill across multiple cash-pay channels, rather than solely through traditional insurance routes.

The company is leaning into telehealth, retail partnerships and direct-to-consumer access, as well as cutting prices under pressure from the Trump administration and to win cash-pay patients. Novo and chief rival Eli Lilly and Co 
LLY
 have said the obesity market is becoming increasingly consumer-driven.

"We need to start to see our community more as customers than as patients," Sorensen told reporters after Thursday's meeting, adding that it was studying consumer behaviour to better understand what drives people to seek treatment, where they prefer to access it and when they are most likely to buy.

Sorensen said that Novo had looked at over-the-counter medicines for insight but added that companies in fast-moving consumer goods may provide a closer comparison because of their expertise in tracking purchasing habits and identifying unmet demand.

Those kinds of consumer insights could improve how Novo addresses the needs of overweight people and identify where GLP-1 drugs or other treatments might fit, Sorensen said.

Asked about the apparent contradictions in the appointment of a confectionery company executive by a manufacturer of obesity drugs, Sorensen said both types of companies are highly sophisticated in understanding customers and their needs.

NOVO MAY PURSUE "CONSUMER-ORIENTED" ACQUISITIONS

Asked about M&A priorities, Sorensen said Novo sees opportunities beyond weight loss in obesity-related conditions including cardiovascular, kidney and liver disease, as well as joint problems and inflammatory conditions like psoriasis.

Novo does not plan to pursue cancer despite the higher cancer risk linked to obesity, he said.

Novo may focus on treatments for obesity-related conditions that could be more "consumer-oriented" and suited to digital platforms that give Novo direct access to patients, Sorensen said, but declined to elaborate. "Let's talk about this in September," he said, referring to the company's capital markets day scheduled for September 21.

https://www.tradingview.com/news/reuters.com,2026:newsml_L8N40E1KE:0-wegovy-maker-novo-sharpens-consumer-focus-with-board-role-for-mars-ceo/



Norway's Oil Fund to Abstain From Voting for Re-Election of Novo Nordisk Chairman
Mar 23, 2026, 12:55 GMT+11 min read


By Dominic Chopping

Norway's $2 trillion sovereign-wealth fund won't support the re-election of Lars Rebien Sorensen as chairman of Novo Nordisk's board at the company's annual general meeting later this week.

Norges Bank Investment Management--the arm of Norway's central bank that manages the world's largest sovereign-wealth fund, commonly known as the oil fund--will abstain from the vote, citing "concern regarding effective boards or shareholder protection."

NBIM also abstained from the vote to appoint Sorensen to the position at an extraordinary general meeting in November.

The oil fund held a 1.6% stake in the Danish drugmaker at the end of last year, according to the most recent figures available.

NBIM votes according to a set of guidelines that it says seek to further the long-term economic performance of its investments and reduce financial risks associated with the governance of companies and their environmental and social practices.

The guidelines include stipulations for board independence to avoid conflicts of interest, a balance of competences and backgrounds, and accountability, among others.

Sorensen was appointed chairman late last year as part of sweeping board changes that were pushed by the company's controlling shareholder to revive the company's success in the weight-loss market.

The Novo Nordisk Foundation--the nonprofit organization that owns voting control of the drugmaker--wanted extensive leadership change as the drugmaker lost its lead in the obesity market, causing steep stock-price declines.

Under those changes, Sorensen, the chairman of the Novo Nordisk Foundation, was appointed to also serve as the Novo Nordisk chairman under a plan that will see him serve in the role for two to three years to support management during the company's restructuring and in regaining growth momentum.

"We appreciate the role that all shareholders and other stakeholders play in the company's governance, and we look forward to engaging with them at the Annual General Meeting this week," a spokesperson for Novo Nordisk said Monday.

Norges Bank Investment Management declined to comment.

Write to Dominic Chopping at dominic.chopping@wsj.com

https://www.tradingview.com/news/DJN_DN20260323002897:0/


Novo Nordisk's Obesity Pill Prescriptions Key For Shares as Eli Lilly Launches Rival — Market Talk
Apr 2, 2026, 10:21 GMT+2Less than 1 min read


Novo Nordisk's share-price performance from here will be determined by the trajectory of its Wegovy weight-loss pill prescriptions following Eli Lilly's launch of a rival pill, Citi analysts write. Wegovy pill prescriptions have been strong, but Eli Lilly has filed for approval of its new pill in 40 countries versus Novo Nordisk's more selective approach. This suggests Lilly's Foundayo pill may launch ahead of the Wegovy pill in many global markets, Citi says. "We expect Novo to focus defense on Wegovy pill's better weight loss [profile versus Foundayo]." Foundayo has some drug interaction limitations that the Wegovy pill doesn't, but Foundayo lacks Wegovy pill's requirement that patients don't eat or drink for 30 minutes after taking it. Pricing of the two pills is the same. (dominic.chopping@wsj.com)

https://www.tradingview.com/news/DJN_DN20260402001652:0/





Ozempic maker Novo Nordisk gets another downgrade. The end's in sight for its duopoly status, says TD Cowen.


Mar 10, 2026, 10:48 GMT+1Less than 1 min read



NOVO_B
+2.23%
By Steve Goldstein

TD Cowen downgraded Novo Nordisk to hold.

Novo Nordisk on Tuesday received a broker downgrade, with the analysts arguing that its status in a duopoly in both diabetes and weight loss are under threat.

TD Cowen analysts lowered its rating on the stock to hold from buy and modestly lowered its price target on the American depository receipts to $42 from $45.

Novo Nordisk (NVO) (DK:NOVO.B), which rallied on Monday after reaching a distribution deal with Hims & Hers Health, was steady in premarket trade at $39.78.

Analysts led by Michael Nedelcovych say the company that can be credited with unlocking the obesity market's potential faces enormous challenges, both from competition as well as the looming patent expiration of semaglutide, the key ingredient of the popular drugs Wegovy and Ozempic.

He said that, this year, CagriSema trials failed or underwhelmed, while Ozempic prescriptions keep lagging even as take-up of the Wegovy pill have impressed.

The analysts raised questions about how much the Wegovy pill will take away from the injectable Wegovy version, whether Eli Lilly's orforglipron will overtake its rival as well as the reimbursement, average price and staying time on the drug.

While Novo Nordisk's pipeline is strong, it's no longer sufficient to create visibility on the post-semaglutide trajectory, the analysts added.

-Steve Goldstein

This content was created by MarketWatch, which is operated by Dow Jones & Co. MarketWatch is published independently from Dow Jones Newswires and The Wall Street Journal.

https://www.tradingview.com/news/DJN_SN20260310003908:0/


All numbers in thousands
Annual
Quarterly

Collapse All
BreakdownTTM12/31/202512/31/202412/31/202312/31/2022

Total Revenue
309,064,000
309,064,000
290,403,000
232,261,000
176,954,000
Operating Revenue
729,423,000
729,423,000
680,563,000
608,645,000
455,692,000
Cost of Revenue
58,788,000
58,788,000
44,522,000
35,765,000
28,448,000
Gross Profit
250,276,000
250,276,000
245,881,000
196,496,000
148,506,000

Operating Expense
122,618,000
122,618,000
117,542,000
93,922,000
73,697,000

Selling General and Administrative
70,279,000
70,279,000
67,377,000
61,598,000
50,684,000

General & Administrative Expense
5,969,000
5,969,000
5,276,000
4,855,000
4,467,000
Other G and A
5,969,000
5,969,000
5,276,000
4,855,000
4,467,000
Selling & Marketing Expense
64,310,000
64,310,000
62,101,000
56,743,000
46,217,000
Research & Development
52,039,000
52,039,000
48,062,000
32,443,000
24,047,000
Other Operating Expenses
300,000
300,000
2,103,000
-119,000
-1,034,000
Operating Income
127,658,000
127,658,000
128,339,000
102,574,000
74,809,000

Net Non Operating Interest Income Expense
-3,179,000
-3,179,000
-91,000
330,000
-320,000
Interest Income Non Operating
1,269,000
1,269,000
1,838,000
1,069,000
239,000
Interest Expense Non Operating
4,207,000
4,207,000
1,640,000
542,000
378,000
Total Other Finance Cost
241,000
241,000
289,000
197,000
181,000

Other Income Expense
6,061,000
6,061,000
-1,057,000
1,770,000
-5,427,000
Gain on Sale of Security
6,078,000
6,078,000
-1,040,000
1,689,000
-5,238,000
Earnings from Equity Interest
-17,000
-17,000
-17,000
81,000
-189,000
Pretax Income
130,540,000
130,540,000
127,191,000
104,674,000
69,062,000
Tax Provision
28,106,000
28,106,000
26,203,000
20,991,000
13,537,000

Net Income Common Stockholders
102,434,000
102,434,000
100,988,000
83,683,000
55,525,000

Net Income
102,434,000
102,434,000
100,988,000
83,683,000
55,525,000

Net Income Including Non-Controlling Interests
102,434,000
102,434,000
100,988,000
83,683,000
55,525,000
Net Income Continuous Operations
102,434,000
102,434,000
100,988,000
83,683,000
55,525,000
Diluted NI Available to Com Stockholders
102,434,000
102,434,000
100,988,000
83,683,000
55,525,000
Basic EPS
23.06
23.06
22.67
18.67
12.26
Diluted EPS
23.03
23.03
22.63
18.62
12.22
Basic Average Shares
4,443,000
4,442,064.18
4,453,900
4,482,800
4,530,600
Diluted Average Shares
4,447,700
4,447,850.63
4,463,000
4,494,800
4,544,600
Total Operating Income as Reported
127,658,000
127,658,000
128,339,000
102,574,000
74,809,000
Total Expenses
181,406,000
181,406,000
162,064,000
129,687,000
102,145,000
Net Income from Continuing & Discontinued Operation
102,434,000
102,434,000
100,988,000
83,683,000
55,525,000
Normalized Income
97,664,627.76
97,664,627.76
101,813,746.48
82,333,489
59,736,352
Interest Income
1,269,000
1,269,000
1,838,000
1,069,000
239,000
Interest Expense
4,207,000
4,207,000
1,640,000
542,000
378,000
Net Interest Income
-3,179,000
-3,179,000
-91,000
330,000
-320,000
EBIT
134,747,000
134,747,000
128,831,000
105,216,000
69,440,000
EBITDA
156,729,000
156,729,000
147,938,000
114,629,000
76,802,000
Reconciled Cost of Revenue
58,788,000
58,788,000
44,522,000
35,765,000
28,448,000
Reconciled Depreciation
21,982,000
21,982,000
19,107,000
9,413,000
7,362,000
Net Income from Continuing Operation Net Minority Interest
102,434,000
102,434,000
100,988,000
83,683,000
55,525,000
Total Unusual Items Excluding Goodwill
6,078,000
6,078,000
-1,040,000
1,689,000
-5,238,000
Total Unusual Items
6,078,000
6,078,000
-1,040,000
1,689,000
-5,238,000
Normalized EBITDA
150,651,000
150,651,000
148,978,000
112,940,000
82,040,000
Tax Rate for Calcs
0
0
0
0
0
Tax Effect of Unusual Items
1,308,627.76
1,308,627.76
-214,253.52
339,489
-1,026,648
https://finance.yahoo.com/quote/NOVO-B.CO/financials/










BreakdownTTM12/31/20259/30/20256/30/20253/31/202512/31/2024
Currency in DKK
Total Revenue
309,064,000
79,144,000
74,976,000
76,857,000
78,087,000
85,683,000
Operating Revenue
729,423,000
79,144,000
74,976,000
76,857,000
78,087,000
85,683,000
Cost of Revenue
58,788,000
15,148,000
17,904,000
12,846,000
12,890,000
13,024,000
Gross Profit
250,276,000
63,996,000
57,072,000
64,011,000
65,197,000
72,659,000

Operating Expense
122,618,000
32,260,000
33,390,000
30,562,000
26,406,000
35,922,000

Selling General and Administrative
70,279,000
17,438,000
17,880,000
18,849,000
16,112,000
20,281,000

General & Administrative Expense
5,969,000
1,549,000
1,884,000
1,316,000
1,220,000
1,580,000
Other G and A
5,969,000
1,549,000
1,884,000
1,316,000
1,220,000
1,580,000
Selling & Marketing Expense
64,310,000
15,889,000
15,996,000
17,533,000
14,892,000
18,701,000
Research & Development
52,039,000
14,648,000
15,393,000
11,690,000
10,308,000
13,802,000
Other Operating Expenses
300,000
174,000
117,000
23,000
-14,000
1,839,000
Operating Income
127,658,000
31,736,000
23,682,000
33,449,000
38,791,000
36,737,000

Net Non Operating Interest Income Expense
-3,179,000
2,449,000
1,835,000
356,000
-1,758,000
-1,180,000
Interest Income Non Operating
1,269,000
2,449,000
1,835,000
5,314,000
3,425,000
3,913,000
Interest Expense Non Operating
4,207,000
-4,406,000
--
4,958,000
5,183,000
5,093,000
Total Other Finance Cost
241,000
--
--
--
--
--

Other Income Expense
6,061,000
--
--
--
--
--
Gain on Sale of Security
6,078,000
--
--
--
--
--
Earnings from Equity Interest
-17,000
--
--
--
--
--
Pretax Income
130,540,000
34,185,000
25,517,000
33,805,000
37,033,000
35,557,000
Tax Provision
28,106,000
7,294,000
5,511,000
7,302,000
7,999,000
7,327,000

Net Income Common Stockholders
102,434,000
26,891,000
20,006,000
26,503,000
29,034,000
28,230,000

Net Income
102,434,000
26,891,000
20,006,000
26,503,000
29,034,000
28,230,000

Net Income Including Non-Controlling Interests
102,434,000
26,891,000
20,006,000
26,503,000
29,034,000
28,230,000
Net Income Continuous Operations
102,434,000
26,891,000
20,006,000
26,503,000
29,034,000
28,230,000
Diluted NI Available to Com Stockholders
102,434,000
26,891,000
20,006,000
26,503,000
29,034,000
28,230,000
Basic EPS
23.06
6.06
--
5.96
6.54
6.34
Diluted EPS
23.03
6.04
--
5.96
6.53
6.34
Basic Average Shares
4,443,000
4,443,600
--
4,446,812.08
4,439,500
4,446,200
Diluted Average Shares
4,447,700
4,449,400
--
4,446,812.08
4,446,400
4,455,500
Total Operating Income as Reported
127,658,000
31,736,000
23,682,000
33,449,000
38,791,000
36,737,000
Total Expenses
181,406,000
47,408,000
51,294,000
43,408,000
39,296,000
48,946,000
Net Income from Continuing & Discontinued Operation
102,434,000
26,891,000
20,006,000
26,503,000
29,034,000
28,230,000
Normalized Income
97,664,627.76
26,891,000
20,006,000
26,503,000
29,034,000
28,230,000
Interest Income
1,269,000
2,449,000
1,835,000
5,314,000
3,425,000
3,913,000
Interest Expense
4,207,000
-4,406,000
--
4,958,000
5,183,000
5,093,000
Net Interest Income
-3,179,000
2,449,000
1,835,000
356,000
-1,758,000
-1,180,000
EBIT
134,747,000
31,736,000
23,682,000
38,763,000
42,216,000
40,650,000
EBITDA
156,729,000
37,298,000
31,439,000
43,596,000
46,046,000
45,848,000
Reconciled Cost of Revenue
58,788,000
15,148,000
17,904,000
12,846,000
12,890,000
13,024,000
Reconciled Depreciation
21,982,000
5,562,000
7,757,000
4,833,000
3,830,000
5,198,000
Net Income from Continuing Operation Net Minority Interest
102,434,000
26,891,000
20,006,000
26,503,000
29,034,000
28,230,000
Total Unusual Items Excluding Goodwill
6,078,000
--
--
--
--
--
Total Unusual Items
6,078,000
--
--
--
--
--
Normalized EBITDA
150,651,000
37,298,000
31,439,000
43,596,000
46,046,000
45,848,000
Tax Rate for Calcs
0
0
0
0
0
0
Tax Effect of Unusual Items
1,308,627.76
0
0
0
0
0
https://finance.yahoo.com/quote/NOVO-B.CO/financials/







Breakdown12/31/20259/30/20256/30/20253/31/202512/31/2024

Total Assets
542,902,000
512,288,000
482,153,000
489,162,000
465,630,000

Current Assets
172,453,000
181,883,000
162,705,000
174,395,000
161,788,000

Cash, Cash Equivalents & Short Term Investments
26,962,000
32,583,000
18,934,000
41,550,000
26,308,000

Cash And Cash Equivalents
26,464,000
32,084,000
18,435,000
38,938,000
15,655,000
Cash
26,464,000
32,084,000
18,435,000
38,938,000
15,655,000
Other Short Term Investments
498,000
499,000
499,000
2,612,000
10,653,000

Receivables
89,186,000
92,373,000
85,843,000
86,366,000
88,305,000

Accounts receivable
70,856,000
75,421,000
69,575,000
69,459,000
71,949,000
Gross Accounts Receivable
72,843,000
--
--
--
74,076,000
Allowance For Doubtful Accounts Receivable
-1,987,000
--
--
--
-2,127,000
Taxes Receivable
4,848,000
4,576,000
2,995,000
2,983,000
2,853,000
Other Receivables
13,482,000
12,376,000
13,273,000
13,924,000
13,503,000

Inventory
49,623,000
47,504,000
45,652,000
42,853,000
40,849,000
Raw Materials
17,436,000
--
--
--
13,369,000
Work in Process
25,858,000
--
--
--
22,335,000
Finished Goods
11,990,000
--
--
--
8,873,000
Inventories Adjustments Allowances
-5,661,000
--
--
--
-3,728,000
Hedging Assets Current
6,682,000
9,423,000
12,276,000
3,626,000
6,326,000

Total non-current assets
370,449,000
330,405,000
319,448,000
314,767,000
303,842,000

Net PPE
208,378,000
193,244,000
180,758,000
172,376,000
161,680,000

Gross PPE
267,314,000
--
--
--
214,076,000
Properties
65,559,000
--
--
--
61,374,000
Machinery Furniture Equipment
60,020,000
--
--
--
57,039,000
Other Properties
11,113,000
--
--
--
10,166,000
Construction in Progress
130,622,000
--
--
--
85,497,000
Accumulated Depreciation
-58,936,000
--
--
--
-52,396,000

Goodwill And Other Intangible Assets
130,053,000
106,587,000
107,866,000
109,379,000
110,821,000
Goodwill
19,845,000
--
--
--
20,017,000
Other Intangible Assets
110,208,000
106,587,000
107,866,000
109,379,000
90,804,000

Investments And Advances
2,507,000
2,725,000
2,638,000
2,700,000
2,677,000

Long Term Equity Investment
366,000
390,000
390,000
394,000
400,000
Investments in Associatesat Cost
366,000
390,000
390,000
394,000
400,000

Investment in Financial Assets
2,141,000
2,335,000
2,248,000
2,306,000
2,277,000
Available for Sale Securities
2,141,000
2,335,000
2,248,000
2,306,000
2,277,000
Non Current Accounts Receivable
5,864,000
5,077,000
4,439,000
4,037,000
4,016,000

Non Current Deferred Assets
23,647,000
22,772,000
23,747,000
26,275,000
24,648,000
Non Current Deferred Taxes Assets
23,647,000
22,772,000
23,747,000
26,275,000
24,648,000
Currency in DKK
Total Liabilities Net Minority Interest
348,855,000
342,392,000
314,087,000
350,622,000
322,144,000

Current Liabilities
215,661,000
234,358,000
207,522,000
236,117,000
217,614,000

Payables And Accrued Expenses
161,523,000
46,239,000
45,133,000
35,077,000
161,309,000

Payables
161,523,000
46,239,000
45,133,000
35,077,000
161,309,000
Accounts Payable
153,107,000
23,904,000
28,206,000
19,576,000
151,593,000
Total Tax Payable
8,416,000
22,335,000
16,927,000
15,501,000
9,716,000
Current Provisions
374,000
131,489,000
112,127,000
117,650,000
289,000

Current Debt And Capital Lease Obligation
12,017,000
12,034,000
11,963,000
22,413,000
13,113,000

Current Debt
10,681,000
12,034,000
11,963,000
22,413,000
11,775,000
Commercial Paper
745,000
--
--
--
5,343,000
Line of Credit
183,000
--
--
--
449,000
Other Current Borrowings
9,753,000
12,034,000
11,963,000
22,413,000
5,983,000
Current Capital Lease Obligation
1,336,000
--
--
--
1,338,000
Other Current Liabilities
41,747,000
44,596,000
38,299,000
60,977,000
42,903,000

Total Non Current Liabilities Net Minority Interest
133,194,000
108,034,000
106,565,000
114,505,000
104,530,000
Long Term Provisions
5,730,000
8,816,000
8,637,000
8,633,000
6,982,000

Long Term Debt And Capital Lease Obligation
118,941,000
89,180,000
87,305,000
96,310,000
89,674,000
Long Term Debt
111,705,000
89,180,000
87,305,000
96,310,000
84,246,000
Long Term Capital Lease Obligation
7,236,000
--
--
--
5,428,000

Non Current Deferred Liabilities
6,611,000
9,268,000
9,796,000
8,705,000
5,515,000
Non Current Deferred Taxes Liabilities
6,611,000
9,268,000
9,796,000
8,705,000
5,515,000
Tradeand Other Payables Non Current
1,051,000
19,000
17,000
21,000
1,456,000

Employee Benefits
861,000
751,000
810,000
836,000
903,000
Non Current Pension And Other Post-Retirement Benefit Plans
861,000
751,000
810,000
836,000
903,000
Other Non Current Liabilities
--
19,000
17,000
21,000
23,000

Total Equity Gross Minority Interest
194,047,000
169,896,000
168,066,000
138,540,000
143,486,000

Stockholders' Equity
194,047,000
169,896,000
168,066,000
138,540,000
143,486,000

Capital Stock
446,000
446,000
446,000
446,000
446,000
Common Stock
446,000
446,000
446,000
446,000
446,000
Retained Earnings
195,298,000
168,529,000
164,453,000
137,319,000
144,448,000
Treasury Stock
2,000
2,000
2,000
2,000
2,000

Gains Losses Not Affecting Retained Earnings
-1,695,000
923,000
3,169,000
777,000
-1,406,000
Other Equity Adjustments
-1,695,000
923,000
3,169,000
777,000
-1,406,000
Total Capitalization
305,752,000
259,076,000
255,371,000
234,850,000
227,732,000
Common Stock Equity
194,047,000
169,896,000
168,066,000
138,540,000
143,486,000
Capital Lease Obligations
8,572,000
--
--
--
6,766,000
Net Tangible Assets
63,994,000
63,309,000
60,200,000
29,161,000
32,665,000
Working Capital
-43,208,000
-52,475,000
-44,817,000
-61,722,000
-55,826,000
Invested Capital
316,433,000
271,110,000
267,334,000
257,263,000
239,507,000
Tangible Book Value
63,994,000
63,309,000
60,200,000
29,161,000
32,665,000
Total Debt
130,958,000
101,214,000
99,268,000
118,723,000
102,787,000
Net Debt
95,922,000
69,130,000
80,833,000
79,785,000
80,366,000
Share Issued
4,465,000
4,441,340.47
4,441,340.47
4,441,340.47
4,465,000
Ordinary Shares Number
4,443,479.34
4,441,340.47
4,441,340.47
4,441,340.47
4,441,340.47
Treasury Shares Number
21,520.66
--
--
--
23,659.53
https://finance.yahoo.com/quote/NOVO-B.CO/balance-sheet/
Currency in DKK

Breakdown12/31/202512/31/202412/31/202312/31/2022

Total Assets
542,902,000
465,630,000
314,486,000
241,257,000

Current Assets
172,453,000
161,788,000
139,646,000
108,194,000

Cash, Cash Equivalents & Short Term Investments
26,962,000
26,308,000
30,230,000
23,574,000

Cash And Cash Equivalents
26,464,000
15,655,000
14,392,000
12,653,000
Cash
26,464,000
15,655,000
14,392,000
12,653,000
Other Short Term Investments
498,000
10,653,000
15,838,000
10,921,000

Receivables
89,186,000
88,305,000
75,261,000
57,505,000

Accounts receivable
70,856,000
71,949,000
64,770,000
50,560,000
Gross Accounts Receivable
72,843,000
74,076,000
66,564,000
52,080,000
Allowance For Doubtful Accounts Receivable
-1,987,000
-2,127,000
-1,794,000
-1,520,000
Taxes Receivable
4,848,000
2,853,000
2,423,000
940,000
Other Receivables
13,482,000
13,503,000
8,068,000
6,005,000

Inventory
49,623,000
40,849,000
31,811,000
24,388,000
Raw Materials
17,436,000
13,369,000
9,500,000
6,392,000
Work in Process
25,858,000
22,335,000
17,601,000
13,673,000
Finished Goods
11,990,000
8,873,000
7,224,000
6,038,000
Inventories Adjustments Allowances
-5,661,000
-3,728,000
-2,514,000
-1,715,000
Hedging Assets Current
6,682,000
6,326,000
2,344,000
2,727,000

Total non-current assets
370,449,000
303,842,000
174,840,000
133,063,000

Net PPE
208,378,000
161,680,000
90,961,000
66,671,000

Gross PPE
267,314,000
214,076,000
138,583,000
111,426,000
Properties
65,559,000
61,374,000
48,990,000
43,403,000
Machinery Furniture Equipment
60,020,000
57,039,000
40,951,000
37,548,000
Other Properties
11,113,000
10,166,000
8,979,000
8,114,000
Construction in Progress
130,622,000
85,497,000
39,663,000
22,361,000
Accumulated Depreciation
-58,936,000
-52,396,000
-47,622,000
-44,755,000

Goodwill And Other Intangible Assets
130,053,000
110,821,000
60,406,000
50,939,000
Goodwill
19,845,000
20,017,000
4,464,000
4,615,000
Other Intangible Assets
110,208,000
90,804,000
55,942,000
46,324,000

Investments And Advances
2,507,000
2,677,000
1,663,000
1,343,000

Long Term Equity Investment
366,000
400,000
410,000
327,000
Investments in Associatesat Cost
366,000
400,000
410,000
327,000

Investment in Financial Assets
2,141,000
2,277,000
1,253,000
1,016,000
Available for Sale Securities
2,141,000
2,277,000
1,253,000
1,016,000
Non Current Accounts Receivable
5,864,000
4,016,000
1,430,000
206,000

Non Current Deferred Assets
23,647,000
24,648,000
20,380,000
13,904,000
Non Current Deferred Taxes Assets
23,647,000
24,648,000
20,380,000
13,904,000

Total Liabilities Net Minority Interest
348,855,000
322,144,000
207,925,000
157,771,000

Current Liabilities
215,661,000
217,614,000
169,655,000
120,940,000

Payables And Accrued Expenses
161,523,000
161,309,000
32,722,000
22,678,000

Payables
161,523,000
161,309,000
32,722,000
22,678,000
Accounts Payable
153,107,000
151,593,000
25,606,000
15,587,000
Total Tax Payable
8,416,000
9,716,000
7,116,000
7,091,000
Current Provisions
374,000
289,000
100,478,000
70,287,000

Current Debt And Capital Lease Obligation
12,017,000
13,113,000
6,478,000
1,466,000

Current Debt
10,681,000
11,775,000
5,304,000
480,000
Commercial Paper
745,000
5,343,000
0
--
Line of Credit
183,000
449,000
456,000
480,000
Other Current Borrowings
9,753,000
5,983,000
4,848,000
--
Current Capital Lease Obligation
1,336,000
1,338,000
1,174,000
986,000
Other Current Liabilities
41,747,000
42,903,000
29,977,000
26,509,000

Total Non Current Liabilities Net Minority Interest
133,194,000
104,530,000
38,270,000
36,831,000
Long Term Provisions
5,730,000
6,982,000
6,649,000
4,590,000

Long Term Debt And Capital Lease Obligation
118,941,000
89,674,000
20,528,000
24,318,000
Long Term Debt
111,705,000
84,246,000
15,976,000
20,775,000
Long Term Capital Lease Obligation
7,236,000
5,428,000
4,552,000
3,543,000

Non Current Deferred Liabilities
6,611,000
5,515,000
10,162,000
7,061,000
Non Current Deferred Taxes Liabilities
6,611,000
5,515,000
10,162,000
7,061,000
Tradeand Other Payables Non Current
1,051,000
1,456,000
189,000
100,000

Employee Benefits
861,000
903,000
742,000
762,000
Non Current Pension And Other Post-Retirement Benefit Plans
861,000
903,000
742,000
762,000
Other Non Current Liabilities
--
23,000
189,000
100,000

Total Equity Gross Minority Interest
194,047,000
143,486,000
106,561,000
83,486,000

Stockholders' Equity
194,047,000
143,486,000
106,561,000
83,486,000

Capital Stock
446,000
446,000
451,000
456,000
Common Stock
446,000
446,000
451,000
456,000
Retained Earnings
195,298,000
144,448,000
104,839,000
80,587,000
Treasury Stock
2,000
2,000
5,000
6,000

Gains Losses Not Affecting Retained Earnings
-1,695,000
-1,406,000
1,276,000
2,449,000
Other Equity Adjustments
-1,695,000
-1,406,000
1,276,000
2,449,000
Total Capitalization
305,752,000
227,732,000
122,537,000
104,261,000
Common Stock Equity
194,047,000
143,486,000
106,561,000
83,486,000
Capital Lease Obligations
8,572,000
6,766,000
5,726,000
4,529,000
Net Tangible Assets
63,994,000
32,665,000
46,155,000
32,547,000
Working Capital
-43,208,000
-55,826,000
-30,009,000
-12,746,000
Invested Capital
316,433,000
239,507,000
127,841,000
104,741,000
Tangible Book Value
63,994,000
32,665,000
46,155,000
32,547,000
Total Debt
130,958,000
102,787,000
27,006,000
25,784,000
Net Debt
95,922,000
80,366,000
6,888,000
8,602,000
Share Issued
4,465,000
4,465,000
4,510,000
4,560,000
Ordinary Shares Number
4,443,479.34
4,441,340.47
4,458,287.95
4,499,800
Treasury Shares Number
21,520.66
23,659.53
51,712.05
60,200
https://finance.yahoo.com/quote/NOVO-B.CO/balance-sheet/

Currency in DKK








ncome Statement
Balance Sheet
Cash Flow
All numbers in thousands
Annual
Quarterly

Collapse All
BreakdownTTM12/31/20259/30/20256/30/20253/31/202512/31/2024

Operating Cash Flow
119,102,000
7,619,000
46,107,000
40,785,000
24,591,000
12,301,000

Cash Flow from Continuing Operating Activities
119,102,000
7,619,000
46,107,000
40,785,000
24,591,000
12,301,000
Net Income from Continuing Operations
102,434,000
26,891,000
20,006,000
26,503,000
29,034,000
28,230,000

Depreciation Amortization Depletion
21,982,000
5,562,000
7,757,000
4,833,000
3,830,000
5,198,000

Depreciation & amortization
21,982,000
5,562,000
7,757,000
4,833,000
3,830,000
5,198,000
Depreciation
21,982,000
5,562,000
7,757,000
4,833,000
3,830,000
5,198,000

Deferred Tax
28,106,000
7,294,000
5,511,000
7,302,000
7,999,000
7,327,000
Deferred Income Tax
28,106,000
7,294,000
5,511,000
7,302,000
7,999,000
7,327,000
Other non-cash items
-3,122,000
-28,773,000
18,575,000
4,110,000
2,966,000
-29,664,000
Change in working capital
3,737,000
20,370,000
-4,960,000
4,755,000
-16,428,000
13,603,000
Interest Paid CFO
-3,419,000
-1,170,000
-297,000
-1,119,000
-833,000
-253,000
Interest Received CFO
1,398,000
436,000
138,000
130,000
694,000
813,000
Taxes Refund Paid
-32,014,000
-22,991,000
-623,000
-5,729,000
-2,671,000
-12,953,000

Investing Cash Flow
-79,158,000
-42,812,000
-15,425,000
-14,248,000
-6,673,000
-91,216,000

Cash Flow from Continuing Investing Activities
-79,158,000
-42,812,000
-15,425,000
-14,248,000
-6,673,000
-91,216,000

Net PPE Purchase And Sale
-60,140,000
-18,429,000
-13,628,000
-14,661,000
-13,422,000
-16,102,000
Purchase of PPE
-60,140,000
-18,429,000
-13,628,000
-14,661,000
-13,422,000
-16,101,000

Net Intangibles Purchase And Sale
-29,973,000
-25,408,000
-1,787,000
-1,614,000
-1,164,000
-457,000
Purchase of Intangibles
-29,973,000
-25,408,000
-1,787,000
-1,614,000
-1,164,000
-457,000

Net Business Purchase And Sale
1,004,000
1,004,000
0
--
--
-81,495,000
Purchase of Business
0
0
0
--
--
-81,495,000
Sale of Business
1,004,000
--
--
--
--
--Currency in DKK

Net Investment Purchase And Sale
9,951,000
21,000
-10,000
2,027,000
7,913,000
6,838,000
Purchase of Investment
-723,000
0
-26,000
-582,000
-115,000
-353,000
Sale of Investment
10,674,000
21,000
16,000
2,609,000
8,028,000
7,191,000

Financing Cash Flow
-28,408,000
29,467,000
-17,096,000
-46,230,000
5,451,000
36,835,000

Cash Flow from Continuing Financing Activities
-28,408,000
29,467,000
-17,096,000
-46,230,000
5,451,000
36,835,000

Net Issuance Payments of Debt
24,743,000
29,467,000
-433,000
-19,622,000
15,331,000
44,326,000

Net Long Term Debt Issuance
24,743,000
29,467,000
-433,000
-19,622,000
15,331,000
44,326,000
Long Term Debt Issuance
103,931,000
30,620,000
713,000
45,235,000
27,363,000
44,759,000
Long Term Debt Payments
-79,188,000
-1,153,000
-1,146,000
-64,857,000
-12,032,000
-433,000

Net Common Stock Issuance
-1,388,000
0
0
0
-1,388,000
-7,491,000
Common Stock Payments
-1,388,000
0
0
0
-1,388,000
-7,491,000
Cash Dividends Paid
-51,763,000
0
-16,663,000
174,000
-35,274,000
0
Net Other Financing Charges
--
--
--
--
26,782,000
--

End Cash Position
26,464,000
26,464,000
32,084,000
18,435,000
38,938,000
15,655,000
Changes in Cash
11,536,000
-5,726,000
13,586,000
-19,693,000
23,369,000
-42,080,000
Effect of Exchange Rate Changes
-727,000
106,000
63,000
-810,000
-86,000
717,000
Beginning Cash Position
15,655,000
32,084,000
18,435,000
38,938,000
15,655,000
57,018,000
Capital Expenditure
-90,113,000
-43,837,000
-15,415,000
-16,275,000
-14,586,000
-16,558,000
Issuance of Debt
103,931,000
30,620,000
713,000
45,235,000
27,363,000
44,759,000
Repayment of Debt
-79,188,000
-1,153,000
-1,146,000
-64,857,000
-12,032,000
-433,000
Repurchase of Capital Stock
-1,388,000
0
0
0
-1,388,000
-7,491,000
Free Cash Flow
28,989,000
-36,218,000
30,692,000
24,510,000
10,005,000
-4,257,000
https://finance.yahoo.com/quote/NOVO-B.CO/cash-flow/


ncome Statement
Balance Sheet
Cash Flow
All numbers in thousands
Annual
Quarterly

Collapse All
BreakdownTTM12/31/202512/31/202412/31/202312/31/2022

Operating Cash Flow
119,102,000
119,102,000
120,968,000
108,908,000
78,887,000

Cash Flow from Continuing Operating Activities
119,102,000
119,102,000
120,968,000
108,908,000
78,887,000
Net Income from Continuing Operations
102,434,000
102,434,000
100,988,000
83,683,000
55,525,000

Depreciation Amortization Depletion
21,982,000
21,982,000
19,107,000
9,413,000
7,362,000

Depreciation & amortization
21,982,000
21,982,000
19,107,000
9,413,000
7,362,000
Depreciation
21,982,000
21,982,000
19,107,000
9,413,000
7,362,000

Deferred Tax
28,106,000
28,106,000
26,203,000
20,991,000
13,537,000
Deferred Income Tax
28,106,000
28,106,000
26,203,000
20,991,000
13,537,000
Other non-cash items
-3,122,000
-3,122,000
445,000
424,000
2,367,000
Change in working capital
3,737,000
3,737,000
2,589,000
19,713,000
-5,535,000
Interest Paid CFO
-3,419,000
-3,419,000
-612,000
-491,000
-272,000
Interest Received CFO
1,398,000
1,398,000
1,884,000
1,072,000
276,000
Taxes Refund Paid
-32,014,000
-32,014,000
-29,636,000
-25,897,000
-14,515,000

Investing Cash Flow
-79,158,000
-79,158,000
-128,895,000
-43,892,000
-24,918,000

Cash Flow from Continuing Investing Activities
-79,158,000
-79,158,000
-128,895,000
-43,892,000
-24,918,000

Net PPE Purchase And Sale
-60,140,000
-60,140,000
-47,164,000
-25,806,000
-12,146,000
Purchase of PPE
-60,140,000
-60,140,000
-47,164,000
-25,806,000
-12,146,000

Net Intangibles Purchase And Sale
-29,973,000
-29,973,000
-4,145,000
-13,090,000
-2,607,000
Purchase of Intangibles
-29,973,000
-29,973,000
-4,145,000
-13,090,000
-2,607,000

Net Business Purchase And Sale
1,004,000
1,004,000
-82,163,000
0
-7,075,000
Purchase of Business
0
0
-82,163,000
0
-7,075,000
Sale of Business
1,004,000
1,004,000
0
0
--

Net Investment Purchase And Sale
9,951,000
9,951,000
4,577,000
-4,996,000
-3,090,000
Purchase of Investment
-723,000
-723,000
-19,814,000
-13,289,000
-9,735,000
Sale of Investment
10,674,000
10,674,000
24,391,000
8,293,000
6,645,000

Financing Cash Flow
-28,408,000
-28,408,000
8,735,000
-63,158,000
-51,797,000

Cash Flow from Continuing Financing Activities
-28,408,000
-28,408,000
8,735,000
-63,158,000
-51,797,000

Net Issuance Payments of Debt
24,743,000
24,743,000
73,056,000
-1,467,000
-2,408,000

Net Long Term Debt Issuance
24,743,000
24,743,000
73,056,000
-1,467,000
-2,408,000
Long Term Debt Issuance
103,931,000
103,931,000
79,391,000
0
11,215,000
Long Term Debt Payments
-79,188,000
-79,188,000
-6,335,000
-1,467,000
-13,623,000

Net Common Stock Issuance
-1,388,000
-1,388,000
-20,181,000
-29,924,000
-24,086,000
Common Stock Payments
-1,388,000
-1,388,000
-20,181,000
-29,924,000
-24,086,000
Cash Dividends Paid
-51,763,000
-51,763,000
-44,140,000
-31,767,000
-25,303,000
Net Other Financing Charges
--
--
--
--
--

End Cash Position
26,464,000
26,464,000
15,655,000
14,392,000
12,653,000
Changes in Cash
11,536,000
11,536,000
808,000
1,858,000
2,172,000
Effect of Exchange Rate Changes
-727,000
-727,000
455,000
-119,000
-238,000
Beginning Cash Position
15,655,000
15,655,000
14,392,000
12,653,000
10,719,000
Capital Expenditure
-90,113,000
-90,113,000
-51,309,000
-38,896,000
-14,753,000
Issuance of Debt
103,931,000
103,931,000
79,391,000
0
11,215,000
Repayment of Debt
-79,188,000
-79,188,000
-6,335,000
-1,467,000
-13,623,000
Repurchase of Capital Stock
-1,388,000
-1,388,000
-20,181,000
-29,924,000
-24,086,000
Free Cash Flow
28,989,000
28,989,000
69,659,000
70,012,000
64,134,000

https://finance.yahoo.com/quote/NOVO-B.CO/cash-flow/



Valuation Measures
Current	12/31/2025	9/30/2025	6/30/2025	3/31/2025	12/31/2024
Market Cap	1.05T	1.45T	--	1.95T	2.09T	2.77T
Enterprise Value	1.16T	1.51T	--	2.03T	2.16T	2.75T
Trailing P/E	10.29	13.94	--	18.72	20.76	29.44
Forward P/E	10.96	14.16	--	16.72	17.01	22.37
PEG Ratio (5yr expected)	4.92	2.17	--	1.32	1.05	1.31
Price/Sales	3.41	4.58	--	6.46	7.22	10.31
Price/Book	5.42	8.51	--	14.10	14.53	23.00
Enterprise Value/Revenue	3.74	4.80	5.17	5.26	7.44	10.18
Enterprise Value/EBITDA	7.37	10.03	10.44	10.63	15.74	20.21
https://finance.yahoo.com/quote/NOVO-B.CO/key-statistics/


Revenue Estimate
Currency in DKK	Current Qtr. (Mar 2026)	Next Qtr. (Jun 2026)	Current Year (2026)	Next Year (2027)
No. of Analysts	7	5	27	27
Avg. Estimate	73.16B	71.84B	285.44B	300.02B
Low Estimate	67.54B	69.84B	270.52B	271.03B
High Estimate	95.49B	73.95B	314.79B	332.69B
Year Ago Sales	78.09B	76.86B	309.06B	285.44B
Sales Growth (year/est)	-6.32%	-6.53%	-7.64%	5.11%
Earnings Estimate

gaap
GAAP
nongaap
Normalized
Currency in DKK	Current Qtr. (Mar 2026)	Next Qtr. (Jun 2026)	Current Year (2026)	Next Year (2027)
No. of Analysts	6	4	23	23
Avg. Estimate	5.48	5.34	20.66	21.4
Low Estimate	5.21	5.05	17.51	18.82
High Estimate	5.65	5.63	24.84	26.51
Year Ago EPS	6.53	5.96	23.03	20.66
Earnings History

gaap
GAAP
nongaap
Normalized
Currency in DKK	3/31/2025	6/30/2025	9/30/2025	12/31/2025
EPS Est.	6.11	6.07	4.9	5.78
EPS Actual	6.53	5.96	4.5	6.04
Difference	0.42	-0.11	-0.4	0.26
Surprise %	6.82%	-1.87%	-8.07%	4.56%
EPS Trend

gaap
GAAP
nongaap
Normalized
Currency in DKK	Current Qtr. (Mar 2026)	Next Qtr. (Jun 2026)	Current Year (2026)	Next Year (2027)
Current Estimate	5.48	5.34	20.66	21.4
7 Days Ago	5.45	5.38	20.88	21.39
30 Days Ago	5.25	5.27	20.92	21.44
60 Days Ago	5.24	5.22	21.06	22.28
90 Days Ago	5.96	5.85	22.84	24.23
EPS Revisions

gaap
GAAP
nongaap
Normalized
Currency in DKK	Current Qtr. (Mar 2026)	Next Qtr. (Jun 2026)	Current Year (2026)	Next Year (2027)
Up Last 7 Days	2	1	3	3
Up Last 30 Days	3	2	6	4
Down Last 7 Days	--	1	--	--
Down Last 30 Days	--	1	1	4
Growth Estimates
Symbol	Current Qtr.	Next Qtr.	Current Year	Next Year
NOVO-B.CO	-16.06%	-10.37%	-10.28%	3.57%
S&P 500	12.35%	18.42%	17.50%	16.54%
https://finance.yahoo.com/quote/NOVO-B.CO/analysis/





UNITED STATES

SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION

Washington, D.C. 20549

________________

FORM 6-K

________________

REPORT OF FOREIGN PRIVATE ISSUER

Pursuant to Rule 13a-16 or 15d-16

of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934

April 7, 2026

________________

NOVO NORDISK A/S

(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)


Novo Allé 1

DK- 2880, Bagsvaerd

Denmark

(Address of principal executive offices)

________________

Indicate by check mark whether the registrant files or will file annual reports under cover of Form 20-F or Form 40-F

Form 20-F ☒	Form 40-F ☐






Key Executives
Amounts are as of December 31, 2024 and compensation values are for the last fiscal year ending on that date. Pay is salary, bonuses, etc. Exercised is the value of options exercised during the fiscal year. Currency in USD.
Name	Title	Pay	Exercised	Year Born
Mr. Karsten Munk Knudsen	Executive VP, CFO & Member of the Management Board	2.69M	--	1971
Mr. Maziar Mike Doustdar B.A.	President, CEO & Member of the Management Board	--	--	1970
Dr. Martin Holst Lange	EVP of R&D, Chief Scientific Officer and Member of the Management Board	1.91M	--	1970
Ms. Tania Sabroe	EVP of People, Organisation and Corporate Affairs & Member of Management Board	--	--	1977
Ms. Thilde Hummel Bogebjerg	Executive VP of Enterprise IT & Quality and Member of Management Board	--	--	1982
Mr. John F. Kuckelman	SVP, Group General Counsel, Global Legal, IP & Security and Member of Management Board	--	--	1972
Mr. Emil Kongshoej Larsen	EVP of International Operations & Member of Management Board	--	--	1975
Ms. Elin Jager	SVP, Chief of Staff to CEO, Corporate Strategy & Sustainability and Member of Management Board	--	--	1986
Mr. Jamey Millar	Executive VP of US Operations & Member of Management Board	--	--	1968
Ms. Hong Chow	Executive VP of Product & Portfolio Strategy and Member of Management Board	--	--	1971
Novo Nordisk A/S
Novo Alle 1
Bagsvaerd, 2880
Denmark
45 44 44 88 88
https://www.novonordisk.com
Sector: 
Healthcare
Industry: Drug Manufacturers - General
Full Time Employees: 
68,794

Description
Novo Nordisk A/S, together with its subsidiaries, engages in the research and development, manufacture, and distribution of pharmaceutical products. It operates through two segments, Obesity and Diabetes Care, and Rare Disease. The Obesity and Diabetes care segment provides products for diabetes, obesity, cardiovascular, and other emerging therapy areas. The Rare Disease segment offers products in the areas of rare blood disorders, rare endocrine disorders, and hormone replacement therapy. The company also provides NovoPen 6 and NovoPen Echo Plus, smart insulin pens; Dose Check, an insulin dose guidance application; and growth hormone pens and injection needles. It operates in Europe, Canada, the United States, Japan, Korea, Oceania, Southeast Asia, Mainland China, Hong Kong and Taiwan, Latin America, the Middle East, and Africa. Novo Nordisk A/S was founded in 1923 and is headquartered in Bagsvaerd, Denmark.

Corporate Governance
Novo Nordisk A/S’s ISS Governance QualityScore as of N/A is N/A. The pillar scores are Audit: N/A; Board: N/A; Shareholder Rights: N/A; Compensation: N/A.
Corporate governance scores courtesy of Institutional Shareholder Services (ISS) Scores indicate decile rank relative to index or region. A decile score of 1 indicates lower governance risk, while a 10 indicates higher governance risk.
Upcoming Events
May 6, 2026 at 2:30 PM GMT+2

Novo Nordisk A/S Earnings Date
https://finance.yahoo.com/quote/NVO/profile/




 

UNITED STATES

SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION

Washington, D.C. 20549

 

________________

 

FORM 6-K

________________

 

REPORT OF FOREIGN PRIVATE ISSUER

 

Pursuant to Rule 13a-16 or 15d-16

of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934

 

April 7, 2026

________________

 

NOVO NORDISK A/S

 (Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)

 

 

Novo Allé 1

DK- 2880, Bagsvaerd

Denmark

(Address of principal executive offices)

________________

 

Indicate by check mark whether the registrant files or will file annual reports under cover of Form 20-F or Form 40-F

 

Form 20-F ☒     	     Form 40-F ☐
  

 
 
 

 

 

 

 

Novo Nordisk A/S – Share repurchase programme

 

Bagsværd, Denmark, 7 April 2026 – On 4 February 2026, Novo Nordisk initiated a share repurchase programme in accordance with Article 5 of Regulation No 596/2014 of the European Parliament and Council of 16 April 2014 (MAR) and the Commission Delegated Regulation (EU) 2016/1052 of 8 March 2016 (the "Safe Harbour Rules"). This programme is part of the overall share repurchase programme of up to DKK 15 billion to be executed during a 12-month period beginning 4 February 2026.

 

Under the programme initiated 4 February 2026, Novo Nordisk will repurchase B shares for an amount up to DKK 3.8 billion in the period from 4 February 2026 to 4 May 2026.

 

Since the announcement 30 March 2026, the following transactions have been made:

 

 	
Number of

B shares

Average

purchase price

Transaction

value, DKK

Accumulated, last announcement	9,162,992	 	2,399,878,368
30 March 2026	265,000	229.27	60,755,278
31 March 2026	270,000	229.85	62,060,061
1 April 2026	270,000	235.97	63,710,841
Accumulated under the programme	9,967,992	 	2,586,404,548
 

The details for each transaction made under the share repurchase programme are published on novonordisk.com.

 

With the transactions stated above, Novo Nordisk owns a total of 27,357,791 B shares of DKK 0.10 as treasury shares, corresponding to 0.6% of the share capital. The total amount of A and B shares in the company is 4,465,000,000 including treasury shares.

 

 
Page 2 of 2

 


Novo Nordisk expects to repurchase B shares for an amount up to DKK 15 billion during a 12-month period beginning 4 February 2026. As of 1 April 2026, Novo Nordisk has since 4 February 2026 repurchased a total 9,967,992 B shares at an average share price of DKK 259.47 per B share equal to a transaction value of DKK 2,586,404,548.

 

Novo Nordisk is a leading global healthcare company founded in 1923 and headquartered in Denmark. Our purpose is to drive change to defeat serious chronic diseases built upon our heritage in diabetes. We do so by pioneering scientific breakthroughs, expanding access to our medicines and working to prevent and ultimately cure disease. Novo Nordisk employs about 68,800 people in 80 countries and markets its products in around 170 countries. Novo Nordisk's B shares are listed on Nasdaq Copenhagen (Novo-B). Its ADRs are listed on the New York Stock Exchange (NVO). For more information, visit novonordisk.com, Facebook, Instagram, X, LinkedIn and YouTube.

 

Contacts for further information

 

Media:	 
Ambre James-Brown	Liz Skrbkova (US)
+45 3079 9289	+1 609 917 0632
globalmedia@novonordisk.com	lzsk@novonordisk.com
 	 
Investors:	 
Michael Novod	Jacob Martin Wiborg Rode
+45 3075 6050	+45 3075 5956
nvno@novonordisk.com	jrde@novonordisk.com
 	 
Max Ung	Sina Meyer
+45 3077 6414	+45 3079 6656
mxun@novonordisk.com

azey@novonordisk.com
 	 
Alex Bruce	Christoffer Sho Togo Tullin
+45 34 44 26 13	+45 3079 1471
axeu@novonordisk.com	cftu@novonordisk.com
 	 
Frederik Taylor Pitter	 
+1 609 613 0568	 
fptr@novonordisk.com	 
 

Novo Nordisk A/S

Investor Relations

Novo Allé 1

2880 Bagsværd

Denmark

Telephone:

+45 4444 8888

www.novonordisk.com
CVR no: 24 25 67 90

 	 	 	Company announcement No 24 / 2026
 

 
 
SIGNATURES

 

 

Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf of the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.

 

Date: April 7, 2026	
 

NOVO NORDISK A/S

 

Maziar Mike Doustdar

Chief Executive Officer
https://finance.yahoo.com/sec-filing/NVO/0001171843-26-002279_353278/
















UNITED STATES

SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION

Washington, D.C. 20549

 

________________

 

FORM 6-K

________________

 

REPORT OF FOREIGN PRIVATE ISSUER

 

Pursuant to Rule 13a-16 or 15d-16

of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934

 

March 30, 2026

________________

 

NOVO NORDISK A/S

 (Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)

 

 

Novo Allé 1

DK- 2880, Bagsvaerd

Denmark

(Address of principal executive offices)

________________

 

Indicate by check mark whether the registrant files or will file annual reports under cover of Form 20-F or Form 40-F

 

Form 20-F ☒     	     Form 40-F ☐
  

 
 
 

 

 

 

Novo Nordisk A/S – Share repurchase programme

 

Bagsværd, Denmark, 30 March 2026 – On 4 February 2026, Novo Nordisk initiated a share repurchase programme in accordance with Article 5 of Regulation No 596/2014 of the European Parliament and Council of 16 April 2014 (MAR) and the Commission Delegated Regulation (EU) 2016/1052 of 8 March 2016 (the "Safe Harbour Rules"). This programme is part of the overall share repurchase programme of up to DKK 15 billion to be executed during a 12-month period beginning 4 February 2026.

 

Under the programme initiated 4 February 2026, Novo Nordisk will repurchase B shares for an amount up to DKK 3.8 billion in the period from 4 February 2026 to 4 May 2026.

 

Since the announcement 23 March 2026, the following transactions have been made:

 

 	
Number of

 B shares

Average

purchase price

Transaction

value, DKK

Accumulated, last announcement	7,847,992	 	2,091,696,255
23 March 2026	265,000	234.63	62,177,707
24 March 2026	265,000	237.19	62,854,645
25 March 2026	260,000	238.74	62,072,287
26 March 2026	260,000	232.43	60,431,748
27 March 2026	265,000	228.85	60,645,726
Accumulated under the programme	9,162,992	 	2,399,878,368
 

The details for each transaction made under the share repurchase programme are published on novonordisk.com.

 

With the transactions stated above, Novo Nordisk owns a total of 26,552,791 B shares of DKK 0.10 as treasury shares, corresponding to 0.6% of the share capital. The total amount of A and B shares in the company is 4,465,000,000 including treasury shares.

 

 
Page 2 of 2

 


Novo Nordisk expects to repurchase B shares for an amount up to DKK 15 billion during a 12-month period beginning 4 February 2026. As of 27 March 2026, Novo Nordisk has since 4 February 2026 repurchased a total 9,162,992 B shares at an average share price of DKK 261.91 per B share equal to a transaction value of DKK 2,399,878,368.

 

Novo Nordisk is a leading global healthcare company founded in 1923 and headquartered in Denmark. Our purpose is to drive change to defeat serious chronic diseases built upon our heritage in diabetes. We do so by pioneering scientific breakthroughs, expanding access to our medicines and working to prevent and ultimately cure disease. Novo Nordisk employs about 68,800 people in 80 countries and markets its products in around 170 countries. Novo Nordisk's B shares are listed on Nasdaq Copenhagen (Novo-B). Its ADRs are listed on the New York Stock Exchange (NVO). For more information, visit novonordisk.com, Facebook, Instagram, X, LinkedIn and YouTube.

 

Contacts for further information

 

Media:	 
Ambre James-Brown	Liz Skrbkova (US)
+45 3079 9289	+1 609 917 0632
globalmedia@novonordisk.com	lzsk@novonordisk.com
 	 
Investors:	 
Michael Novod	Jacob Martin Wiborg Rode
+45 3075 6050	+45 3075 5956
nvno@novonordisk.com	jrde@novonordisk.com
 	 
Max Ung	Sina Meyer
+45 3077 6414	+45 3079 6656
mxun@novonordisk.com

azey@novonordisk.com
 	 
Alex Bruce	Christoffer Sho Togo Tullin
+45 34 44 26 13	+45 3079 1471
axeu@novonordisk.com	cftu@novonordisk.com
 	 
Frederik Taylor Pitter	 
+1 609 613 0568	 
fptr@novonordisk.com	 
 

Novo Nordisk A/S

Investor Relations

Novo Allé 1

2880 Bagsværd

Denmark

Telephone:

+45 4444 8888

www.novonordisk.com
CVR no: 24 25 67 90

 	 	 	Company announcement No 23 / 2026
 

 
 
SIGNATURES

 

 

Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf of the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.

 

Date: March 30, 2026	
 

NOVO NORDISK A/S

 

Maziar Mike Doustdar

Chief Executive Officer
https://finance.yahoo.com/sec-filing/NVO/0001171843-26-002013_353278/

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 
 







Novo Nordisk A/S – Share repurchase programme

Bagsværd, Denmark, 7 April 2026 – On 4 February 2026, Novo Nordisk initiated a share repurchase programme in accordance with Article 5 of Regulation No 596/2014 of the European Parliament and Council of 16 April 2014 (MAR) and the Commission Delegated Regulation (EU) 2016/1052 of 8 March 2016 (the "Safe Harbour Rules"). This programme is part of the overall share repurchase programme of up to DKK 15 billion to be executed during a 12-month period beginning 4 February 2026.

Under the programme initiated 4 February 2026, Novo Nordisk will repurchase B shares for an amount up to DKK 3.8 billion in the period from 4 February 2026 to 4 May 2026.

Since the announcement 30 March 2026, the following transactions have been made:

	Number of	Average	Transaction
	B shares	purchase price	value, DKK
Accumulated, last announcement	9,162,992		2,399,878,368
30 March 2026	265,000	229.27	60,755,278
31 March 2026	270,000	229.85	62,060,061
1 April 2026	270,000	235.97	63,710,841
Accumulated under the programme	9,967,992		2,586,404,548

The details for each transaction made under the share repurchase programme are published on novonordisk.com.

With the transactions stated above, Novo Nordisk owns a total of 27,357,791 B shares of DKK 0.10 as treasury shares, corresponding to 0.6% of the share capital. The total amount of A and B shares in the company is 4,465,000,000 including treasury shares.

 
Page 2 of 2

Novo Nordisk expects to repurchase B shares for an amount up to DKK 15 billion during a 12-month period beginning 4 February 2026. As of 1 April 2026, Novo Nordisk has since 4 February 2026 repurchased a total 9,967,992 B shares at an average share price of DKK 259.47 per B share equal to a transaction value of DKK 2,586,404,548.

Novo Nordisk is a leading global healthcare company founded in 1923 and headquartered in Denmark. Our purpose is to drive change to defeat serious chronic diseases built upon our heritage in diabetes. We do so by pioneering scientific breakthroughs, expanding access to our medicines and working to prevent and ultimately cure disease. Novo Nordisk employs about 68,800 people in 80 countries and markets its products in around 170 countries. Novo Nordisk's B shares are listed on Nasdaq Copenhagen (Novo-B). Its ADRs are listed on the New York Stock Exchange (NVO). For more information, visit novonordisk.com, Facebook, Instagram, X, LinkedIn and YouTube.

Contacts for further information			
Media:			
Ambre James-Brown		Liz Skrbkova (US)	
+45 3079 9289		+1 609 917 0632	
globalmedia@novonordisk.com		lzsk@novonordisk.com	
Investors:			
Michael Novod		Jacob Martin Wiborg Rode	
+45 3075 6050		+45 3075 5956	
nvno@novonordisk.com		jrde@novonordisk.com	
Max Ung		Sina Meyer	
+45 3077 6414		+45 3079 6656	
mxun@novonordisk.com		azey@novonordisk.com	
Alex Bruce		Christoffer Sho Togo Tullin	
+45 34 44 26 13		+45 3079 1471	
axeu@novonordisk.com		cftu@novonordisk.com	
Frederik Taylor Pitter			
+1 609 613 0568			
fptr@novonordisk.com			
Novo Nordisk A/S	Novo Allé 1	Telephone:	www.novonordisk.com
Investor Relations	2880 Bagsværd	+45 4444 8888	CVR no: 24 25 67 90
	Denmark		
			Company announcement No 24 / 2026
			
			
 
SIGNATURES


Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf of the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.

Date: April 7, 2026

NOVO NORDISK A/S

Maziar Mike Doustdar

Chief Executive Officer

https://www.nasdaq.com/market-activity/stocks/nonof/sec-filings











UNITED STATES

SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION

Washington, D.C. 20549

________________

FORM 6-K

________________

REPORT OF FOREIGN PRIVATE ISSUER

Pursuant to Rule 13a-16 or 15d-16

of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934

March 27, 2026

________________

NOVO NORDISK A/S

(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)


Novo Allé 1

DK- 2880, Bagsvaerd

Denmark

(Address of principal executive offices)

________________

Indicate by check mark whether the registrant files or will file annual reports under cover of Form 20-F or Form 40-F

Form 20-F ☒	Form 40-F ☐

 







Novo Nordisk A/S: Awiqli® approved in the US, the first and only once-weekly basal insulin treatment for adults with type 2 diabetes

•	Awiqli® (insulin icodec-abae) injection is the first-ever once-weekly basal insulin approved by the FDA
•	Awiqli® offers adults with type 2 diabetes an alternative to daily basal insulin injections, reducing these injections from seven to one per week
•	Novo Nordisk expects to launch Awiqli® nationwide in the US in the second half of 2026.

Bagsværd, Denmark, 27 March 2026 – Novo Nordisk today announced that the US Food and Drug Administration (FDA) has approved Awiqli® (insulin icodec-abae) injection 700 units/mL, the first and only once-weekly, long-acting basal insulin, indicated as an adjunct to diet and exercise to improve glycaemic control (blood sugar) in adults living with type 2 diabetes. The approval offers the only once-weekly basal insulin option, providing a new treatment solution that fits different patient routines and preferences for adults living with type 2 diabetes.

The approval is based on results from the ONWARDS phase 3a programme in type-2-diabetes for once-weekly Awiqli® injection, which comprises four randomised, active-controlled, treat-to-target trials in approximately 2,680 adults with uncontrolled type 2 diabetes, used in combination with a mealtime insulin or in combination with common oral anti-diabetic agents and/or GLP-1 receptor agonists. The clinical programme evaluated once-weekly

Awiqli® vs daily basal insulin and demonstrated efficacy in the primary endpoint of HbA1c reduction across the ONWARDS pivotal clinical trial programme in adults with type 2 diabetes. Across ONWARDS trials, the safety profile of Awiqli® was overall consistent with the daily basal insulin class.

“The Awiqli® approval reflects Novo Nordisk’s ongoing efforts to advance healthcare innovation and strengthen support for people living with diabetes. As the first FDA-approved, once-weekly basal insulin for adults with type 2 diabetes, it offers an important new treatment option. At a time when parts of the industry are stepping back from insulin, we are reaffirming our commitment - continuing to invest in innovation, access, and supply for the millions of patients who rely on insulin every day,” said Mike Doustdar, president and CEO of Novo Nordisk.

Novo Nordisk expects to launch Awiqli® in the FlexTouch® device in the US in the second half of 2026. Awiqli® is now approved in the US, EU, and 13 additional countries, with market-specific indications for diabetes.


Novo Nordisk A/S	Novo Allé 1	Telephone:	www.novonordisk.com
Investor Relations	2880 Bagsværd	+45 4444 8888	CVR no: 24 25 67 90
	Denmark		
			Company announcement No 22/ 2026
			
			
 
About Awiqli®

Awiqli® (insulin icodec-abae) injection 700 units/mL is a prescription medicine and is the first and only FDA-approved once-weekly basal insulin indicated as an adjunct to diet and exercise for adults with type 2 diabetes. Awiqli® is designed as an alternative to daily basal insulin, and its approval is supported by the ONWARDS clinical programme, which evaluated its efficacy and safety across diverse adult populations living with type 2 diabetes. Awiqli® is administered once weekly on the same day each week using the Awiqli® FlexTouch® device.

About Novo Nordisk

Novo Nordisk is a leading global healthcare company founded in 1923 and headquartered in Denmark. Our purpose is to drive change to defeat serious chronic diseases built upon our heritage in diabetes. We do so by pioneering scientific breakthroughs, expanding access to our medicines and working to prevent and ultimately cure disease. Novo Nordisk employs about 68,800 people in 80 countries and markets its products in around 170 countries. Novo Nordisk's B shares are listed on Nasdaq Copenhagen (Novo-B). Its ADRs are listed on the New York Stock Exchange (NVO). For more information, visit novonordisk.com, Facebook, Instagram, X, LinkedIn and YouTube.


Publication of inside information pursuant to Market Abuse Regulation, Article 17.

Contacts for further information
 

Novo Nordisk Media:

Ambre James-Brown

+45 3079 9289

globalmedia@novonordisk.com
 



Liz Skrbkova (US)

+1 609 917 0632

lzsk@novonordisk.com

 
Novo Nordisk Investors:
 

Michael Novod

+45 3075 6050

nvno@novonordisk.com
 


Jacob Martin Wiborg Rode

+45 3075 5956

jrde@novonordisk.com

 
Sina Meyer

+45 3079 6656

azey@novonordisk.com
 

Max Ung

+45 3077 6414

mxun@novonordisk.com

 
Christoffer Sho Togo Tullin

+45 3079 1471

cftu@novonordisk.com
 

Alex Bruce

+45 3444 2613

axeu@novonordisk.com

 
Frederik Taylor Pitter

+1 609 613 0568

fptr@novonordisk.com
 



Novo Nordisk A/S	Novo Allé 1	Telephone:	www.novonordisk.com
Investor Relations	2880 Bagsværd	+45 4444 8888	CVR no: 24 25 67 90
	Denmark		
			Company announcement No 22/ 2026
			
			
 
SIGNATURES


Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf of the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.

Date: March 27, 2026

NOVO NORDISK A/S

Maziar Mike Doustdar

Chief Executive Officer

https://www.nasdaq.com/market-activity/stocks/nonof/sec-filings











UNITED STATES

SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION

Washington, D.C. 20549

________________

FORM 6-K

________________

REPORT OF FOREIGN PRIVATE ISSUER

Pursuant to Rule 13a-16 or 15d-16

of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934

March 9, 2026

________________

NOVO NORDISK A/S

(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)


Novo Allé 1

DK- 2880, Bagsvaerd

Denmark

(Address of principal executive offices)

________________

Indicate by check mark whether the registrant files or will file annual reports under cover of Form 20-F or Form 40-F

Form 20-F ☒	Form 40-F ☐

 






Novo Nordisk A/S – Share repurchase programme

Bagsværd, Denmark, 9 March 2026 – On 4 February 2026, Novo Nordisk initiated a share repurchase programme in accordance with Article 5 of Regulation No 596/2014 of the European Parliament and Council of 16 April 2014 (MAR) and the Commission Delegated Regulation (EU) 2016/1052 of 8 March 2016 (the "Safe Harbour Rules"). This programme is part of the overall share repurchase programme of up to DKK 15 billion to be executed during a 12-month period beginning 4 February 2026.

Under the programme initiated 4 February 2026, Novo Nordisk will repurchase B shares for an amount up to DKK 3.8 billion in the period from 4 February 2026 to 4 May 2026.

Since the announcement 2 March 2026, the following transactions have been made:

	Number of	Average	Transaction
	B shares	purchase price	value, DKK
Accumulated, last announcement	4,045,000		1,160,693,639
2 March 2026	265,000	235.47	62,400,704
3 March 2026	264,992	234.56	62,156,398
4 March 2026	260,000	241.02	62,666,178
5 March 2026	250,000	248.29	62,072,969
6 March 2026	250,000	251.23	62,807,206
Accumulated under the programme	5,334,992		1,472,797,094

The details for each transaction made under the share repurchase programme are published on novonordisk.com.

With the transactions stated above, Novo Nordisk owns a total of 22,724,791 B shares of DKK 0.10 as treasury shares, corresponding to 0.5% of the share capital. The total amount of A and B shares in the company is 4,465,000,000 including treasury shares.

 
Page 2 of 2

Novo Nordisk expects to repurchase B shares for an amount up to DKK 15 billion during a 12-month period beginning 4 February 2026. As of 6 March 2026, Novo Nordisk has since 4 February 2026 repurchased a total 5,334,992 B shares at an average share price of DKK 276.06 per B share equal to a transaction value of DKK 1,472,797,094.

Novo Nordisk is a leading global healthcare company founded in 1923 and headquartered in Denmark. Our purpose is to drive change to defeat serious chronic diseases built upon our heritage in diabetes. We do so by pioneering scientific breakthroughs, expanding access to our medicines and working to prevent and ultimately cure disease. Novo Nordisk employs about 68,800 people in 80 countries and markets its products in around 170 countries. Novo Nordisk's B shares are listed on Nasdaq Copenhagen (Novo-B). Its ADRs are listed on the New York Stock Exchange (NVO). For more information, visit novonordisk.com, Facebook, Instagram, X, LinkedIn and YouTube.

Contacts for further information			
Media:			
Ambre James-Brown		Liz Skrbkova (US)	
+45 3079 9289		+1 609 917 0632	
globalmedia@novonordisk.com		lzsk@novonordisk.com	
Investors:			
Michael Novod		Jacob Martin Wiborg Rode	
+45 3075 6050		+45 3075 5956	
nvno@novonordisk.com		jrde@novonordisk.com	
Max Ung		Sina Meyer	
+45 3077 6414		+45 3079 6656	
mxun@novonordisk.com		azey@novonordisk.com	
Alex Bruce		Christoffer Sho Togo Tullin	
+45 34 44 26 13		+45 3079 1471	
axeu@novonordisk.com		cftu@novonordisk.com	
Frederik Taylor Pitter			
+1 609 613 0568			
fptr@novonordisk.com			
Novo Nordisk A/S	Novo Allé 1	Telephone:	www.novonordisk.com
Investor Relations	2880 Bagsværd	+45 4444 8888	CVR no: 24 25 67 90
	Denmark		
			Company announcement No 17 / 2026
			
			
 
SIGNATURES


Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf of the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.

Date: March 9, 2026

NOVO NORDISK A/S

Maziar Mike Doustdar

Chief Executive Officer

https://www.nasdaq.com/market-activity/stocks/nonof/sec-filings









UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION

Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 20-F

REGISTRATION STATEMENT PURSUANT TO SECTION 12(b) OR (g) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934

OR

ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934

For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2025

OR

TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934

OR

SHELL COMPANY REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934

Commission File Number: 333-82318

NOVO NORDISK A/S
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)

Not applicable	The Kingdom of Denmark

(Translation of Registrant’s name into English)	(Jurisdiction of incorporation or organization)

 
Novo Alle 1

DK-2880 Bagsværd
Denmark
(Address of principal executive offices)
Karsten Munk Knudsen
Executive vice president and chief financial officer
Tel: +45 4444 8888
E-mail: kmkn@novonordisk.com
Novo Alle 1, DK-2880 Bagsværd, Denmark
(Name, Telephone, E-mail and Address of Company Contact Person)

Securities registered or to be registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:

Title of each class:
B shares, nominal value DKK 0.10 each

American Depositary Receipts, each representing one B Share


Securities registered or to be registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None

Securities for which there is a reporting obligation pursuant to Section 15(d) of the Act: None

Indicate the number of outstanding shares of each of the issuer’s classes of capital or common stock as of the close of the period covered by the Annual Report:	
A shares, nominal value DKK 0.10 each:	1,074,872,000
B shares, nominal value DKK 0.10 each:	3,390,128,000
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act  .	
Yes  No 	
If this report is an annual or transition report, indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
Yes  No 	

Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the Registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days.

Yes  No 

Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit such files).

Yes  No 

Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, or an emerging growth company. See definition of “large accelerated filer”, “accelerated filer”, and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act. Large accelerated filer  Accelerated filer  Non-accelerated filer  Emerging growth company 

If an emerging growth company that prepares its financial statements in accordance with U.S. GAAP, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. 

The term “new or revised financial accounting standard” refers to any update issued by the Financial Accounting Standards Board to its Accounting Standards Codification after April 5, 2012.

Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management's assessment of the effectiveness of its internal control over financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report.

If securities are registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act, indicate by check mark whether the financial statements of the registrant included in the filing reflect the correction of an error to previously issued financial statements.	

Indicate by check mark whether any of those error corrections are restatements that required a recovery analysis of incentive based compensation received by any of the registrant’s executive officers during the relevant recovery period pursuant to §240.10D-1(b).	

Indicate by check mark which basis of accounting the registrant has used to prepare the financial statements included in this filling:

U.S. GAAP  International Financial Reporting Standards as issued by the International Accounting Standards Board	Other

If “Other” has been checked in response to the previous question, indicate by check mark which financial statement item the registrant has elected to follow:

Item 17  Item 18 

If this is an annual report, indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act).

Yes  No 

https://www.nasdaq.com/market-activity/stocks/nonof/sec-filings?page=2&rows_per_page=14















Valuation Measures
Current	12/31/2025	9/30/2025	6/30/2025	3/31/2025	12/31/2024
Market Cap	171.95B	227.28B	240.67B	307.01B	302.51B	386.78B
Enterprise Value	188.33B	238.07B	253.30B	319.14B	313.61B	384.28B
Trailing P/E	10.93	13.87	14.15	18.70	21.15	29.08
Forward P/E	11.64	14.10	13.33	16.75	17.36	22.08
PEG Ratio (5yr expected)	5.22	2.16	1.40	1.32	1.07	1.29
Price/Sales	3.62	4.56	5.04	6.46	7.36	10.18
Price/Book	5.76	8.46	9.34	14.08	14.81	22.72
Enterprise Value/Revenue	3.87	4.80	5.17	5.26	7.44	10.18
Enterprise Value/EBITDA	7.63	10.03	10.44	10.63	15.74	20.21
Financial Highlights
Fiscal Year
Fiscal Year Ends	12/31/2025
Most Recent Quarter (mrq)	12/31/2025
Profitability
Profit Margin	33.14%
Operating Margin (ttm)	44.53%
Management Effectiveness
Return on Assets (ttm)	17.43%
Return on Equity (ttm)	60.70%
Income Statement
Revenue (ttm)	309.06B
Revenue Per Share (ttm)	69.56
Quarterly Revenue Growth (yoy)	-7.60%
Gross Profit (ttm)	254.69B
EBITDA	153.29B
Net Income Avi to Common (ttm)	102.43B
Diluted EPS (ttm)	3.60
Quarterly Earnings Growth (yoy)	-4.70%
Balance Sheet
Total Cash (mrq)	26.96B
Total Cash Per Share (mrq)	6.07
Total Debt (mrq)	130.96B
Total Debt/Equity (mrq)	67.49%
Current Ratio (mrq)	0.80
Book Value Per Share (mrq)	6.88
Cash Flow Statement
Operating Cash Flow (ttm)	119.1B
Levered Free Cash Flow (ttm)	376.88M
Trading Information
Stock Price History
Beta (5Y Monthly)	0.27
52 Week Change 3	-37.47%
S&P 500 52-Week Change 3	32.07%
52 Week High 3	81.44
52 Week Low 3	35.12
50-Day Moving Average 3	40.85
200-Day Moving Average 3	51.92
Share Statistics
Avg Vol (3 month) 3	23.19M
Avg Vol (10 day) 3	15.21M
Shares Outstanding 5	3.36B
Implied Shares Outstanding 6	4.45B
Float 8	3.19B
% Held by Insiders 1	0.01%
% Held by Institutions 1	9.50%
Shares Short (3/31/2026) 4	19.93M
Short Ratio (3/31/2026) 4	1.04
Short % of Float (3/31/2026) 4	0.63%
Short % of Shares Outstanding (3/31/2026) 4	0.45%
Shares Short (prior month 2/27/2026) 4	28.26M
Dividends & Splits
Forward Annual Dividend Rate 4	1.8
Forward Annual Dividend Yield 4	4.58%
Trailing Annual Dividend Rate 3	11.70
Trailing Annual Dividend Yield 3	29.76%
5 Year Average Dividend Yield 4	1.72
Payout Ratio 4	50.42%
Dividend Date 3	4/8/2026
Ex-Dividend Date 4	3/30/2026
Last Split Factor 2	2:1
Last Split Date 3	9/20/2023
Footnotes
1 Data provided by Refinitiv.
2 Data provided by EDGAR Online.
3 Data derived from multiple sources or calculated by Yahoo Finance.
4 Data provided by Morningstar, Inc.
5 Shares outstanding is taken from the most recently filed quarterly or annual report and Market Cap is calculated using shares outstanding.
6 Implied Shares Outstanding of common equity, assuming the conversion of all convertible subsidiary equity into common.
7 EBITDA is calculated by S&P Global Market Intelligence using methodology that may differ from that used by a company in its reporting.
8 A company's float is a measure of the number of shares available for trading by the public. It's calculated by taking the number of issued and outstanding shares minus any restricted stock, which may not be publicly traded.
Abbreviation Guide
mrq = Most Recent Quarter
ttm = Trailing Twelve Months
yoy = Year Over Year
lfy = Last Fiscal Year
fye = Fiscal Year Ending



Revenue Estimate
Currency in DKK	Current Qtr. (Mar 2026)	Next Qtr. (Jun 2026)	Current Year (2026)	Next Year (2027)
No. of Analysts	7	5	27	27
Avg. Estimate	72.88B	71.91B	285.53B	299.6B
Low Estimate	67.54B	69.84B	270.52B	271.03B
High Estimate	95.49B	73.95B	314.79B	332.69B
Year Ago Sales	78.09B	76.86B	309.06B	285.53B
Sales Growth (year/est)	-6.67%	-6.44%	-7.61%	4.93%
Earnings Estimate

gaap
GAAP
nongaap
Normalized
Currency in DKK	Current Qtr. (Mar 2026)	Next Qtr. (Jun 2026)	Current Year (2026)	Next Year (2027)
No. of Analysts	3	3	--	9
Avg. Estimate	6.83	5.09	--	22.06
Low Estimate	4.91	5.06	--	20.46
High Estimate	10.09	5.14	--	24
Year Ago EPS	6.53	5.96	--	21.72
Earnings History

gaap
GAAP
nongaap
Normalized
Currency in DKK	3/31/2025	6/30/2025	9/30/2025	12/31/2025
EPS Est.	6.07	6	4.24	5.9
EPS Actual	6.53	5.96	4.5	6.04
Difference	0.46	-0.04	0.26	0.14
Surprise %	7.51%	-0.74%	6.05%	2.34%
EPS Trend

gaap
GAAP
nongaap
Normalized
Currency in DKK	Current Qtr. (Mar 2026)	Next Qtr. (Jun 2026)	Current Year (2026)	Next Year (2027)
Current Estimate	6.83	5.09	--	22.06
7 Days Ago	6.57	5.09	--	21.88
30 Days Ago	4.94	5.17	--	21.72
60 Days Ago	5.06	5.35	--	24.81
90 Days Ago	0	0	--	24.25
EPS Revisions

gaap
GAAP
nongaap
Normalized
Currency in DKK	Current Qtr. (Mar 2026)	Next Qtr. (Jun 2026)	Current Year (2026)	Next Year (2027)
Up Last 7 Days	2	1	--	2
Up Last 30 Days	1	--	--	2
Down Last 7 Days	--	1	--	--
Down Last 30 Days	--	1	--	2
Growth Estimates
Symbol	Current Qtr.	Next Qtr.	Current Year	Next Year
NVO	4.55%	-14.62%	-5.69%	1.59%
S&P 500	11.60%	18.98%	17.59%	16.49%






Five-year overview
Financial performance Change
DKK million 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2024-25
Net sales 140,800 176,954 232,261 290,403 309,064 6.4%
Sales growth as reported 10.9% 25.7% 31.3% 25.0% 6.4%
Sales growth in constant exchange rates1
 13.8% 16.4% 35.6% 25.7% 10.3%
Operating profit 58,644 74,809 102,574 128,339 127,658 (0.5%)
Operating profit growth as reported 8.3% 27.6% 37.1% 25.1% (0.5%)
Operating profit growth in constant exchange rates1
 12.7% 14.6% 43.7% 26.2% 6.0%
Depreciation, amortisation and impairment losses 6,025 7,362 9,413 19,107 21,982 15.0%
EBITDA1,2 64,669 82,171 111,987 147,446 149,640 1.5%
EBITDA growth as reported1, 2 8.0% 27.1% 36.3% 31.7% 1.5%
EBITDA growth in constant exchange rates1, 2 12.0% 14.9% 42.4% 32.7% 7.3%
Net financials 436 (5,747) 2,100 (1,148) 2,882
Profit before income taxes 59,080 69,062 104,674 127,191 130,540 2.6%
Effective tax rate3
 19.2% 19.6% 20.1% 20.6% 21.5%
Net profit 47,757 55,525 83,683 100,988 102,434 1.4%
Adjusted net profit1 49,146 57,370 86,229 110,557 116,407
Purchase of property, plant and equipment 6,335 12,146 25,806 47,164 60,140 28%
Purchase of intangible assets 1,050 2,607 13,090 4,145 29,973 623%
Cash used for acquisition of businesses 18,283 7,075 — 82,163 —
Free cash flow1 29,319 57,362 68,326 (14,707) 28,295
Total assets 194,508 241,257 314,486 465,630 542,902 17%
Net debt1
(5,031) 2,319 8,950 (69,713) (95,424) 37%
Equity 70,746 83,486 106,561 143,486 194,047 35%
1. See Non-IFRS financial measures. 2. EBITDA is defined as ’net profit’, adjusted for 'income taxes', 'financial items', 'depreciation and amortisation'
and 'impairment losses and reversals'. 3. See Financial definitions and ratios. 4. Total dividend for the year including interim dividend of DKK 3.75
per share, corresponding to DKK 16,663 million, which was paid in August 2025. The remaining DKK 7.95 per share, corresponding to
DKK 35,312 million, will be paid subject to approval at the Annual General Meeting in March 2026. 5. Total number of patients reached by obesity
and diabetes products. 6. GHG: Greenhouse Gas.
Financial ratios Change
DKK million 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2024-25
Gross margin3
 83.2% 83.9% 84.6% 84.7% 81.0%
Sales and distribution costs in percentage of sales 26.3% 26.1% 24.4% 21.4% 20.8%
Research and development costs in percentage of sales 12.6% 13.6% 14.0% 16.6% 16.8%
Cash to earnings1
 61.4% 103.3% 81.6% (14.6%) 27.6%
Operating margin3
 41.7% 42.3% 44.2% 44.2% 41.3%
Net profit margin3
 33.9% 31.4% 36.0% 34.8% 33.1%
Return on invested capital1
 69.0% 73.6% 88.5% 63.9% 39.3%
Share performance and capital allocation
Basic earnings per share/ADR in DKK3 10.40 12.26 18.67 22.67 23.06 1.7%
Diluted earnings per share/ADR in DKK3 10.37 12.22 18.62 22.63 23.03 1.8%
Adjusted diluted earnings per share/ADR in DKK1 10.67 12.62 19.18 24.77 26.17 5.7%
Total number of shares (million), end of year 4,620 4,560 4,510 4,465 4,465 0.0%
Dividend per share in DKK4 5.20 6.20 9.40 11.40 11.70 2.6%
Total dividend (DKK million)4 23,711 27,950 41,987 50,683 51,975 2.5%
Dividend payout ratio3
 49.6% 50.3% 50.2% 50.2% 50.7%
Share repurchases (DKK million) 19,447 24,086 29,924 20,181 1,388 (93%)
Closing share price (DKK) 368 469 698 624 325 (48%)
Sustainability performance
Total number of patients reached (in millions)5 34.9 36.9 41.6 45.2 45.6 1%
Total number of employees (headcount) 48,478 55,185 64,319 77,349 69,505 (10%)
Total GHG6
 emissions – market-based (1,000 tonnes CO2e) — — 1,836 2,261 2,690 19%
Plastic footprint per patient (kg/patient) — — — 0.38 0.36 (5%)
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Introducing Novo Nordisk / Five-year overview 8
Purpose, strategy and culture
PURPOSE
At Novo Nordisk, our purpose remains clear: driving change to defeat serious chronic diseases. Alongside our purpose,
balancing our triple bottom line of financial, social and environmental responsibility remains fundamental to our identity.
CULTURE
The Novo Nordisk Way Essentials
1 We create value by having a patient-centred
business approach.
2 We set ambitious goals and are empowered to
achieve them.
3 We are accountable for our financial, environmental
and social performance.
4 We are curious and innovate for the benefit of
patients and society at large.
5 We build and maintain good relations with
our stakeholders.
6 We value diversity and treat everyone with respect.
7 We focus on performance and personal development.
8 We have a healthy and engaging working environment.
9 We strive for agility and simplicity in everything we do.
10 We never compromise on quality and ethics.
STRATEGY
Our strategy focuses on leading in Obesity, Diabetes
& related comorbidities, through patient centricity,
innovation and affordable access. In Obesity, we
will lead by addressing patients’ diverse needs and
supporting them throughout their care journey.
In Diabetes, we will strengthen leadership with a
cardiorenal focus. In addition, we will continue to
strengthen Rare Disease leadership in rare blood
and rare endocrine disorders.
Significant unmet need persists with almost
1 billion people living with obesity and around
600 million living with diabetes. This represents a
major opportunity and obligation to serve many
more patients.
The updated strategy marks a shift from expansion
into new, dedicated therapy areas as standalone
(CVD, CKD, MASH) towards going deeper into our core
areas, Obesity and Diabetes.
1. Chronic kidney disease. 2. Cardiovascular disease. 3. Metabolic
dysfunction-associated steatohepatitis.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Introducing Novo Nordisk / Purpose, strategy and culture 9
Value creation
We focus on creating lasting value for society and our business with a strong commitment to our triple bottom line.
Following the Novo Nordisk Way, we are dedicated to delivering long-term value for people with serious chronic
diseases, our employees, partners, shareholders and society. Our value chain covers every stage from identifying
new treatments through R&D, manufacturing, supplier partnerships and distribution to the people we serve.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Introducing Novo Nordisk / Value creation 10
The molecule that changed everything:
Inside the discovery
of semaglutide
The breakthrough came through clever chemistry: attaching a fatty acid to semaglutide. This allowed
the drug to bind with albumin, a natural blood protein, creating a protective shield that prevented
breakdown by the kidneys and kept it circulating in the body for longer. What surprised them most was
semaglutide’s superior efficacy. The engineering for once-weekly dosing had also created a more potent
GLP-1 receptor agonist than ever before.
“We set out to create a weekly GLP-1 therapy – that was the task,” Jesper reflects. “But we had also created
something much more potent, with unique properties leading to significantly greater effects on both blood
sugar and appetite regulation.” Today, their molecule has evolved beyond its original injectable form.
Novo Nordisk has successfully developed oral semaglutide – first as Rybelsus® for diabetes, and more
recently as the Wegovy® pill, the first and only FDA-approved oral GLP-1 therapy for weight management.
Semaglutide now represents the vast majority of our revenue. Clinical trials continue confirming its
unforeseen potential in cardiovascular, kidney and liver diseases – research that reinforces Thomas’s
evolving perspective: “I used to be sceptical about treating obesity with medicine, but I’m now convinced
that it’s both meaningful and necessary,” he says. “It lowers the risk of various comorbidities, and it saves
society money in the long run.”
Although their names are on the patent, the pair are quick to credit colleagues across Novo Nordisk
who have also played key roles in bringing their invention to life. “Successful drug development is always
a team effort,” Jesper adds. “It’s fantastic knowing you’ve been part of creating something with such a
profound impact on human health.” The journey so far, born from a reluctant chemist’s leap into the
unknown, has already changed millions of lives – and the story continues.
A chance encounter with peptide chemistry
led a team of Novo Nordisk scientists on a
seven-year journey to create one of modern
medicine’s most transformative treatments. Jesper Lau (left) and Thomas Kruse (right).
Thomas Kruse still remembers the moment he was asked to park his expertise in organic chemistry and
move into peptides. It was spring 2002, and the Danish researcher had spent nearly a decade crafting small
molecules in Novo Nordisk’s laboratories. But his boss, then-Chief Scientific Officer Mads Krogsgaard Thomsen,
had a different vision – one that would ultimately reshape how the world treats obesity and diabetes.
“I sometimes describe myself as one of Mads Krogsgaard’s guinea pigs,” Thomas jokes. The transition to
peptide engineering wasn’t easy, but this reluctant shift would become the foundation for the creation of
semaglutide, a medicine now changing millions of lives worldwide.
By late 2002, Thomas had been joined by Jesper Lau, another chemist who shared the daunting task
of establishing Novo Nordisk’s new protein and peptide engineering department. Together with laboratory
technician Paw Bloch (who is now enjoying his retirement) and a team of “repurposed” small molecule
scientists, they embarked on a seemingly impossible task: creating a once-weekly injectable GLP-1
receptor agonist.
The scientific challenge was formidable. Natural GLP-1 – which stimulates insulin production and regulates
appetite – has a half-life of just minutes; far too short for therapeutic use. The team needed to extend
this dramatically whilst maintaining potency. Years of painstaking work followed. The team synthesised
compound after compound. Semaglutide was compound number 217 – meaning 216 previous attempts
had fallen short.
“The real challenge was solving several difficult technical problems at once,” Jesper explains. “It was about
half-life, optimal potency and physical stability.”
Unlocking the value of semaglutide
Broader adoption of semaglutide can relieve pressure
on health systems by reducing obesity- and diabetesrelated complications, hospitalisations and productivity
losses. According to a detailed UK analysis from 2023,
GLP-1 medicines can reduce hospitalisations and bed
days by almost 10%, potentially saving approximately
GBP 1.68 billion vs glucose‑only care by 2040. With
global healthcare costs related to chronic diseases
projected to surge 56% – from USD 10.2 trillion today
to an estimated USD 15.9 trillion worldwide by 2050 –
scaling access to semaglutide offers a unique path to a
healthier society and more sustainable public finances.
Source: Novo Nordisk. Unlocking the full value of GLP‑1 for
people, health systems and society. 2025. Available at:
www.novonordisk.com/content/dam/nncorp/global/en/media/
pdfs/novonordisk-unlocking-the-power-of-glp-1.pdf.
UK modelling shows expanded
GLP-1 use could deliver...
8%
fewer CV events
7%
fewer hospitalisations
7%
fewer bed days
– than a glucose
management approach
GBP
~1.68
billion
in UK cost savings
by 2040
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Introducing Novo Nordisk / Inside the discovery of semaglutide 11
Strategic
Aspirations
13 Strategic Aspirations 2025
14 Financial performance
20 Commercial execution
26 Innovation and therapeutic focus
32 Sustainability commitment
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 12
Strategic
Aspirations
2025
Strategic Aspirations 2025 Progress in 2025
Financials Deliver solid sales and operating profit growth • Sales growth of 10% (CER)
• Operating profit growth of 6% (CER), impacted by one-off restructuring costs related to a companywide transformation as well as acquisition of three former Catalent sites
• Had Novo Nordisk not incurred such restructuring costs, of around DKK 8 billion, operating profit
would have increased by 13% (CER)
Drive operational efficiencies • Operational leverage reflecting sales growth when adjusting for restructuring costs
Enable attractive capital allocation to shareholders • Free cash flow of DKK 28.3 billion
• DKK 52 billion returned to shareholders
The 2025 Strategic Aspirations were introduced in 2019 and are set to
conclude this year:
• Sales have more than doubled, reaching DKK 309 billion in 2025
with a compound annual growth rate (CAGR) of 17%.
• Operating profit has more than doubled, reaching DKK 128 billion in
2025 with a CAGR of 16%.
• Obesity care sales have increased from DKK 6 billion in 2019 to DKK
82 billion in 2025.
• Rare Disease positioned for sustained growth with late-stage
pipeline of denecimig (Mim8) and etavopivat.
• DKK 306 billion has been returned to shareholders from 2020 to
2025.
• Treatment provided to 46 million people living with obesity and
diabetes, an increase of ~16 million patients since 2019.
Novo Nordisk expects to introduce new Strategic Aspirations as part
of Capital Markets Day on 21 September 2026. Until that time,
reporting and tracking of progress will continue across key
dimensions of the Novo Nordisk business.
Innovation and
therapeutic
focus
Develop superior treatment solutions for Obesity • In-license agreements of a triple agonist and two oral molecules
• Novo Nordisk to advance subcutaneous and oral zenagamtide (amycretin) for weight management
into phase 3
• Semaglutide 2.4 mg approved in the US for the treatment of MASH
• Phase 3 programme with cagrilintide initiated
• Closing of Akero acquisition and its phase 3 FGF21 analogue in MASH
• Semaglutide 7.2 mg submitted in the EU and in the US
• Wegovy® pill for weight management approved in the US and submitted in the EU
• Phase 1a/2b trial initiated with UBT251, a triple agonist
• CagriSema submitted for regulatory approval in the US
Further raise innovation bar for
Diabetes treatment
• Ozempic® approved by EMA for the treatment of peripheral arterial disease in the EU
• Resubmission of Awiqli® in the US for treatment of type 2 diabetes
• Phase 3 trial with coramitug initiated in people living with Amyloid Transthyretin (ATTR)
cardiomyopathy
• IcoSema (Kyinsu®) approved in the EU for the treatment of type 2 diabetes in adults
• Evoke phase 3 trials did not demonstrate a statistically significant reduction in Alzheimer's disease
progression
• Phase 3 trial with CagriSema, REIMAGINE 2 and 3, in diabetes successfully completed
• Phase 2 trial successfully completed with subcutaneous and oral zenagamtide (amycretin)
Strengthen and progress Rare disease pipeline • Alhemo® approved in the US for the treatment of haemophilia A and B without inhibitors
• Sogroya® non-replacement indications submitted in the US and Japan
• Denecimig (Mim8) submitted for regulatory approval in the EU and in the US
• Closing of the acqusition of clinical-stage MASP-3 inhibitor zaltenibart
• Sogroya® approved in China
Commercial
execution
Strengthen Diabetes leadership to more than one-third • Diabetes value market share declined by 3.6 percentage points to 30.1% (MAT)
More than DKK 25 billion in Obesity care sales by 2025 • Obesity care sales increased by 31% (CER) to DKK 82.3 billion
Secure a sustained growth outlook for Rare disease • Rare disease sales increased by 9% (CER) to DKK 19.6 billion
Purpose and
sustainability
Progress towards zero environmental impact • Overall CO2e emissions (scope 1, 2 and full scope 3) increased by 19% compared to 2024
Adding value to society and being recognised as a
sustainable employer
• Medical treatment provided to 42.0 million people living with diabetes and 3.6 million people
living with obesity
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Strategic Aspirations / Strategic Aspirations 2025 13
2025 performance
Financial performance
Sales increased by 6% measured in Danish kroner and by 10% at CER to DKK 309,064 million in 2025. Novo
Nordisk’s 2025 sales and operating profit performance measured at CER were within the ranges provided
in November 2025. The effective tax rate, capital expenditure, free cash flow as well as depreciation,
amortisation and impairment losses were all in line with the guidance.
Geographic sales development
Sales in US Operations increased by 3% measured in Danish kroner and by 8% at CER.
Sales in International Operations increased by 10% measured in Danish kroner and by 14% at CER. Sales in
EUCAN increased by 15% measured in Danish kroner and by 16% at CER. Sales in Emerging Markets increased
by 3% measured in Danish kroner and by 8% at CER. Sales in APAC increased by 19% measured in Danish
kroner and by 25% at CER. Sales in Region China increased by 1% measured in Danish kroner and by 5% at CER.
Sales development across therapeutic areas
Sales of Obesity care products increased by 26% measured in Danish kroner and by 31% at CER. Sales in
Diabetes care remained unchanged in Danish kroner and increased by 4% at CER. Rare disease sales
increased by 5% measured in Danish kroner and by 9% at CER.
In the following sections, unless otherwise noted, market data are based on moving annual total (MAT) from
November 2024 and November 2025 provided by the independent data provider IQVIA. EUCAN covers Europe
and Canada, Emerging Markets covers mainly Latin America, the Middle East and Africa. APAC covers Japan,
Korea, Oceania, and Southeast Asia. Region China covers Mainland China, Hong Kong and Taiwan.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Strategic Aspirations / Financial performance 14
Obesity care
Sales of Obesity care products increased by 26% measured in Danish kroner and by 31% at CER to DKK
82,347 million. Sales growth was driven by both US Operations and International Operations. The volume
growth of the global branded GLP-1 obesity market was 104%. Novo Nordisk is the global market leader with
a branded volume market share of 59.6%. In International Operations, tirzepatide is categorised under GLP-1
diabetes only in IQVIA data, despite having indications for diabetes and obesity in most launched countries.
Diabetes care
Sales in Diabetes care remained unchanged in Danish kroner and increased by 4% at CER to DKK 207,109
million, mainly driven by growth of GLP-1-based products. Novo Nordisk's global diabetes value market
share decreased by 3.6 percentage points over the last 12 months to 30.1%. The market share
development was driven by market share losses in US Operations and International Operations.
GLP-1-based therapies for type 2 diabetes
Sales of GLP-1-based products for type 2 diabetes increased by 2% measured in Danish kroner and by 6%
at CER to DKK 152,202 million. The estimated global GLP-1 share of total diabetes prescriptions increased
to 8.1% compared with 6.7% 12 months ago. It is possible for a patient to have a prescription for more
than one diabetes treatment. Novo Nordisk has a value market share of 45.8%.
• Ozempic® sales increased by 6% measured in Danish kroner and by 10% at CER to DKK 127,089 million.
Sales growth was driven by both US Operations and International Operations. US sales were positively
impacted by gross-to-net sales adjustments.
• Rybelsus® sales decreased by 5% measured in Danish kroner and by 2% at CER to DKK 22,093 million.
Sales growth was driven by International Operations, offset by decreasing sales in US Operations. Sales
in US and International operations are negatively impacted by a reprioritisation of activities towards
other GLP-1 treatments.
• Victoza® sales decreased by 45% measured in Danish kroner and by 43% at CER to DKK 3,020 million.
The decline was driven by the GLP-1 diabetes market moving towards once-weekly treatments and in
line with portfolio priorities in both US Operations and International Operations.
Insulin sales
Sales of insulin decreased by 4% measured in Danish kroner and by 1% at CER to DKK 53,137 million.
Rare disease
Rare disease sales increased by 5% measured in Danish kroner and by 9% at CER to DKK 19,608 million.
Rare endocrine disorders
Sales of rare endocrine disorder products increased by 19% measured in Danish kroner and by 24% at
CER to DKK 5,959 million.
Rare blood disorders
Sales of rare blood disorder products decreased by 2% measured in Danish kroner and increased by 2%
at CER to DKK 11,955 million.
Development in costs and operating profit
The cost of goods sold increased by 32% measured in Danish kroner and by 31% at CER to DKK 58,788
million, resulting in a gross margin of 81.0%, measured in Danish kroner, compared with 84.7% in 2024. The
decline in gross margin is impacted by amortisations and depreciations related to the three former Catalent
manufacturing sites as well as one-off restructuring costs related to the company-wide transformation. In
addition, costs are related to ongoing capacity expansions and negative currency impacts, partially
countered by a positive product mix, driven by increased sales of GLP-1-based treatments.
Sales and distribution costs increased by 4% measured in Danish kroner and by 7% at CER to DKK 64,310
million. The increase in costs is driven by both US Operations and International Operations. In US
Operations, the cost increase is mainly driven by promotional activities related to Wegovy®. In International
Operations, the increase is primarily related to the Wegovy® launches and promotional activities. Sales and
distribution costs amount to 20.8% as a percentage of sales, including impact from one-off restructuring
costs related to the company-wide transformation.
Research and development costs increased by 8% measured in Danish kroner and by 10% at CER to DKK
52,039 million, driven by investments within Obesity care, reflecting increased late-stage clinical trial activity,
increased early research activities, and increased development investments related to the cardiovascular
portfolio. This is partially countered by the impairment loss related to ocedurenone of DKK 5.7 billion and
other impairments of intangible assets in 2024. Research and development costs amounted to 16.8% as a
percentage of sales, including one-off restructuring costs related to the company-wide transformation.
Administration costs increased by 13% measured in
Danish kroner and by 16% at CER to DKK 5,969
million, or 1.9% of sales. Administration costs are
impacted by severance costs related to previously
announced changes in Executive Management and
one-off restructuring costs related to the companywide transformation.
Other operating income and expenses (net) showed a
loss of DKK 300 million compared to a loss of DKK
2,103 million in 2024. Other operating income in 2024
was impacted by impairments related to a partnership
agreement of a company and transaction costs
related to the Catalent transaction.
Operating profit decreased by 1% measured in Danish
kroner and increased by 6% at CER to DKK 127,658
million, mainly impacted by one-off restructuring
costs related to the company-wide transformation
during the third quarter of around DKK 8 billion and
by impacts
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Strategic Aspirations / Financial performance 15
related to the acquisition of the three former Catalent manufacturing sites. This is partially countered by
the impairment loss related to ocedurenone in 2024.
Had Novo Nordisk not incurred such restructuring cost amounting to around DKK 8 billion, operating
profit would have increased by 6% in Danish kroner and 13% at CER.
Financial items (net) and tax
Financial items (net) showed a net gain of DKK 2,882 million, compared with a net loss of DKK 1,148
million in 2024. This primarily reflects gains from hedging the US dollar, which is partly offset by
financing costs related to the funding of the Catalent transaction.
In line with Novo Nordisk’s treasury policy, the most significant foreign exchange risks for Novo Nordisk
have been hedged, primarily through foreign exchange forward contracts. The foreign exchange result
was a net gain of DKK 6,007 million compared with a net loss of DKK 1,023 million in 2024. At the end of
December 2025, a positive market value of financial contracts of DKK 4,339 million had been deferred
for recognition in 2026.
The effective tax rate was 21.5% in 2025, compared with an effective tax rate of 20.6% in 2024.
Net profit increased by 1% to DKK 102,434 million and diluted earnings per share increased
by 2% to DKK 23.03.
2026 outlook
Novo Nordisk will from 2026 present outlook for sales and operating profit using new non-IFRS measures of
adjusted sales growth and adjusted operating profit growth. For further details, please see Company
Announcement No 4 / 2026.
Guidance Full-year expectations 3 February 2026
Adjusted sales growth
at CER -5% to -13%1
as reported in Danish kroner Around 3 percentage points lower than at CER
Adjusted operating profit growth
at CER -5% to -13%1
as reported in Danish kroner Around 5 percentage points lower than at CER
1. On a non-adjusted basis, the mid-point of sales and operating profit growth guidance for 2026, both at CER, would be -1% and 11%, respectively
Key modelling considerations
Financial items (net) Gain of around 2.3 bDKK
Effective tax rate 21% to 23%
Capital expenditure (PP&E) Around 55 bDKK
Free cash flow Between 35 and 45 bDKK
Note: Expectations are as reported in Danish kroner, if not otherwise stated
Note: Free cash flow defined as net cash generated from operating activities, less purchase of property, plant and equipment
Cash flow and capital allocation
Free cash flow in 2025 was DKK 28.3 billion
compared to DKK (14.7) billion in 2024. The
increase in free cash flow compared to last year
is mainly due to the USD 11.7 billion acquisition
of the three former Catalent manufacturing
sites in 2024, partially countered by increased
capital expenditures.
Capital expenditure for property, plant and
equipment was DKK 60.1 billion compared with DKK
47.2 billion in 2024, primarily reflecting investments
in additional capacity for active pharmaceutical
ingredient (API) production and fill-finish capacity
for both current and future injectable and oral
products. Capital expenditure related to intangible
assets was DKK 30.0 billion in 2025 compared with
DKK 4.1 billion in 2024, reflecting business
development activities, mainly related to the
acquisition of Akero Therapeutics, Inc.

1. Expectations for 2026.
Adjusted sales growth is expected to be -5% to -13% at CER, with fluctuations in growth rates expected across
quarters. Given the current exchange rates versus the Danish krone, adjusted sales growth reported in Danish
kroner is expected to be 3 percentage points lower than at CER, primarily due to depreciation of the USD/DKK
exchange rate. The outlook reflects expectations for sales growth within International Operations and
expectations for a sales decline within US Operations. In 2026, the global GLP-1 market expansion is assumed
to continue, enabling Novo Nordisk to increase patient reach and expand volumes. This is countered by lower
realised prices, including the MFN ("Most Favoured Nations") agreement in the US and the loss of exclusivity
for the semaglutide molecule in certain markets in International Operations. Lastly, positive impacts related to
US gross-to-net sales adjustments during 2025 are not anticipated to reoccur.
In International Operations, the outlook is based on current growth trends, including continued volume
penetration from GLP-1 treatments and market expansion, mainly within obesity, as well as intensifying
competition and negative impacts from the compound patent expiry of the semaglutide molecule in certain
markets. Novo Nordisk continues to roll-out Wegovy® in more markets during 2026 and expects to introduce
the 7.2 mg dose in a number of countries. In US Operations, the outlook is based on current prescription
trends for the injectable GLP-1 portfolio, intensifying competition as well as negative impact from reduced
obesity medication coverage in Medicaid. Further, lower realised prices linked to investments in market
access, amplified by the MFN agreement with the US Administration to bring GLP-1s to more Americans at a
lower cost is assumed.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Strategic Aspirations / Financial performance 16
Novo Nordisk further focuses on expanding access to Wegovy®, particularly in the self-pay channel
through NovoCare® Pharmacy and collaborations with telehealth organisations. Uptake related to the
launch of Wegovy® pill in January 2026 is reflected in the outlook, based on a range of assumptions
related hereto such as market penetration, potential negative impact on the growth of the injectable
obesity medication category as well as channel mix.
Adjusted operating profit growth is expected to be -5% to -13% at CER. Adjusted operating profit growth
reported in Danish kroner is expected to be 5 percentage points lower than at CER. The expectation for
adjusted operating profit growth primarily reflects the sales outlook, combined with targeted
investments in current and future growth opportunities within R&D and Commercial, partly funded by reinvestment of savings from the company-wide transformation in 2025 as well as further optimisation
initiatives. Within R&D, investments are related to the continued expansion and progression of the early
and late-stage pipeline mainly within Obesity and Diabetes, and includes impact related to acquisition of
Akero Therapeutics, Inc. Commercial investments are mainly related to the GLP-1 portfolio within Obesity
and Diabetes.
Key modelling considerations
Novo Nordisk expects financial items (net) for 2026 to amount to a gain of around DKK 2.3 billion. This is
driven by gains on hedged currencies, mainly the US dollar, partially countered by increased interest
expenses related to net debt. The effective tax rate for 2026 is expected to be in the range of 21-23%.
Capital expenditure is expected to be around DKK 55 billion in 2026 compared to DKK 60 billion in 2025,
reflecting the expansion of the global supply chain. The investments will create additional capacity and
flexibility across the supply chain, including the manufacturing of active pharmaceutical ingredients (API),
additional aseptic production and finished production processes as well as packaging capacity. In the
coming years, the capital expenditure investments are expected to decline. To better reflect the
underlying cash generation, Novo Nordisk, as of 2026, defines free cash flow as net cash generated from
operating activities, less purchase of property, plant and equipment. The free cash flow is expected to be
DKK 35-45 billion, reflecting the lower sales, primarily within US Operations, and related cash flow
implications amplified by the US gross-to-net system, combined with CAPEX expenditure.
All of the above expectations are based on assumptions that the global or regional macroeconomic and
political environment will not significantly change business conditions for Novo Nordisk during 2026,
including energy and supply chain disruptions, the potential implications from major healthcare reforms
and legislative changes, taxation changes, including changes in tariffs, duties and pricing policies, (incl Most
Favoured Nations in the US), as well as outcome of legal cases, and that the currency exchange rates,
especially the US dollar, will remain at the current level versus the Danish krone. The guidance is also based
on assumptions in relation to the estimation of gross-to-net developments in the US. Finally, the guidance
does not include the financial implications of any new significant business development transactions.
Novo Nordisk has hedged expected net cash flows in a number of invoicing currencies, and, all other
things being equal, movements in key invoicing currencies will impact Novo Nordisk’s operating profit as
outlined in note 4.4 on Financial risks.
Forward-looking statements
Novo Nordisk’s statutory Annual Report 2025, Form 20-F, any quarterly financial reports, and written
information released, shown, or oral statements made, to the public in the future by or on behalf of
Novo Nordisk, may contain certain forward-looking statements relating to the operating, financial
and sustainability performance and results of Novo Nordisk and/or the industry in which it operates.
Forward-looking statements can be identified by the fact that they do not relate to historical or current
facts and include guidance. Words such as ‘believe’, ‘expect’, ‘may’, ‘will’, ‘plan’, ‘strategy’, ‘transition plan’,
‘prospect’, ‘foresee’, ‘estimate’, ‘project’, ‘anticipate’, ‘can’, ‘intend’, ‘target’ and other words and terms
of similar meaning in connection with any discussion of future operating, financial or sustainability
performance identify forward-looking statements. Examples of such forward-looking statements include,
but are not limited to:
• Statements of targets, future guidance, (transition) plans, objectives or goals for future operations,
including those related to operating, financial and sustainability matters, Novo Nordisk’s products,
product research, product development, product introductions and product approvals as well as
cooperation in relation thereto;
• Statements containing projections of or targets for revenues, costs, income (or loss), earnings per
share, capital expenditures, dividends, capital structure, net financials and other financial measures;

• Statements regarding future economic performance, future actions and outcome of contingencies,
such as legal proceedings; and
• Statements regarding the assumptions underlying or relating to such statements.
These statements are based on current plans, estimates, opinions, views and projections. Although Novo
Nordisk believes that the expectation reflected in such forward-looking statements are reasonable, there
can be no assurance that such expectation will prove to be correct. By their very nature, forward-looking
statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, both general and specific, and actual results
may differ materially from those contemplated, expressed or implied by any forward-looking statement.
Factors that may affect future results include, but are not limited to, global as well as local political,
economic and environmental conditions, such as interest rate and currency exchange rate fluctuations
or climate change, delay or failure of projects related to research and/or development, unplanned loss
of patents, interruptions of supplies and production, including as a result of interruptions or delays
affecting supply chains on which Novo Nordisk relies, shortages of supplies, including energy supplies,
product recalls, unexpected contract breaches or terminations, government-mandated or marketdriven price decreases for Novo Nordisk’s products, introduction of competing products, reliance on
information technology including the risk of cybersecurity breaches, Novo Nordisk’s ability to successfully
market current and new products, exposure to product liability and legal proceedings and investigations,
changes in governmental laws and related interpretation thereof, including on reimbursement,
intellectual property protection and regulatory controls on testing, approval, manufacturing and
marketing, and taxation changes, including changes in tariffs and duties, perceived or actual failure to
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Strategic Aspirations / Financial performance 17
adhere to ethical marketing practices, investments in and divestitures of domestic and foreign companies,
unexpected growth in costs and expenses, strikes and other labour market disputes, failure to recruit and
retain the right employees, failure to maintain a culture of compliance, epidemics, pandemics or other
public health crises, effects of domestic or international crises, civil unrest, war or other conflict and
factors related to the foregoing matters and other factors not specifically identified herein.
For an overview of some, but not all, of the risks that could adversely affect Novo Nordisk’s results or the
accuracy of forward-looking statements in the Annual Report 2025, reference is made to the overview of
risk factors in ‘Risk management’ of the Annual Report 2025. None of Novo Nordisk or its subsidiaries or
any such person's officers, or employees accept any responsibility for the future accuracy of the opinions
expressed in the Annual Report 2025, Form 20-F, any quarterly financial reports, and written information
released, shown, or oral statements made, to the public in the future by or on behalf of Novo Nordisk or
the actual occurrence of the forecasted developments.
Unless required by law, Novo Nordisk has no duty and undertakes no obligation to update or revise any
forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise.
Shares and capital structure
Through open and proactive communication, Novo Nordisk aims to provide the basis for fair and
efficient pricing of our shares.
The company’s A shares are not listed and are held by Novo Holdings A/S3
, a Danish public limited liability
company wholly owned by the Novo Nordisk Foundation. According to the Articles of Association of the
Foundation, the A shares cannot be divested.
Special rights attached to A shares include pre-emptive subscription rights in the event of an increase in
the A share capital and pre-emptive purchase rights in the event of a sale of A shares, while B shares take
priority for liquidation proceedings. A shares take priority for dividends below 0.5%, and B shares take
priority for dividends between 0.5 and 5%. However, in practice, A and B shares receive the same amount
of dividend per share.
As of 31 December 2025, Novo Holdings A/S held a B share capital of a nominal value of DKK 17,756,050.
Together with the A shares, Novo Holdings A/S’s total ownership amounted to a nominal value of DKK
125,243,250. Novo Holdings A/S ownership is reflected in the ‘Ownership structure’ chart.
Share capital and ownership
Novo Nordisk’s share capital of DKK 446.5 million is divided
into A and B share capital. The A and B shares are calculated
in units of DKK 0.10, amounting to 4.5 billion shares. The A
share capital, consisting of 1,075 million shares, has a
nominal value of DKK 107,487,200 and the B share capital,
consisting of 3,390 million shares, has a nominal value of
DKK 339,012,800. Each A share of a nominal value of DKK
0.10 carries 100 votes and each B share of a nominal value
of DKK 0.10 carries 10 votes. Novo Nordisk’s B shares are
listed on Nasdaq Copenhagen and on the New York Stock
Exchange (NYSE) as American Depository Receipts (ADRs).
The general meeting has authorised the Board of Directors
to distribute extraordinary dividends, issue new shares in
accordance with the Articles of Association and repurchase
shares in accordance with authorisations granted.
1. Split of shareholders is denoted according to the location of legal deposit-owners. 2. Treasury shares are included; however, voting rights of treasury shares cannot be exercised. 3. Novo Holdings A/S’s registered address is Tuborg Havnevej 19, DK-2900 Hellerup, Denmark.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Strategic Aspirations / Financial performance 18
There is no complete record of all shareholders; however, based on available sources of information,
as of 31 December 2025 it is estimated that shares were geographically distributed as shown in the
‘Geographical split of shareholders’ chart.
As of 31 December 2025, the free float of listed B shares was 94.13% (of which approximately 15.31% are
listed as ADRs), excluding Novo Holdings A/S and Novo Nordisk’s holding of shares. As of 31 December
2025, Novo Holdings A/S and Novo Nordisk’s holding of B shares equaled 198,935,780 shares and had a
nominal value of DKK 19,893,578. For details about the share capital, see note 4.3 to the consolidated
financial statements.
Capital structure
Novo Nordisk’s Board of Directors and Executive Management consider that the current capital and
share structure of Novo Nordisk serves the interests of the shareholders and the company well. Novo
Nordisk’s capital structure strategy offers a balance between long-term shareholder value creation and
competitive shareholder return in the short-term.
In 2025, Novo Nordisk issued Eurobonds totaling EUR 10 billion. The total outstanding Eurobonds as of
the end of 2025 amounted to EUR 16.3 billion. For details on issuance of Eurobonds, refer to note 4.6 in
the Consolidated financial statements.
Dividend policy
The company’s dividend policy, which applies a pharmaceutical industry benchmark to ensure a
competitive payout ratio for dividend payments, may be complemented by share repurchase programmes.
The final dividend for 2024 paid in 2025 after the AGM in March was equal to DKK 7.90 per A and B share of
DKK 0.10, as well as for ADRs. The total dividend for 2024 was DKK 11.40 per A and B share of DKK 0.10,
corresponding to a payout ratio of 50.2%. The 2024 pharma peer group average was 58.9%.
In August 2025, an interim dividend was paid equaling DKK 3.75 per A and B share of DKK 0.10, as well
as for ADRs. For 2025, the Board of Directors will propose a final dividend of DKK 7.95 to be paid in March
2026, equivalent to a total dividend for 2025 of DKK 11.70 and a payout ratio of 50.7%. The company expects
to distribute an interim dividend in August 2026. Further information regarding this interim dividend will be
announced in connection with the financial report for the first six months of 2026. Dividends are paid from
distributable reserves. Novo Nordisk does not pay a dividend on its holding of treasury shares.
Share repurchase programme for 2026
For the next 12 months, Novo Nordisk has decided to implement a new share repurchase programme.
The expected total repurchase cash value of B shares, for the 12 months beginning 2026, is up to DKK 15
billion. The total programme may be reduced in size if significant business development opportunities
arise during 2026. Novo Nordisk expects to conduct the new share repurchase programme according to
the safe harbour rules under the EU Market Abuse Regulation (MAR).
Share price development
Between the end of December 2024 and end of December 2025, Novo Nordisk’s share price
decreased from DKK 624 to DKK 325, a decrease of -48%. The total market value of Novo Nordisk’s B
shares, excluding treasury shares and Novo Holdings A/S shares, was DKK 1,037,935,269,555 as of
30 December 2025.
Share price performance 2025
Novo Nordisk share price and indexed peers4
 (%)
2026 financial calendar
Annual General Meeting 2026 26 Mar 2026
Ex-dividend, B shares 27 Mar 2026
Ex-dividend, ADRs 30 Mar 2026
Record date, B shares and ADRs 30 Mar 2026
Payment, B shares 31 Mar 2026
Payment, ADRs 7 Apr 2026
Financial statement for the first three months of 2026 6 May 2026
Financial statement for the first six months of 2026 5 Aug 2026
Ex-dividend, B shares 14 Aug 2026
Ex-dividend, ADRs 17 Aug 2026
Record date, B shares and ADRs 17 Aug 2026
Payment, B shares 18 Aug 2026
Payment, ADRs 25 Aug 2026
Capital Markets Day 21 Sep 2026
Financial statement for the first nine months of 2026 4 Nov 2026
Financial statement for 2026 and Annual Report 2026 3 Feb 2027
4. OMXC25 and pharmaceutical industry development have been rebased to Novo Nordisk share price in January 2025. 5. AstraZeneca, Bristol-Meyers, Eli Lilly, GlaxoSmithKline, Lundbeck, Merck, Novartis, Pfizer, Roche and Sanofi.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Strategic Aspirations / Financial performance 19
We are not standing still. Our commercial strategy is built for real‑world impact: expanding access,
protecting patient safety and competing where it counts. Guided by our purpose of driving change to
defeat serious chronic diseases, we bring scale, speed and responsibility to the challenge, reaching
45.6 million people living with obesity and diabetes in 2025.
Central to this approach is defending and expanding our leadership in the increasingly competitive market
for GLP-1 therapies, where we hold close to 43% market share of global volumes. Powered by semaglutide,
these game-changing medicines address two of the world’s most pressing health challenges: obesity,
impacting over 1 billion people worldwide, and diabetes, affecting around 600 million. Semaglutide is the
only molecule that demonstrates cardiovascular protection in both diseases. Our portfolio spans injectable
and oral options with FDA‑approved indications to reduce risk of heart attack, stroke or cardiovascular (CV)
death – giving us unmatched therapeutic breadth.
We are acting urgently to strengthen our portfolio through targeted investment in next‑generation
therapies and business development. Our pipeline across obesity, type 2 diabetes and related comorbidities
continues to advance, whilst we enhance optionality by tailoring solutions to individual needs. Building this
market taught us that what works for diabetes does not necessarily work for obesity – people with obesity
have different concerns, different needs and often prefer more discreet ways to access treatment.
Executing this strategy demands market-specific approaches deployed at speed.
“We are acting urgently to strengthen our portfolio through targeted investment
in next‑generation therapies and business development”
The US remains our biggest market and demands our boldest moves. We are transforming our position
through multiple direct-to-consumer pathways by rapidly expanding our NovoCare® direct-to-patient
platform to simplify access and reduce costs, forging new telehealth collaborations and securing retail
pharmacy agreements including CVS to improve continuity of care. From 2026, our new agreement with the
US Administration – once finalised – will lower prices across Medicare Part D and Medicaid programmes whilst
piloting broader obesity coverage – significantly expanding Wegovy® access. We are also pursuing legal action
against unlawful sales and marketing of mass compounded drugs, working with regulators, law enforcement
and healthcare professionals to protect patients, the US drug approval framework and market integrity.
Outside the US, we are turning challenges into opportunities. As semaglutide nears loss of exclusivity
in certain key markets, we are acting decisively, launching second brands in lower‑priced segments,
fast‑tracking differentiated devices and sharpening our channel strategies, while reinforcing quality
and pharmacovigilance as generics enter the market.
We are playing to win. Backed by robust evidence and patient‑centred execution, we are not just competing
in an increasingly challenging landscape – we are reshaping it. Every decision, every initiative and every
innovation is driven by our unwavering commitment to get our life-changing medicines to the people who
need them – faster than ever before.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Strategic Aspirations / Commercial execution 20
 OBESITY& RELATED COMORBIDITIES
Expanding the global reach
and impact of Wegovy®
Obesity is one of the defining health challenges of our time, impacting almost 1 billion people worldwide.
Our goal is to translate scientific leadership into choice, access and evidence – bringing new options to
patients and meeting needs across related comorbidities. In 2025, our obesity portfolio delivered 31%
sales growth at constant exchange rates (CER), reaching 3.6 million people worldwide.
We have recently expanded the Wegovy® brand with two new offerings: higher‑dose Wegovy®
(semaglutide 7.2 mg), which demonstrated 20.7% weight loss in phase 3 studies, and the Wegovy® pill,
offering 16.6% weight loss and the convenience of once-daily oral dosing. The latter is the world’s first
and only oral GLP‑1‑based medicine to be approved for chronic weight management and is now being
produced domestically in the US, with API manufactured at our Clayton, North Carolina site and tablets
made and packed at our Durham, North Carolina site.
Momentum continued across launches and label expansions. By the end of 2025, Wegovy® had almost
doubled its global footprint to reach 52 countries – with further roll‑outs planned in 2026, subject to local
regulatory approvals. In the US, the label was expanded to include treatment of adults with metabolic
dysfunction-associated steatohepatitis (MASH) with moderate to advanced liver fibrosis – an important
milestone given the high overlap between obesity and metabolic liver disease.
“By the end of 2025, Wegovy® had almost doubled its global footprint to
reach 52 countries”
New clinical and real‑world evidence further strengthened the profile of Wegovy® in obesity care.
Real‑world data from STEER show a 57% lower risk of heart attack, stroke or death associated with
Wegovy® compared with tirzepatide. STEER was conducted among adults with overweight or obesity
and established cardiovascular disease, without type 2 diabetes, during periods of continuous treatment
(no treatment gaps longer than 30 days). While observational by design and subject to the usual
limitations of real‑world data, these findings add to growing evidence that Wegovy® delivers proven
cardiovascular protection in addition to meaningful weight loss benefits for appropriate patients.
Beyond clinical endpoints, we are also advancing understanding of how obesity treatments affect
everyday life. INFORM, a survey‑based real‑world evidence study, suggested that people taking
Wegovy® experienced reduced food noise – persistent, intrusive and unwanted thoughts about food
– and improved mental wellbeing. These insights are important for sustained behaviour change and
long‑term outcomes, reinforcing the role of GLP‑1 therapy alongside lifestyle support.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Strategic Aspirations / Commercial execution 21
 OBESITY& RELATED COMORBIDITIES
Breaking down obesity
care barriers in the US
Obesity care in the US is at an inflection point. Demand for GLP‑1 medicines is surging, while access
remains limited by uneven insurance coverage, affordability barriers and administrative hurdles. In
parallel, the spread of unapproved compounded products poses quality and safety risks and can disrupt
continuity of care. We are acting across the system – providing near‑term relief for self‑pay patients,
partnering to broaden coverage and safeguarding patient safety – so more people can access
authorised, FDA‑approved medicines through trusted pathways.
To provide immediate relief for self-paying patients, in November 2025, we introduced an introductory
self‑pay offer of USD 199 per month for the first two doses (0.25 mg and 0.5 mg) of Wegovy® or
Ozempic® for new self‑pay patients through 31 March 2026, and lowered the standard monthly self‑pay
price to USD 349 thereafter. These offers are available across more than 70,000 pharmacies nationwide,
with home delivery through NovoCare® Pharmacy and telehealth partners, and are designed to help
patients afford authentic, FDA‑approved semaglutide medicines and reduce the lure of unapproved,
compounded alternatives.
“We introduced an introductory self‑pay offer of USD 199 per month for the first
two doses (0.25 mg and 0.5 mg) of Wegovy® or Ozempic®”
Patient safety underpins everything we do. With the expiry of all FDA grace periods for shortage‑based
semaglutide compounding in May 2025, it is now illegal under US compounding laws to make or sell
compounded semaglutide drugs, with rare exceptions. Since then, we have stepped up action – pursuing
legal remedies against unlawful marketing and sales, and working with regulators, law enforcement,
healthcare professionals, patient and provider groups and other stakeholders to protect patients and
uphold the integrity of the FDA drug approval framework. We are raising awareness among healthcare
professionals and consumers about the safety and efficacy risks of unapproved compounded products,
while expanding access to FDA‑approved medicines through trusted pathways, including NovoCare®
Pharmacy and telehealth partners.
In addition, we have agreed to a framework with the US Administration to lower semaglutide prices
across Medicare Part D (government insurance for seniors), Medicaid (government insurance for
low-income Americans) and direct‑to‑patient channels from 2026 onwards, and to broaden coverage
through a Medicare pilot programme for Part D beneficiaries with qualifying comorbidities. This
agreement is a significant step toward expanding access to authentic, FDA-approved obesity and
diabetes medicines for millions of people living in the US. We are finalising details and remain
committed to constructive dialogue.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Strategic Aspirations / Commercial execution 22
 DIABETES& RELATED COMORBIDITIES
Additional Ozempic® benefits drive
strengthened diabetes leadership
Simplifying insulin treatment
with once-weekly options
The global burden of diabetes and related complications is
vast. By developing products that meet the complex needs
of people living with diabetes, our innovations create longterm value for health systems and society. In 2025, we
reached 42 million people with our diabetes portfolio,
delivering 4% sales growth at CER.
Against this backdrop, the clinical profile of semaglutide
– our flagship GLP-1 innovation – continued to strengthen.
Regulatory authorities in Europe and the US now recognise
its cardiovascular benefits, with the FDA approving
Rybelsus® (oral semaglutide) to reduce the risk of major
adverse cardiovascular events in adults with type 2 diabetes
at high risk. Rybelsus® is the only oral GLP‑1 therapy shown
to lower blood glucose and body weight with a confirmed
cardiovascular benefit, highlighting the comprehensive
benefits of semaglutide.
Meanwhile, Ozempic® – the injectable form of semaglutide
approved for the treatment of type 2 diabetes – is proving its
worth in new areas. The phase 3b STRIDE study showed that
Ozempic® helped people with peripheral arterial disease
walk further without pain, leading European regulators to
update the medicine's label to reflect these mobility and
quality-of-life improvements. In the US, the FDA approved
Ozempic® – based on results from the FLOW trial – to reduce
the risk of kidney disease progression, kidney failure and
cardiovascular death in adults with type 2 diabetes and
chronic kidney disease (CKD), making Ozempic® the only
medicine in its class with a CKD indication.
For many adults with diabetes, basal insulin is essential yet
burdensome: daily injections, complex titration and busy
schedules can hinder adherence. Awiqli® – the world’s first
and only once‑weekly basal insulin – reduces the treatment
burden, helping both people with diabetes and healthcare
professionals stay focused on achieving and maintaining
individual glycaemic targets. As a once‑weekly option, it
reduces the weekly injection burden from seven to one.
Awiqli® is approved in the EU and 12 other countries,
with launches progressing across markets. In the US, we
resubmitted the Biologics License Application to the FDA
in September 2025, following a 2024 action letter. Further
reviews are underway in other markets and additional
approvals are expected in 2026.
This rollout is underpinned by evidence from ONWARDS
– five phase 3a trials in about 4,000 adults with type 2
diabetes – where change in HbA1c was the primary
endpoint, supporting clinical decision‑making.
Alongside Awiqli®, our once‑weekly portfolio advanced with
the European Commission’s approval of Kyinsu® (IcoSema),
a once‑weekly combination of basal insulin icodec and the
GLP‑1 RA semaglutide. The decision, based on the COMBINE
phase 3a programme where all three trials met primary
endpoints, confirms a well‑tolerated safety profile and
expands options for adults insufficiently controlled on
basal insulin or GLP‑1 RAs.
Nathalia de Souza Santos lives with type 1
diabetes in Brazil.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Strategic Aspirations / Commercial execution 23
 RARE DISEASE PRODUCTION
Expanding therapeutic impact in rare
bleeding and growth disorders
Strategic investments to
expand manufacturing capacity
Novo Nordisk has a rich legacy and an enduring commitment
to people living with rare diseases. Our portfolio is focused
on innovative medicines that combine strong efficacy profiles
with simple administration to ease the treatment burden.
In 2025, our rare disease portfolio delivered 9% sales growth
at CER, with Sogroya® leading in the long‑acting growth
hormone segment across launch markets and Alhemo®
expanding its presence in haemophilia prophylaxis.
Sogroya®, our long-acting growth hormone treatment,
gained significant momentum in 2025 as new international
consensus guidance standardised the approach to paediatric
growth hormone deficiency. This clinical framework –
covering diagnosis, dosing and weekly monitoring
regimens – is helping clinicians deliver more consistent
care and expanding access to treatment. Building on this
foundation, we maintained Sogroya®’s leadership across
its first five launch markets whilst expanding into France,
Argentina and Canada, with further entries planned for 2026.
In rare bleeding disorders, the FDA and EMA approved
expanded use of Alhemo® for people aged 12 or older with
haemophilia A or B without inhibitors, broadening access
and sustaining our momentum in this therapy area while
addressing the remaining unmet needs in haemophilia B.
In February 2025, the FDA declared the shortage of
semaglutide injectables resolved, confirming that supply
meets or exceeds current and projected US demand. To
ensure consistent, sustainable access to authentic,
FDA‑approved medicines, we are continuing to expand US
manufacturing capacity and to strengthen our supply chain.
Patient safety and uninterrupted care remain our top
priorities. Following the FDA’s declaration, we continue to
work closely with regulators and supply partners to ensure
consistent availability and reduce the risk of interruptions
as demand continues to evolve.
We strive to operate our US production facilities around the
clock and have accelerated capital expenditure, including
approximately USD 2 billion in US manufacturing in 2025
and plans to invest a further USD 5.6 billion towards 2028.
These investments will add new lines, increase fill‑finish and
packaging capacity, and significantly expand multiple US
sites to address national supply needs.
This complements ongoing work to scale production across
our global manufacturing network, with major expansions
underway in Denmark, France, Brazil and China. Following
our 2024 acquisition of three fill‑finish sites formerly
operated by Catalent Inc., these facilities are now being
transitioned into our network. Once fully integrated, they
will enhance flexibility and optionality across the supply
chain and complement our significant internal expansions.
Expansion at our Clayton, North Carolina site
in the US.
“Our portfolio is focused
on innovative medicines
that combine strong
efficacy profiles with simple
administration to ease the
treatment burden”
“Patient safety and
uninterrupted care remain
our top priorities”
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Strategic Aspirations / Commercial execution 24
Product overview1 Patent status for products with
marketing authorisation
OBESITY& RARE DISEASE
GLP-1
• Saxenda®, liraglutide 3.0 mg
• Wegovy®, semaglutide 2.4 mg
• Wegovy® pill, semaglutide 25 mg
Obesity delivery systems
• Saxenda®, FlexTouch®
• Wegovy®, Single Dose Device and
FlexTouch®
GLP-1
• Victoza®, liraglutide
• Ozempic®, semaglutide
• Rybelsus®, oral semaglutide
Pre-filled delivery systems
• FlexTouch®, U100, U200, U700
• FlexPen®
• InnoLet®
• Ozempic®, FlexTouch®
Durable delivery systems
• NovoPen® 6
• NovoPen® 5
• NovoPen® 4
• NovoPen Echo® Plus
• NovoPen Echo®
Other delivery systems
• PumpCart®, NovoRapid® and Fiasp®
cartridge to be used in pump
• Penfill® cartridge
Oral antidiabetic agents
• NovoNorm®, repaglinide
Glucagon
• GlucaGen®, glucagon (vial and
Hypokit®)
• Zegalogue®, dasiglucagon
Needles
• NovoFine® Plus
• NovoFine®
• NovoTwist®
• NovoFine® AutoCover®
Rare blood disorders
• NovoSeven®4, eptacog alfa
• NovoEight®5, turoctocog alfa
• Esperoct®, turoctocog alfa pegol, N8-GP
• Alhemo®, concizumab
• Refixia®6, nonacog beta pegol, N9-GP
• NovoThirteen®7, catridecacog
Rare haemato-renal disorders
• Rivfloza™, nedosiran
Rare endocrine disorders
• Norditropin®, somatropin
• Sogroya®, somapacitan
Pre-filled human growth hormone
delivery systems
• FlexPro®
Other delivery systems
• PenMate®, automatic needle inserter
for FlexPro®
Hormone replacement therapies
• Vagifem®8, estradiol hemihydrate
• Activelle®, estradiol/norethisterone acetate
• Eviana®, estradiol/norethisterone acetate
• Kliogest®, estradiol/norethisterone acetate
• Novofem®, estradiol/norethisterone acetate
• Trisequens®, estradiol/norethisterone acetate
• Estrofem®, estradiol
The patent expiry dates for products with marketing authorisation1
 are shown in the tables below. The dates
provided are for expiry in the US, China, Japan and Europe of patents on the active ingredient, unless otherwise
indicated, and include actual and estimated extensions of patent term, when applicable. For several products,
in addition to the active ingredient patent, Novo Nordisk holds other patents on manufacturing processes,
formulations or uses that may be relevant for exclusivity beyond the expiration of the active ingredient patent.
Furthermore, regulatory data protection and/or orphan exclusivity may apply.
DIABETES& Product US China Japan Europe2
Once-weekly insulin
• Awiqli®, insulin icodec
New generation insulin and
combinations
• Tresiba®, insulin degludec
• Ryzodeg®, insulin degludec/insulin
aspart
• Fiasp®, fast-acting insulin aspart
• Xultophy®2, insulin degludec/
liraglutide
Modern insulin
• Levemir®, insulin detemir
• NovoRapid®3, insulin aspart
• NovoMix® 30, biphasic insulin aspart
• NovoMix® 50, biphasic insulin aspart
Human insulin
• Insulatard® isophane (NPH) insulin
• Actrapid®, regular human insulin
• Mixtard® 30, biphasic human insulin
• Mixtard® 50, biphasic human insulin
OBESITY&
Wegovy® injection 2032 2026 2031 2031
Wegovy® pill 2032 2026 2031 2031
Saxenda® Expired Expired Expired Expired
DIABETES&
Ozempic® 2032 2026 2031 2031
Rybelsus® 2032 2026 2031 2031
Tresiba® 2029 Expired 2027 2028
Xultophy® 2029 Expired Expired 2028
Ryzodeg® 2029 Expired Expired 2028
Victoza® Expired Expired Expired Expired
Human insulin and Modern insulins3 Expired Expired Expired Expired
RARE DISEASE
NovoSeven® Expired Expired Expired Expired
Norditropin® Expired Expired Expired Expired
1. Products listed may not be available or approved in all markets. 2. In the US approved under the brand name Xultophy® 100/3.6.
3. In the US approved as NovoLog®. 4. In the US approved as NovoSeven® RT. 5. In the US approved as Novoeight®. 6. In the US approved
under the name of REBINYN®. 7. In the US approved under the name tretten®. 8. In the UK also approved as gina®.
1. This overview excludes products that account for less than 1% of Novo Nordisk’s total sales. 2. Patent status varies from country to country. The
figures in the table are based on Germany. 3. Modern insulins are NovoRapid® (NovoLog®), NovoMix® 30 (NovoLog® Mix 70/30), NovoMix® 50,
NovoMix® 70 and Levemir®.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Strategic Aspirations / Commercial execution 25
Building on Novo Nordisk’s long-standing expertise in obesity and diabetes, our Research & Development
(R&D) organisation is developing multi‑target medicines addressing weight, blood glucose, cardiovascular
risk and other related comorbidities together.
Our innovation engine builds on decades of leadership in incretin biology, exemplified by semaglutide,
and is now advancing dual and triple agonists to deliver stronger, more comprehensive outcomes tailored
to different patient needs.
Key assets include CagriSema, a once-weekly combination therapy in phase 3 trials, and zenagamtide, a
novel unimolecular GLP-1 and amylin receptor agonist in phase 3 development for obesity and diabetes.
These assets target clinically meaningful weight reduction and improved glycaemic control, alongside
favourable effects on blood pressure and other comorbidities. Aligned with our updated corporate strategy,
we prioritise programmes with the greatest potential to improve outcomes in obesity and diabetes.
Our pipeline continues to deliver breakthrough results, with recent approvals for higher‑dose Wegovy®
(semaglutide 7.2 mg) and the Wegovy® pill, reinforcing our focused approach to incretin biology.
Semaglutide 7.2 mg achieved 20.7% mean weight loss if all trial participants adhered to treatment,
among the highest observed in clinical studies to date. Meanwhile, oral semaglutide 25 mg became
the first and only once-daily oral GLP‑1 medicine approved for chronic weight management, delivering
16.6% weight loss if all study participants adhered to treatment – on par with injectable Wegovy®
(semaglutide 2.4 mg).
“Our pipeline continues to deliver breakthrough results, with recent approvals for
higher‑dose Wegovy® (semaglutide 7.2 mg) and the Wegovy® pill”
In parallel, recent phase 2 results in type 2 diabetes with zenagamtide further underscore the clinical
impact of our R&D, with HbA1c reductions enabling up to 89% of participants to achieve target levels
below 7% and with significant weight loss of up to 14.5% after just 36 weeks. The goal is clear: translate
breakthrough science into therapies that work in real‑world care.
To sustain momentum from discovery to delivery, we have created a more seamless, end-to-end engine
with the 2025 reconfiguration of our R&D organisation. This integrated approach, enhanced by AI and
digital technologies, accelerates our pipeline and decision-making, while bringing manufacturability and
supply considerations into drug development earlier to enhance speed and efficiency.
Across R&D, we remain focused on meeting the rising unmet need in obesity and diabetes with therapies
that deliver durable, meaningful improvements in health and quality of life – as quickly and responsibly
as possible.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Strategic Aspirations / Innovation and therapeutic focus 26
 OBESITY& RELATED COMORBIDITIES
Next-generation
obesity treatments
move closer to market
Almost 1 billion people worldwide live with obesity, often alongside type 2 diabetes and other
cardiometabolic conditions. Addressing this complex disease requires a range of treatment options that
can achieve sustained weight loss, are tolerable for long‑term use and can be tailored to diverse individual
needs and preferences. Unlike traditional clinical pathways, obesity care demands approaches that
recognise people’s need for discretion and personalised support – insights that have fundamentally
reshaped our treatment philosophy.
Because appetite, satiety and glucose regulation are governed by peptide hormones – including GLP‑1, GIP,
amylin and glucagon – and their protein receptors, our approach harnesses protein and peptide science
alongside complementary mechanisms, rigorous clinical development and targeted partnerships to create
multiple pathways for personalised care.
CagriSema, a unique fixed‑dose combination of the amylin analogue cagrilintide and semaglutide, brings
together two peptide‑based mechanisms that act on complementary protein receptors, offering patients a
dual‑action approach. CagriSema has now completed two pivotal phase 3a trials with clinically meaningful
results. In REDEFINE 1, CagriSema delivered weight loss of 22.7% vs 2.3% with placebo at 68 weeks if all trial
participants adhered to treatment – with more than 40% of patients achieving weight loss of 25% or more.
The REDEFINE 2 trial in adults with obesity or overweight and type 2 diabetes, showed average weight loss
of 15.7% vs 3.1% with placebo when all participants adhered to treatment. We filed for the first regulatory
approval for CagriSema in the US in December 2025.
“CagriSema delivered weight loss of 22.7% vs 2.3% with placebo at 68 weeks if all
trial participants adhered to treatment – with more than 40% of patients achieving
weight loss of 25% or more”
For patients who may benefit from a different therapeutic approach, cagrilintide is being advanced as a
monotherapy. A sub‑analysis of the phase 3 REDEFINE 1 trial showed that once‑weekly cagrilintide 2.4 mg
produced an average 11.8% body‑weight reduction vs 2.3% with placebo after 68 weeks, if all adhered to
treatment. More than 30% of participants achieved at least 15% weight loss compared with less than 5%
on placebo. Based on these results, cagrilintide has entered the RENEW phase 3 programme.
We are also initiating phase 3 development of zenagamtide (formerly known as amycretin) – a unimolecular,
long‑acting GLP‑1 and amylin receptor agonist – available in both subcutaneous and oral formulations to
address diverse patient preferences. This single‑molecule peptide engages two complementary protein
receptors, leveraging the additive effects of two key biologies. Following end‑of‑phase 2 regulatory
interactions and completed clinical studies, phase 3 for weight management is underway in the first quarter
of 2026. The goal is to provide robust efficacy with flexible delivery options, reflecting our understanding that
obesity care must move beyond traditional physician-focused models to embrace individualised approaches. Robert Williams
lives with obesity
in Brazil.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Strategic Aspirations / Innovation and therapeutic focus 27
 OBESITY& RELATED COMORBIDITIES DIABETES& RELATED COMORBIDITIES
Expanding opportunities through
strategic partnerships
Improving lives through safer and
smarter diabetes solutions
Strategic partnerships and alliances are enhancing the
breadth of our biology and modality portfolio in obesity,
expanding our toolkit of potential treatment options. This
approach allows us to explore novel biological pathways,
exemplified by our exclusive licence for UBT251, a GLP-1/GIP/
glucagon triple receptor agonist that targets yet another
mechanism for tackling obesity’s complex biology.
Beyond injectables, we are also advancing oral treatment
options through targeted collaborations. Our exclusive
Septerna partnership targets GLP-1, GIP and glucagon
receptors across four programmes, whilst we have licensed
LX9851 from Lexicon Pharmaceuticals, a first-in-class oral
ACSL5 inhibitor. Preclinical data demonstrate that when
combined with semaglutide, LX9851 enhanced weight
reduction, limited weight regain and showed positive
steatosis effects after discontinuation – addressing the
critical challenge of weight maintenance.
Our partnership strategy extends to related metabolic
conditions, particularly metabolic dysfunction-associated
steatohepatitis (MASH). Following FDA approval of Wegovy®
for noncirrhotic MASH with moderate to advanced fibrosis, we
acquired Akero Therapeutics and efruxifermin (EFX), a onceweekly FGF21 analogue now in phase 3 development and the
only investigational drug ever to have demonstrated reversal
of fibrosis in patients with cirrhosis due to MASH. This
acquisition supports people across the disease spectrum,
with potential for EFX as a standalone therapy or combined
with Wegovy® to tackle this rapidly growing metabolic burden.
For the nearly 600 million people living with diabetes,
progress is measured in everyday moments: more time‑
in‑range, fewer hypoglycaemic episodes and weight that
stays off. Our pipeline aspires to deliver those outcomes.

CagriSema leads this approach – a once‑weekly fixed‑
dose combination of amylin analogue, cagrilintide and
semaglutide in phase 3 development for type 2 diabetes.
The landmark REIMAGINE 2 trial demonstrated 1.91%‑point
HbA1c reduction and 14.2% weight loss after 68 weeks,
with 43% of participants achieving ≥15% weight loss. These
outcomes demonstrate superiority over semaglutide alone –
validating our innovative dual‑target approach. Zenagamtide
reinforces this strategy, delivering compelling phase 2
results by targeting both GLP-1 and amylin receptors.
Subcutaneous zenagamtide achieved HbA1c reductions of up
to 1.8%, with 89% of participants reaching target levels below
7%. The oral formulation demonstrated improvements of up
to 1.5%, with 78% reaching target. With phase 3 initiation
planned for 2026, we are closer to offering treatment options
that align with patient preferences and everyday routines.
Beyond type 2 diabetes, our commitment to type 1 diabetes
remains unwavering. Following the closure of our in-house
cell therapy unit, an expanded partnership with Aspect
Biosystems seeks to advance cellular medicines that could
restore natural blood sugar control – pursuing the ultimate
ambition of a cure. Separately, we continue exploring
GLP‑1‑based medicines in people at risk of developing
type 1 diabetes to delay disease onset.
Juan Pablo Villaseñor lives with obesity and
cardiovascular disease in Mexico.
Gulshan Lal Suchdev lives with type 2 diabetes in
Spain. Pictured here with his granddaughter Luna.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Strategic Aspirations / Innovation and therapeutic focus 28
 DIABETES& RELATED COMORBIDITIES RARE DISEASE
Tackling diabetes comorbidities
with targeted therapies
Building on rare disease leadership
with next-generation therapies
People living with diabetes face interconnected health
challenges that extend far beyond blood glucose
management. Comorbidities such as cardiovascular disease
and chronic kidney disease frequently accompany type 2
diabetes, sharing the same biological roots of metabolic
dysfunction and chronic inflammation. Our approach
recognises these connections, developing treatments that
address the broader cardiometabolic spectrum affecting
people living with diabetes.
Ziltivekimab, our monoclonal antibody targeting
interleukin-6, represents this integrated strategy in
cardiovascular medicine. By addressing cardiovascular
inflammation – a key driver of complications in people with
diabetes – phase 3 trials are testing whether targeted antiinflammatory therapy can transform care from symptom
management to disease modification. With readouts
expected between 2026 and 2027 across three clinical
settings, ziltivekimab could offer people with diabetes crucial
protection against cardiovascular complications.
Meanwhile, the evoke programme explored whether
semaglutide’s benefits could extend to neurodegeneration,
specifically early Alzheimer’s disease. Building on growing
evidence linking diabetes and cognitive decline, we
evaluated semaglutide in two of the largest early-stage
Alzheimer’s trials ever conducted. While results showed no
meaningful reduction in disease progression vs placebo,
this research advanced scientific understanding within the
field of neurodegeneration.
For people living with rare diseases, each innovation can be
life-changing. Our focus is to reduce the care burden with
therapies that are effective, tolerable and easier to use.
Denecimig (Mim8), a Factor VIIIa mimetic bispecific antibody
now under FDA and EMA review, significantly reduced
treated bleeds with once‑monthly, fortnightly or once-weekly
subcutaneous injections in clinical studies, offering the
potential for both strong efficacy and less frequent dosing.
Etavopivat, an investigational oral therapy for sickle cell
disease, reduced pain crises and improved haemoglobin
in phase 2, pointing to a treatment that could help support
daily management and patient outcomes.
We have also strengthened our portfolio with an asset
purchase and global licence agreement for zaltenibart
from Omeros Corporation. This antibody blocks MASP‑3,
a key switch in the alternative complement pathway – part
of the immune system that can become overactive and
damage healthy cells. By calming that response without
compromising core defences, zaltenibart has best‑in‑class
potential across multiple rare blood and kidney disorders.
Together, these programmes reflect our patient‑centred
approach: advancing life-changing options to change the
course of disease while lowering treatment burden and
improving overall quality of life.
Lazaro Montantes lives with type 2 diabetes
and cardiovascular disease in Mexico.
Emil Grullón lives with haemophilia A in the
Dominican Republic.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Strategic Aspirations / Innovation and therapeutic focus 29
Pipeline overview
We remain committed to bringing innovative therapies to patients. In 2025, two assets entered phase 1, one was acquired in late-stage phase 2 and
one advanced in phase 2, two progressed to phase 3 and two assets initiated submissions for regulatory approval in key markets.
Phase 1
Project Indication Description
Phase
progress*
Amylin 355
NN9638
Obesity Amylin receptor agonist
Amylin 1213
NN9839
Obesity Amylin receptor agonist New
SLC25A5
NN4005
MASH1
siRNA2
GSI3
 Albumin
NN1644
T1D4
Insulin
GYS2 GalXC
NN9733
T2D5
siRNA New
Ventus NLRP3i6
NN6022
CVD7 NLRP3 inhibitor
CNP HF8
NN6537
Heart failure C-type natriuretic peptide
Inno8
NN7441
Haemophilia A
w/wo
inhibitors
FVIIIa9
 mimetic bispecific
antibody fragment
* Compared to 2024 1. MASH: Metabolic dysfunction-associated steatohepatitis. 2. siRNA: Small interfering RNA. 3. GSI: Glucose-sensitive insulin. 4. T1D: Type 1 diabetes. 5. T2D: Type 2 diabetes. 6. NLRP3i: NOD-like receptor protein 3 inhibitor. 7. CVD: Cardiovascular disease. 8. HF: Heart failure.
9. FVIIIa: Activated factor VIII (FVIIIa). 10. CB-1: Cannabinoid receptor-1. 11. GLP-1: Glucagon-like peptide-1. 12. GIP: Gastric inhibitory polypeptide. 13. PKR: Pyruvate kinase-R. 14. PNH: Paroxysmal Nocturnal Haemoglobinuria. 15. CKD: Chronic kidney disease.
16. ASCVD: Atherosclerotic cardiovascular disease. 17. AMI: Acute myocardial infarction. 18. HFpEF: Heart failure with preserved ejection fraction.
Phase 2
Project Indication Description
Phase
progress*
Monlunabant
NN9440
Obesity CB-110 receptor inverse
agonist
Zenagamtide
(amycretin)
NN9487
Obesity Unimolecular GLP-111
and amylin receptor
agonist
Triple
NN9662
Obesity GLP-1/ GIP12/amylin 1 → 2
UBT 251
NN9559
Obesity and T2D A triple agonist New
CDR132L
NN6706
Heart failure Oligonucleotide inhibitor
Zenagamtide
(amycretin)
NN9490
T2D Unimolecular GLP-1 and
amylin receptor agonist
Etavopivat
NN7536
Thalassemia PKR13-activator
NDec
NN7533
Sickle cell
disease
Combination of decitabine
and tetrahydrouridine in
collaboration with
EpiDestiny
Zaltenibart
NN9064
PNH14 Antibody New
Phase 3
Project Indication Description
Phase
progress*
CagriSema
NN9388
Obesity Long-acting amylin
receptor agonist in
combination with a longacting GLP-1 analogue
Cagrilintide
NN9833
Obesity Amylin receptor agonist 2 → 3
Efruxifermin
NN9064
MASH FGF21 agonist
CagriSema
NN9388
T2D Long-acting amylin
receptor agonist in
combination with a longacting GLP-1 analogue
Ziltivekimab
NN6018
CKD15
ASCVD16
AMI17
HFpEF18
Monoclonal antibody
Coramitug
NN6019
CVD Monoclonal antibody 2 → 3
Etavopivat
NN7535
Sickle cell
disease
PKR-activator
Obesity& Diabetes& Rare Disease
Submission and/or approval
Project Indication Description
Phase
progress*
Oral Semaglutide
NN9932
Obesity GLP-1 receptor agonist 3 →
Subm/
Appr.
Semaglutide 7.2 mg
NN9536
Obesity GLP-1 receptor agonist 3 →
Subm/
Appr.
CagriSema
NN9838
Obesity Long-acting amylin
receptor agonist in
combination with a longacting GLP-1 receptor
agonist
3 →
Subm/
Appr.
Semaglutide
NN9931
MASH GLP-1 receptor agonist 3 →
Subm/
Appr.
IcoSema
NN1535
T2D Semaglutide and basal
insulin
Icodec
NN1436
T1D and T2D Basal insulin analogue
Denecimig
(Mim8)
NN7769
Haemophilia A
w/wo
inhibitors
FVIIIa mimetic bispecific
antibody
3 →
Subm/
Appr.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Strategic Aspirations / Innovation and therapeutic focus 30
Research and development progress
OBESITY& DIABETES& RARE DISEASE
Regulatory events
• Wegovy® received accelerated approval by the Food and Drug Administration
(FDA) for the treatment of metabolic dysfunction-associated steatohepatitis
(MASH) and data were submitted to European Medicines Agency (EMA),
Pharmaceuticals and Medical Devices Agency (PMDA) and Centre for Drug
Evaluation (CDE).
• CagriSema new drug application was submitted to the FDA for initial marketing
authorisation for weight management.
• Wegovy® pill, oral semaglutide (25 mg), was approved by the FDA for weight
management and reduction of major adverse cardiovascular events and data were
submitted to the EMA.
• Wegovy® label update was approved by the FDA to reflect reduction in
hospitalisations for heart failure or urgent heart failure visits in people with
overweight or obesity and atherosclerotic cardiovascular disease based on SELECT
data.
• Wegovy®, subcutaneous (sc.) semaglutide 7.2 mg, received a positive opinion by
EMA for weight management and was submitted to the FDA for marketing
authorisation.
Clinical progress
• Phase 3a trial REDEFINE 2, investigating CagriSema (cagrilintide 2.4 mg in
combination with semaglutide 2.4 mg) to evaluate efficacy and safety in people
with overweight/obesity and type 2 diabetes (T2D), was completed.
• Phase 3a trials RENEW 1 and RENEW 2, investigating cagrilintide in people with
obesity, with and without T2D, were initiated.
• Acquisition of Akero Therapeutics, Inc., with lead compound efruxifermin (EFX) in
Phase 3 for the treatment of MASH, was completed.
• Phase 3b trials REDEFINE 8 and REDEFINE 11, investigating CagriSema for longterm weight loss and its full weight-loss potential, were initiated.
• In-licensing of lead asset UBT-251 and an early-stage glucagon for the treatment
of obesity, T2D, and other diseases from The United Bio-Technology (Hengqin) Co.,
Ltd. (United Biotechnology) was completed.
• Phase 2 trial investigating once-weekly GIP–GLP-1 was completed.
• Phase 1b/2 trial investigating Triple in people with obesity was initiated.
• Phase 1 trial investigating SLC25A5 in MASH was initiated.
• Phase 1 trial investigating oral zenagamtide (amycretin) was completed.
Regulatory events
• Kyinsu® (IcoSema) was approved by the EMA for the treatment of T2D in adults
insufficiently controlled by basal insulin or GLP-1 receptor agonists.
• Kyinsu® was submitted to the PMDA and the CDE for initial marketing
authorisation for the treatment of T2D.
• Awiqli® Biologics License Application (BLA) was resubmitted to the FDA for the
treatment of people with T2D.
• Ozempic® label expansion was approved by the FDA to reflect the reduction in
kidney disease related events in people with T2D based on FLOW results.
• Rybelsus® label expansion was approved by the FDA and EMA to reflect the risk
reduction of major cardiovascular events in people with T2D based on SOUL results.
• Ozempic® label expansion was approved by the EMA to reflect the improvements
of functional outcomes in people with T2D and peripheral artery disease (PAD)
based on STRIDE results.
Clinical progress
• Phase 3a trials REIMAGINE 2 and 3, investigating CagriSema in people with T2D,
were completed.
• Phase 3a trial CLEOPATRA, investigating Coramitug in people living with
transthyretin amyloidosis (ATTR) cardiomyopathy, was initiated.
• Phase 3a trials evoke and evoke+, investigating semaglutide in Alzheimer’s
disease, completed interim readouts and the programme was terminated.
• Phase 3b trial REMODEL, a mechanistic study investigating semaglutide in patients
with T2D and chronic kidney disease, was completed.
• Phase 2 trial investigating sc. and oral zenagamtide in people with T2D was
completed.
• Phase 2 trial investigating once-weekly GIP–GLP-1 in people with T2D was
completed.
• Phase 2 trial investigating Coramitug in people living with ATTR cardiomyopathy
was completed.
• Phase 1 trial investigating GalXC GYS2 was initiated.
• Early-stage projects STAT3 (oncology/acromegaly), PD‑L1 (oncology) and XDH
GalXC‑lipid (gout) were terminated.
• Phase 1 trial investigating Ventus NLRP3i was completed.
• Alternative routes were pursued for early-stage projects within stem cell therapy.
Regulatory events
• Denecimig (Mim8) BLA was submitted to the FDA and Marketing authorization
application (MAA) to the EMA for initial marketing authorization for treatment of
haemophilia A in people with and without inhibitors.
• Sogroya® label label extension for the treatment of non-replacement indications
was submitted to FDA, EMA, CDE and PMDA.
• Alhemo® (concizumab) was approved by FDA and EMA for the expanded treatment
of haemophilia A or B in people without inhibitors.
Clinical progress
• Phase 3a trial HIBISCUS 2, investigating etavopivat in people with sickle cell disease
(SCD), was initiated.
• Phase 3a FRONTIER 2 and Frontier3 trials, investigating denecimig in adults/
adolescents and children with haemophilia A, were completed.
• Phase 2 part, of the HIBISCUS phase 2/3 trial, investigating etavopivat in people with
SCD, was completed.
• Phase 2 trial ASCENT1, investigating NDec in people with SCD, was completed.
• Acquisition of MASP‑3 inhibitor zaltenibart from Omeros Corporation for the
treatment of rare blood and kidney disease, of which the phase 2 trial was
completed.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Strategic Aspirations / Innovation and therapeutic focus 31
In 2025, our medicines reached 45.6 million people worldwide – a testament to our expanding therapeutic
footprint. Alongside this broad reach, our diabetes access programmes supported 7.1 million vulnerable
patients; a decline from 2024 levels primarily driven by lower insulin tender sales due to portfolio
consolidation. This underscores the complex balance we must strike between sustainable growth and
ensuring continuity of care for those who need us most – a challenge that has prompted renewed efforts
to restore and strengthen our reach.
Central to this mission is strengthening access where millions lack essential treatments. Prevention and
early access set the course for a healthier life, but as serious chronic diseases rise worldwide, strained
healthcare systems face increasing pressure. Our response combines targeted partnerships with systematic
affordability initiatives. In the US, we provide assistance for people with or without insurance and have
reduced monthly costs for self‑pay patients. In other parts of the world, our Changing Diabetes® in Children
programme supports children under 25 with type 1 diabetes in low- and middle-income countries, while our
Access to Insulin Commitment guarantees low-priced human insulin for the least developed countries and
humanitarian settings.
Recognising that treatment alone will not bend the obesity curve, we go beyond medicine, addressing the
root causes of this chronic disease. By focusing on reaching people where they live, learn and play, our Cities
for Better Health programme – now active in 54 cities worldwide – partners with communities to reduce risk
of obesity and type 2 diabetes through targeted interventions addressing the social determinants of health.
“We go beyond medicine, addressing the root causes of this chronic disease”
Sustaining our growth and impact requires both expanded reach and financial discipline. We simplified
our organisation in 2025 to address complexities that emerged during hyper-growth while reducing costs
to ensure long-term sustainability. To enable faster decisions, sharper execution and improved efficiency,
we made the difficult decision to reduce approximately 9,000 positions globally. From 2026, these changes
will deliver around DKK 8 billion in annualised savings, which we will reinvest in obesity and diabetes
growth opportunities.
Our commitment to sustainable growth extends beyond organisational efficiency to environmental
accountability. Our environmental performance demands urgent action. While scaling production to
serve unprecedented patient demand, our emissions have increased – a trajectory that challenges our
sustainability ambitions. We are working to implement initiatives across emissions, nature and plastics
to reverse this trend through partnerships and systematic transformation.
Building on this foundation of access, prevention and environmental responsibility, we will align our
organisation to deliver health impact at scale whilst confronting environmental challenges with urgency.
We will strengthen partnerships with health systems, expand programmes to reach those who need our
medicines the most and build supply chains that serve people and the planet – ensuring our innovations
deliver lasting value for the communities we serve and the world we share.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Strategic Aspirations / Sustainability commitment 32
 SOCIAL
Strengthening global access
and affordability programmes
Reaching vulnerable people with diabetes involves addressing coverage, affordability and supply
challenges in different ways across different markets. Despite this reach declining in 2025 due to
portfolio consolidation affecting insulin tenders, we strengthened access through practical, locally
tailored solutions that make quality treatment attainable.
In the US, we are expanding practical pathways to treatment across multiple channels. Through
NovoCare® – our patient assistance programme – patients can check coverage, access savings and,
where eligible, receive assistance. In late 2025, we introduced time‑limited introductory pricing for new
self‑pay patients for Wegovy® and Ozempic®, followed by a lower standard monthly self‑pay price for
most doses, helping reduce costs and discouraging the use of illicit compounded products.
“In the US, we are expanding practical pathways to treatment across multiple
channels. Through NovoCare® – our patient assistance programme – patients
can check coverage, access savings and, where eligible, receive assistance”
Our global programmes focus on people facing the greatest barriers to care. Changing Diabetes®
in Children (CDiC) supports children under 25 living with type 1 diabetes in low‑ and middle‑income
countries; since 2009, we have reached almost 82,000 children with life‑saving care delivered through
a holistic model.
In Sub‑Saharan Africa, our iCARE approach – integrating capacity, affordability, reach and empowerment
across 49 countries – strengthens healthcare infrastructure, supports workforce development and
improves product affordability through tiered pricing in collaboration with local partners.
Our Access to Insulin Commitment, established in 2001, continues to guarantee a low price for human
insulin for least‑developed and other low‑income countries, and for organisations providing relief in
humanitarian settings, helping to ensure continuity of care where health systems are under strain.
We are also aligning efforts across the broader Novo Nordisk family to maximise impact, with our
humanitarian focus prioritising product donations while the Novo Nordisk Foundation and World
Diabetes Foundation lean in on complementary elements of care and prevention.
Olivia Aka lives with
type 1 diabetes in
Ivory Coast and is
supported by the
CDiC programme.
Pictured here with
her grandmother.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Strategic Aspirations / Sustainability commitment 33
 SOCIAL ENVIRONMENTAL
Partnering for prevention Scaling responsibly on the road to Net Zero
Preventing serious chronic diseases starts with healthier
environments. We invest in primary prevention to help
children, families and communities reduce risk before illness
takes hold, aligning policy, data and local action to create
lasting change, bringing partners together across sectors
and government levels.
Through Cities for Better Health (CBH), we work with local
authorities, schools and community organisations to make
healthy choices easier in 54 cities worldwide. CBH supports
practical, evidence‑based measures – such as healthier school
meals, daily activity programmes and safer streets and parks
– co‑designed with local communities and replicated across
participating cities.
The CBH Childhood Obesity Prevention Initiative breaks new
ground with a five-year, DKK 250 million investment spanning
six countries across six continents. Using a rigorous trial-like
design developed with partners including Oxford University,
the initiative pilots community-based interventions for children
aged 6-13 – from school-day activity and nutrition programmes
to safe routes for walking and cycling – building robust evidence
for policy change and national scale-up.
Since 2019, we have partnered with UNICEF to advance
childhood obesity prevention, combining policy advocacy,
robust data and implementation support to create healthier
environments for children and adolescents. From 2024 to 2025,
more than 468,000 young people benefited directly via local
programmatic activities.
We remain committed to delivering on our environmental targets
for 2033 and 2045. As with any major transition, meaningful
results do not materialise overnight, requiring sustained effort
to achieve the fundamental changes needed.
Our rapid production scale-up to meet growing demand for
life-saving medicines has driven year-on-year increases in our
environmental metrics – presenting a clear challenge to our
sustainability ambitions. Getting back on track will require
substantial time, effort and investment, but our ambition
remains unwavering. We continue reporting transparently on
both progress and setbacks as we work to reverse this trend.
Supplier collaboration forms one of the cornerstones of our Net
Zero strategy. More than 3,000 suppliers have committed to
renewable electricity sourcing, accounting for 54% of our total
CO2e emissions. In our own production, we began sourcing bioammonia in 2025, with potential to reduce GHG emissions by
around 80% compared to conventional ammonia.
Beyond energy, we are working to reduce the plastic footprint per
patient by changing to reusable devices and therapies requiring less
frequent dosing. We source e-methanol from Europe’s first largescale e-methanol facility in Kassø, Denmark, together with the LEGO
Group and Maersk, allowing us to explore alternative ways to make
lower carbon plastic for our injection pens. Our ReMedTM programme,
meanwhile, facilitates pen returns across seven countries.
Even our raw materials reflect this commitment. We are exploring
regenerative production methods for glucose – a key raw material
in our medicine manufacturing – to improve soil health and
biodiversity while securing supply of the natural resources our
therapies depend upon.
 Environmental targets
 and ambitions1
Climate
• Reduce scope 3 emissions
by 33% by 20332
• Reach Net Zero in 2045
Plastic
• Reduce plastic footprint per
patient by 30% by 2033
Nature
• Halt the loss of nature by 2033
• Become nature positive by 2045
Children in Madrid, Spain, one of the cities
of our Childhood Obesity Prevention
Initiative.
% of GHG emissions from
suppliers who have committed
to sourcing renewable electricity
54%
41% in 2024
1. Find more information on targets and
ambitions, incl. progress, on p. 63–67.
2. vs 2024 baseline, covering ~67% of
scope 3 emissions.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Strategic Aspirations / Sustainability commitment 34
Governance
36 Executive Management
37 Board of Directors
39 Corporate governance
41 Risk management
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 35
Executive Management
Maziar Mike Doustdar1 Karsten Munk Knudsen1 Thilde Hummel Bøgebjerg Ludovic Helfgott Martin Holst Lange Emil Kongshøj Larsen
President and Chief Executive Officer (CEO).
Born in August 1970. Male.
Other positions and management duties
Member of the board of directors of
Orion Corporation.
Executive Vice President. Chief Financial
Officer (CFO). Born in December 1971. Male.
Other positions and management duties
Member of the board of directors of
Hempel A/S. Member of the board of
directors of 3Shape Holding A/S.
Chair of NNE board of directors.
Executive Vice President. Enterprise IT
and Quality. Born in March 1982. Female.
Other positions and management duties
No other management positions.
Executive Vice President. Product &
Portfolio Strategy. Born in July 1974. Male.
Other positions and management duties
President of the Novo Nordisk
Haemophilia & Haemaglobinopathies
Foundation Council.
Executive Vice President. Research &
Development and Chief Scientific Officer
(CSO). Born in October 1970. Male.
Other positions and management duties
Member of the board of directors of
Pharmacosmos A/S.
Executive Vice President. International
Operations. Born in September 1975. Male.
Other positions and management duties
Member of the board of the European
Federation of Pharmaceutical Industries
and Associations (EFPIA).
Kasper Bødker Mejlvang2 David Moore Tania Sabroe Elin Jäger John F. Kuckelman
Executive Vice President. Chemistry,
Manufacturing & Control (CMC) & Product
Supply. Born in August 1977. Male.
Other positions and management duties
No other management positions.
Executive Vice President. US Operations.
Born in January 1974. Male.
Other positions and management duties
Member of the board of directors of
Novasenta Inc.
Executive Vice President. People,
Organisation & Corporate Affairs.
Born in July 1977. Female.
Other positions and management duties
Member of the Danish Life Science
Council.
Senior Vice President. Chief of Staff to
CEO; Corporate Strategy & Sustainability.
Born in September 1986. Female.
Other positions and management duties
Vice chair of the World Diabetes
Foundation.
Senior Vice President. Group General
Counsel, Global Legal, IP and Security.
Born in February 1972. Male.
Other positions and management duties
No other management positions.
1. Maziar Mike Doustdar and Karsten Munk Knudsen are registered as executives with the Danish Business Authority. The other members of Executive Management are not registered as executives with the Danish Business Authority.
2. Kasper Bødker Mejlvang, previously SVP of Region Japan, was promoted to executive vice president of CMC & Product Supply with effect from 1 January 2026.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Governance / Executive Management 36
Board of Directors
Lars Rebien Sørensen
Chair
Cees de Jong
Vice Chair
Elisabeth Dahl Christensen Stephan Engels Liselotte Hyveled
Danish. Born in October 1954. Male. Member
since 2025. Term 2026. Chair of the Board
and Chair of the People & Governance
Committee.
Positions and management duties
Chair of the board of directors of Novo
Nordisk Foundation. Vice chair of the board
of directors of Ferring Pharmaceuticals.
Member of the board of directors of
Jungbunzlauer Suisse AG. Adjunct professor
at the University of Copenhagen’s School of
Life Sciences. Adjunct professor at Center for
Corporate Governance at Copenhagen
Business School.
Competences
Global corporate leadership; healthcare &
pharma industry; business development,
M&A and external innovation sourcing;
medicine & science; human capital
management; environmental, social &
governance (ESG).
Dutch. Born in May 1961. Male. Member since
2025. Term 2026. Vice Chair of the Board and
Chair of the Remuneration Committee and
member of the Audit Committee.
Positions and management duties
Chair of the board of directors of Novonesis
A/S. Chair of the Nomination and
Remuneration Committee of Novonesis A/S.
Member of the Audit Committee of
Novonesis A/S. Chair of the board of directors
of Meatable. Member of the board of Oterra.
Venture Partner, Forbion BioEconomy Fund I.
Competences
Global corporate leadership; finance &
accounting; business development, M&A and
external innovation sourcing; environmental,
social & governance (ESG); human capital
management.
Danish. Born in November 1965. Female.
Member since 2022. Term 2026. Employee
representative. Member of the Remuneration
Committee.
Positions and management duties
Full-time union representative at
Novo Nordisk A/S.
Competences
Not mapped for employee representatives.
German. Born in March 1962. Male. Member
since 2025. Term 2026. Chair of the Audit
Committee and member of the Remuneration
Committee and member of the People &
Governance Committee.
Positions and management duties
Member of the board of directors of SimCorp
A/S. Chair of the Audit and Risk Committee of
SimCorp A/S. Member of the Remuneration
and Nomination Committee of SimCorp A/S.
Competences
Global corporate leadership; finance &
accounting; human capital management;
business development, M&A and external
innovation sourcing.
Danish. Born in January 1966. Female.
Member since 2022. Term 2026. Employee
representative. Member of the Research &
Development Committee.
Positions and management duties
Associate vice president, external innovation,
scientific partnership and integration, Novo
Nordisk A/S. Member of the board of
directors of TriSalus Life Sciences.
Competences
Not mapped for employee representatives.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Governance / Board of Directors 37
Board of Directors (continued)
Mette Bøjer Jensen Britt Meelby Jensen Kasim Kutay Tanja Villumsen
Danish. Born in December 1975. Female.
Member since 2018. Term 2026. Employee
representative. Member of the Audit
Committee. Member of the People &
Governance Committee.
Positions and management duties
Wash & Sterilisation specialist in Product
Supply, Novo Nordisk A/S.
Competences
Not mapped for employee representatives.
Danish. Born in June 1973. Female. Member
since 2025. Term 2026. Member of the
Remuneration Committee and member of
the Research & Development Committee.
Positions and management duties
CEO of Ambu A/S. Vice chair of the board of
directors of Novo Holdings A/S. Member of
the board of directors of Hempel A/S.
Competences
Global corporate leadership; healthcare
& pharma industry; human capital
management; technology, data & digital;
business development, M&A and external
innovation sourcing.
British. Born in May 1965. Male. Member
since 2017. Term 2026. Member of the People
& Governance Committee and the Research &
Development Committee.
Positions and management duties
CEO of Novo Holdings A/S. Member of
the board of directors and member of the
nomination and remuneration committee
of Novonesis A/S.
Competences
Global corporate leadership; healthcare
and pharma industry; finance and
accounting; business development, M&A
and external innovation sourcing; human
capital management.
Danish. Born in June 1980. Member since
2026. Term 2026. Employee representative.
Positions and management duties
Associate Project Director, Clinical Supplies,
CMC & Product Supply. Member of the board
of directors of PFA Pension. Member of the
Audit Committee of PFA Pension. Member of
the board of directors of PFA Holdings. Vice
chair of the board of directors of
Pharmadanmark. Vice chair of the board of
directors of Life Science Danmark ApS.
Member of PAF advisory board to PFA
Pension (pharmacists). Chair of the
Negotiation Committee of Pharmadanmark.
Member of the Strategic Advisory Board of
Nordic Cell Therapy Group ApS.
Competences
Not mapped for employee representatives.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Governance / Board of Directors 38
Board of Directors (continued) Corporate governance
Independence and meeting attendance overview
Governance structure
The shareholders of Novo Nordisk exercise their rights at the general meeting, which is the supreme
governing body of the company. General meetings may be held annually and extraordinarily. While
the Annual General Meeting, inter alia, adopts the company’s Articles of Association, approves the
Annual Report and elects the Board of Directors, an Extraordinary General Meeting serves a specific
purpose. On 14 November 2025, Novo Nordisk held an Extraordinary General Meeting to elect new
members to the Board of Directors. At the Extraordinary General Meeting, seven members of the then
Board of Directors stepped down, whilst four new members were elected to the Board of Directors.
Following the election at the Extraordinary General Meeting, less than half of the shareholder-elected
Board members (two of five) are considered independent. It is the intention of the Board to increase
the number of independent Board members to at least four at the Annual General Meeting in March
2026 at which point more than half of the shareholder-elected Board members will accordingly be
considered independent.
Any shareholder has the right to raise questions at general meetings. Resolutions can generally be
passed by a simple majority. However, resolutions to amend the Articles of Association require twothirds of the votes cast and capital represented, unless other adoption requirements are imposed by
the Danish Companies Act.
Novo Nordisk has a two-tier management structure consisting of the Board of Directors and Executive
Management. The governance structure and rules of Novo Nordisk are further described in our Articles
of Association and our Corporate Governance Report, both available at: www.novonordisk.com/about/
corporate-governance.html.
Foundation ownership
Novo Holdings A/S, a Danish company wholly owned by the Novo Nordisk Foundation, holds the
majority of votes at Novo Nordisk A/S’ general meetings. The combination of foundation ownership
and stock listing enables Novo Nordisk to embark on long-term sustainable strategies while maintaining
short-term transparency on performance. Our foundation ownership supports the overarching
imperative to be both commercially successful and responsive to the wider needs of society.
The Novo Nordisk Foundation has four objectives: to provide a stable basis for the commercial and
research activities of Novo Nordisk, Novonesis and additional companies in Novo Holdings’ investment
portfolio; to support physicological, endocrinological, metabolic and other medical research; to support
research hospital activities within diabetes in Denmark; and to support scientific, humanitarian and
social purposes. Please refer to the section on value creation on page 10. For more information about
the ownership structure of Novo Nordisk, see page 18.
Meeting attendance in 20251
Name Independence2
Board of
Directors
Chair
Committee
Audit
Committee12
People &
Governance
Committee
Remuneration
Committee
R&D
Committee
Helge Lund3
Independent 18/18 6/6 3/3
Henrik Poulsen4, 5, 6, 7 Not independent 18/18 6/6 4/4 4/4
Elisabeth Dahl Christensen8 Not independent 19/19 4/4
Laurence Debroux5, 6, 7 Independent 18/18 4/4 4/4
Andreas Fibig Independent 18/18 8/8
Sylvie Grégoire5
Independent 18/18 4/4 3/3 7/8
Liselotte Hyveled8, 9 Not independent 19/19 8/8
Mette Bøjer Jensen5, 8, 10 Not independent 19/19 5/5
Kasim Kutay4 Not independent 18/19 3/3 6/8
Christina Law5
Independent 18/18 4/4 2/3
Martin Mackay Independent 18/18 4/4 8/8
Thomas Rantzau8 Not independent 19/19 3/3
Lars Rebien Sørensen11 Not independent 1/1 1/1
Cees de Jong10, 11 Independent 1/1 1/1 1/1 1/1
Britt Meelby Jensen4, 11 Not independent 1/1 1/1
Stephan Engels6, 7, 10, 11 Independent 1/1 1/1 1/1
1. Number of meetings attended by each Board member out of the total number of meetings within the member’s term. 2. As of 31 December
2025, 40% of shareholder-elected board members and 22% of all board members, including employee representatives, are considered
independent. 3. Helge Lund was also a member of the Board of Directors for a one-year term from 2014-2015. 4. Member of the board of
directors or executive management of Novo Holdings A/S. 5. Pursuant to the US Securities Exchange Act, Laurence Debroux, Sylvie Grégoire
and Christina Law qualified as independent Audit Committee members, while Mette Bøjer Jensen and Henrik Poulsen relied on an exemption
from the independence requirements. 6. Laurence Debroux, Henrik Poulsen and Stephan Engels possess the qualifications within accounting
and auditing required under part 8 of the Danish Act on Approved Auditors and Audit Firms. 7. Designated as financial experts as defined by
the US Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). 8. Elected by employees of Novo Nordisk. 9. Liselotte Hyveled was also an employee-elected
member of the Board of Directors for one four-year term from 2014-2018. 10. Under the US Securities Exchange Act on Audit Committee
requirements, Stephan Engels and Cees de Jong qualify as independent, while Mette Bøjer Jensen relies on an exemption to the independence
requirements. 11. Was elected to the Board of Directors at the Extraordinary General Meeting on 14 November 2025. 12. Collectively, the
members have relevant industry expertise. 
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Governance / Corporate governance 39
Corporate governance reporting
Novo Nordisk reports in accordance with the Danish Corporate Governance Recommendations, which are
implemented by Nasdaq Copenhagen in the Nordic Main Market Rulebook for Issuer of Shares, as well as the
Corporate Governance Standards of the New York Stock Exchange applicable to foreign private issuers.
Novo Nordisk complies with the Danish Corporate Governance Recommendations because we account for which
recommendations we comply with or deviate from and explain our chosen approach. Find further information about
our corporate governance practices and a statement on our approach to each of the Danish Corporate Governance
Recommendations as well as the Corporate Governance Standards of the New York Stock Exchange in our Corporate
Governance Report, are available at: www.novonordisk.com/about/corporate-governance.html
Remuneration
Executive remuneration is linked to financial performance as well as non-financial performance (e.g., innovation
and sustainability). Both short- and long-term incentive programmes include sustainability metrics, aligning
executive pay with our sustainability objectives. Novo Nordisk has prepared a separate Remuneration Report
describing the remuneration awarded or due during 2025 to the Board of Directors and Executive Management
members registered with the Danish Business Authority. The Remuneration Report is submitted to the Annual
General Meeting for an advisory vote. The Remuneration Policy and the Remuneration Report are available at:
www.novonordisk.com/about/corporate-governance.html
Disclosure regarding change of control provisions
It is disclosed that Novo Nordisk does not have any material contracts that take effect, alter or terminate upon a
change of control of Novo Nordisk following implementation of a takeover bid. In the event of termination – whether
by Novo Nordisk or by the individual – due to a merger, acquisition or takeover of Novo Nordisk, members of
Executive Management registered with the Danish Business Authority are, in addition to the notice period, entitled
to a severance payment of 24 months’ base salary plus pension contribution.
Ethics and compliance
In Novo Nordisk, we have an ethics and compliance programme comprised of a code of conduct (OneCode),
requirements (The Ethics Navigator), processes and awareness and capability building as stipulated in the seven
elements of an effective compliance programme. Data privacy is a key component in our ethical principles,
ensuring guardrails are in place to manage and mitigate risks, thus safeguarding our patients and society at large.
We have also adopted set of principles for data and artificial intelligence (AI) ethics to support ethical decisionmaking. Our global AI Ethics compliance framework sets out principles, requirements and operational guidelines,
while also cataloguing all deployed AI systems across the organisation. The framework standardises risk assessment
processes and strengthens organisational capabilities through AI literacy training. Find more information about these
principles, in accordance with the Danish Financial Statements Act Section 99d, at: www.novonordisk.com/dataprivacy-and-user-rights/data-ethics.html
Sustainability governance
The Board of Directors oversees sustainability, including material impacts, risks and opportunities (IROs),
culture and business conduct. These matters are addressed through dedicated reviews and regular updates
from Executive Management and the Audit Committee. The Board is supported by its committees: the Audit
Committee oversees financial and sustainability reporting, due diligence outcomes and risk management;
the Remuneration Committee integrates sustainability metrics into executive incentives; and the People &
Governance Committee ensures board competencies align with business conduct and sustainability needs.
These responsibilities are formalised in the Committee charters. While Executive Management sets and monitors
the progress of the sustainability targets and strategy, the operational responsibility is anchored in Corporate
Sustainability within the CEO Office. Corporate Sustainability works with business units to integrate environmental
and social considerations into strategy, risk management and the product lifecycle. The Board ensures it has
access to the skills and expertise needed to oversee sustainability matters and address Novo Nordisk’s material
sustainability IROs during the reporting period.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Governance / Corporate governance 40
Risk management
Risk-taking is integral to our business, and we are exposed to both risks that are inherent to the pharmaceutical industry
and specific to our business. 2025 has been an exceptional year, exposing Novo Nordisk to unprecedented geopolitical,
macroeconomic and competitive pressures. Through systematic risk management, we have maintained a risk profile
proportionate to our innovation ambitions and long-term commitments. While we do not compromise on product
quality, business ethics, and safety of our patients and employees, we recognise that there are other risks that cannot be
fully mitigated and must be accepted to enable business successes that make a difference and maximise societal value.
As part of our integrated approach to risk management, we identify, assess and mitigate risks across short and long
horizons. This enables us to address risks to our short- and medium-term plans and risks that could hinder the longterm realisation of our corporate strategy. Executive Management and the Board of Directors review Novo Nordisk’s
enterprise-wide risk profile quarterly, which focuses on the most significant risks based on likelihood and impact,
including potential financial loss or reputational damage. Complementing this, sustainability risks from the double
materiality assessment in the Sustainability statement are also considered.
The key risk themes below outline our broad areas of exposure, followed by key risks and mitigations, which detail
specific risks, potential impacts and mitigation actions.
Key risks themes
Innovation and competition
Novo Nordisk is exposed to portfolio dependency with multiple brands relying on semaglutide as the active
pharmaceutical ingredient. To remain competitive in the long-term and thereby mitigate the innovation risk, we
invest in internal and external pipeline opportunities, as well as effectively attracting talent to continue providing
patients with innovative treatments.
Geopolitical uncertainty
Conflicts, geopolitical tensions and social unrest represent a volatile landscape, leading to risks of trade restrictions.
Most notably, the US administration continues to assess a range of trade actions affecting US imports, including tariffs
and reference pricing measures which may continue targeting pharmaceuticals, with potential spillover effects to
other countries. We navigate this uncertainty by monitoring developments, engaging in policy making and diversifying
our supply chain.
Healthcare reform
Some governments are adopting changes to their pharmaceutical frameworks, increasing system complexity and
regulatory uncertainty. This may increase price pressure and affect profitability. We continuously educate healthcare
providers about the value and benefits of our products and engage with policymakers and stakeholders, to
communicate potential consequences of healthcare reform to the innovative life science environment.
Commercialisation
Complex market dynamics and intensified competition from branded and generic competitors and compounders
lead to risks of price pressure, lowered sales volumes and supply rebalancing. We address this by generating
robust clinical and real world evidence to substantiate product value and negotiating with payers to secure access
and reimbursement. In parallel, a more consumer driven market introduces risks related to direct to consumer
marketing, new capability requirements and brand reputation. We manage these risks by investing in consumer
engagement, telehealth channels and partnerships, building necessary competencies and actively monitoring
consumer trends.
Production capacity and supply chain risks
Demand fluctuations, resource shortages, geopolitical instability, trade disputes and local manufacturing
requirements strain global supply chains. Furthermore, expanding production capacity is complex and associated
with long lead times. We continuously evaluate and manage investments in our production capacity and supply chain
to mitigate this risk.
Access and affordability
Access to affordable care is a global issue as healthcare systems struggle to provide quality care at a sustainable cost,
while the burden of chronic diseases keeps rising. Ensuring access and affordability is a risk and responsibility Novo
Nordisk shares with all stakeholders involved in healthcare. We continue to scale capacity to meet patient demand,
broaden access to medicines and meet our social responsibilities.
Digital disruption
New digital technologies offer opportunities to deliver greater value and improve patient outcomes but also risk
disruption by intensifying competition through accelerated and enhanced drug discovery and development. To
remain competitive, we continuously innovate and integrate these technologies into our processes.
Ethics and compliance
Our commitment to ethics and compliance remains central to our operations. This is essential to navigate a rapidly
evolving regulatory landscape, which may affect product approvals, market access, pricing and product liability. Our
values, encapsulated in the Novo Nordisk Way and our code of conduct, guide every decision we make and enable
us to maintain integrity, adhere to ethics and compliance standards and fulfil our purpose effectively.
Environmental impact
Novo Nordisk’s expansion efforts significantly increase our greenhouse gas emissions. We address this challenge
through our Circular for Zero strategy. This includes an increased focus on our global emissions, encompassing
scope 3 emissions, as well as assessing, monitoring and mitigating environmental risks across the value chain.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Governance / Risk management 41
Risk management (continued)
Key risks and mitigations
Risk area Description Impact Mitigating actions
Research and
clinical pipeline
risks
Findings in clinical activities, regulatory
processes or misjudging of commercial
potential, leading to delays or failure of
products in the pipeline.
• Patients would not have access to innovative treatment options.
• Could adversely impact sales, profits and market position.
• Pre-clinical and clinical activities to demonstrate safety
and efficacy.
• Consultations with regulators to review pre-clinical
and clinical findings and obtain guidance on
development path.
• Rigorous market assessment to validate potential and
inform development decisions.
Product supply,
quality and
safety risks
Higher-than-expected demand or
disruption of product supply due to, e.g.,
geopolitical instability or quality issues,
may compromise product availability,
ultimately impacting patients and
representing a lost commercial
opportunity. In addition, there could be
risks related to safety and product liability.
• Product shortages could have potential implications for patients.
• Could jeopardise reputation and licence to operate if regulatory
compliance is not ensured.
• Compromised patient safety and exposure to product liability legal
proceedings.
• Could diminish trust in Novo Nordisk, impacting our reputation.
• Could have an adverse impact on sales, profits and market position.
• Optimising global production and safety stock to
reduce supply risk.
• Planning and management of supply chain.
• Regular quality audits of internal units and suppliers
to document Good Manufacturing Practice (GMP)
compliance.
• Identification and correction of root causes when issues
are identified. If necessary, products are recalled.
Commercialisation risks
Competitive pressures and market
dynamics (e.g., generics and
compounding), as well as geopolitical,
macroeconomic or healthcare crises,
reduce payer ability and willingness to pay
and ultimately lower prices and volumes.
• Market dynamics could impact price levels and patient access.
• Could adversely impact sales, profits and market position.
• Innovation of novel products, clinical trial data and
real-world evidence demonstrate added value of
new products.
• Payer negotiations to ensure improved patient access.
• Increased and new access and affordability initiatives.
IT security risks
Disruption to IT systems, such as cyberattacks or infrastructure failure, resulting
in business disruption or breach of data
confidentiality.
• Could limit our ability to produce and safeguard product quality.
• Could compromise patients’ or other individuals’ privacy.
• Could limit our ability to maintain operations or limit future
business opportunities if proprietary information is lost.
• Could have an adverse impact on sales, profits and market position.
• Proactive company-wide information security
awareness initiatives.
• Continuity plans for non-availability of IT systems.
• Company-wide internal audit of IT security controls.
• Detection and protection mechanisms in IT systems and
business processes.
Financial
risks
Exchange rate fluctuations (mainly in USD,
CNY and JPY), geopolitical risks (e.g.,
tariffs), disputes with tax authorities and
changes to tax legislation and
interpretation.
• Could lead to tax adjustments, fines and higher-than-expected
tax level.
• Could adversely impact sales and profits.
• Geopolitical developments could lead to an increase in corporate
taxes and duties.
• Hedging for selected currencies.
• Integrated treasury management.
• Applicable taxes paid in jurisdictions where business
activity generates profits and multi-year Advance
Pricing Agreements with tax authorities.
Legal, patents
and compliance
risks
Breach of legislation, industry codes or
company policies. Competitors asserting
patents against Novo Nordisk or
challenging patents critical for protection
of commercial product and pipeline
candidates.
• Potential exposure to investigations, criminal and civil sanctions
and other penalties.
• Could compromise our reputation and the rights and integrity of
individuals involved.
• Could lead to unexpected loss of exclusivity for, or injunctions
against, existing and pipeline products.
• Could have an adverse impact on sales, profits and market position.
• Code of Conduct integrated in our business.
• Compliance Hotline in place.
• Legal review of key activities and internal audit of
compliance with business ethics standards.
• Internal controls to minimise vulnerability to patent
infringement and invalidity actions.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Annual review / Governance / Risk management 42
Sustainability
statement
45 General information
51 Prioritised topics
71 Other material topics
132 Additional Sustainability
statement information
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 43
Sustainability statement contents
Sustainability statement reading guide
Our Sustainability statement is structured into three chapters: ‘General information’, ‘Prioritised topics’
and ‘Other material topics’ plus 'Additional Sustainability statement information' as an appendix.
The majority of ESRS disclosures can be found in these sections with additional ESRS 2 disclosures
addressed in the Annual review, Corporate Governance Report and Remuneration Report through
incorporation by reference (see Table 4 in the Additional Sustainability statement information, p. 134).
Novo Nordisk has updated the Double Materiality Assessment (DMA) in 2025 taking the point of
departure in the ESRS standards across Social, Environment and Governance (see illustration below).
The DMA resulted in four ’Prioritised topics’, which are those that 1) are double-material, 2) have
scored the highest in our DMA and 3) are linked to our Strategic Aspirations (see p. 13). This is where
we focus our sustainability efforts and where we can make the greatest difference for our patients,
employees, the environment and our business. Moreover, we have 'Other material topics', which are
those that are double-material (E3 and G1) or single-material (E4, E2 and S2) related to sustainability
commitments beyond our strategic topics, where we take targeted action to enable a resilient,
responsible and sustainable business. More information on how we work with sustainability in Novo
Nordisk is provided on the following page.
The Sustainability statement has been structured with the ‘Prioritised topics’ presented first followed
by ‘Other material topics’. This sequencing is intended to guide readers to the most decision-relevant
topics quickly and to improve clarity for readers who prioritise strategic sustainability topics.
General information
1.1 Sustainability strategy and highlights 45
1.2 Basis for preparation of the Sustainability statement 47
1.3 Interests and views of stakeholders 48
1.4 Double materiality assessment 49
Prioritised topics
2. Patient protection and quality of life 51
3. Own workforce 57
4. Climate change 63
5. Resource use and circular economy 68
Other material topics
6. Workers in the value chain 71
7. Nature 72
8. Pollution 74
9. Business conduct 75
10. EU Taxonomy 80
Additional Sustainability statement information
Table 1 - Sustainability statement policy overview 132
Table 2 - Other legislation 133
Table 3 - Disclosure requirements in ESRS 134
Table 4 - List of incorporation by reference 134
EU Taxonomy context and tables 135
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 44
1. General information
1.1 Sustainability strategy and highlights
At Novo Nordisk, we focus on creating lasting value for society and our business with a stron
g
commitment to our triple bottom line: our financial, social and environmental responsibility.
Building on the results of our double materiality assessment (DMA), the Sustainability statement
outlines prioritised topics and other material topics to demonstrate this commitment.
We aim to support patients, society and vulnerable populations
1
 by enhancing quality of life.
In 202
5, we reached an all-time high of 45.6 million people with obesity and diabetes care
products. The number of vulnerable patients reached with our diabetes products decreased by
15% compared to 2024, due to reducing insulin tender sales caused by portfolio consolidation. We
remain committed to improve access and affordability via targeted programmes and innovations,
while ensuring patient protection. In the US, we increased our efforts through NovoCare
®, directto-patient offerings and telehealth partnerships. For prevention, we advanced early intervention
for childhood overweight and obesity in urban areas with UNICEF’s programmatic activities
benefitting more than 468,000 children.
We continued our focus on being a sustainable employer in a year where Novo Nordisk launched
a company-wide transformation to simplify the organisation, speed up decision-making, reduce
cost and redirect resources towards obesity and diabetes growth opportunities.
We maintained
a focus on diversity and inclusion and launched a new strategy to leverage employee differences
and foster an engaged workforce. We monitored the gender distribution across leadership levels
and observed that the transformation process had minimal effect. We remain committed to
protecting the health and safety of our employees and maintained a stable performance in
2025. Targeted awareness training and new construction safety standards for expansion
and construction sites were implemented to safeguard employees and further enhance
our performance.
We remain committed to reducing our plastic footprint and our overall environmental footprint,
with targets to reach zero scope 1 and 2 emissions by 2030, and a 33% reduction of scope 3
emissions by 2033. We aim to reach net zero GHG emissions by 2045. In 2025, scope 1, 2 and 3
emissions increased by 19% as expected due to planned expansions and increased energy use
at new and growing production sites. We are continuing the advancement of key decarbonisation
levers to stay on track towards our committed targets. We also made tangible progress by
sourcing more than 10% of our glucose from regenerative agriculture, one of our levers to
help us reduce scope 3 emissions in the future.
1. See definition of vulnerable patients reached with diabetes care products in the accounting policy on p. 56
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / 1. General information 45
Performance on prioritised topics
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / 1. General information 46
1.2 Basis for preparation of the Sustainability statement
General reporting standards and principles
Our Sustainability statement is prepared in accordance with the European Sustainability
Reporting Standards (ESRS) as required by the Danish Financial Statement Act. Information
derived from other EU legislation is listed in the 'Additional Sustainability statement information
section', p. 133, Table 2.
Certain disclosures have been prepared with reference to other sustainability reporting standards,
such as the Taskforce on Climate-related Financial Disclosures (TCFD), Global Reporting Initiative
(GRI) Standards and Sections 99d and 107d of the Danish Financial Statements Act. We also align
with other guidance frameworks such as the Greenhouse Gas (GHG) Protocol, Science Based
Targets initiative (SBTi) and the Science Based Targets Network (SBTN). As an early adopter of the
Taskforce on Nature-related Financial Disclosures (TNFD), we align with the material TNFD core
global disclosure indicators. While quantitative indicators on global spatial footprint, land-use
change and the state of nature are material to our roadmaps, limited data availability currently
prevents disclosure. We are improving data quality to enable future reporting on these indicators.
ISSB IFRS S1 and IFRS S2 have been considered in the preparation of this statement.
In July 2025, the European Commission adopted a Delegated Regulation (EU) 2025/4812 extending
ESRS phase-in provisions for wave 1 undertakings, which we applied. We also apply transitional
provisions for selected value chain information; see the relevant topical sections for further
details. We have not opted to omit any information related to intellectual property, know-how,
innovation outcomes, impending developments, or ongoing negotiations. Table 3 in the
Additional Sustainability statement Information (see p. 134) lists all ESRS requirements with
which we comply. The time horizons applied in preparing the Sustainability statement follow
ESRS guidance: up to one year (short-term), one to five years (medium-term), and more than
five years (long-term). Unless indicated in the action tables, the action is not linked to a target.
We continuously assess and secure the financial and non-financial resources needed to deliver
our sustainability actions and meet targets across sustainability topics. EU Taxonomy disclosures
are prepared in accordance with the EU Taxonomy Regulation and the amended Disclosures
Delegated Act (EU) 2026/73.
Sources of estimation and outcome uncertainty
Metrics for our own operations are mainly based on primary data, while value chain metrics
rely more on estimates and therefore carry greater uncertainty. Assumptions, uncertainties
and estimates are described in the relevant accounting policies. Forward-looking information,
including targets, is inherently uncertain; see the forward-looking statements on p. 17 for details.
Changes in preparation and presentation of sustainability information
Historical data are restated when prior-period errors or changes in accounting policies exceed the
materiality threshold. Restatements mainly reflect methodological improvements or new evidence
that enhances reporting accuracy. In 2025, the following metrics were restated due to improved
calculation methods, correction of prior-period errors, or alignment with the
new segment split used for financial reporting purposes: 1) split of number of employees (headcount)
in geographical areas, 2) gender pay gap, 3) total energy consumption from renewable sources and
its sub categories, 4) base and target year values for our scope 3 target, 5) SVHCs leaving facilities and
6) base and target year values for our plastic target. For more information, see sections 3.1 'Working
conditions', 3.3 'Equal treatment and opportunities for all', 4.1 'Climate mitigation, adaptation and
energy', 5.1 ' Resource inflow, outflow and waste' and 8.1 'Substances of very high concern'. We
continuously work on improving our metrics.
Comparative figures
Comparative figures for 2023 are provided only where metric definitions and scope align with
ESRS requirements. We have replaced the metric “membership fees paid to trade associations,”
first reported last year in section 9 Business conduct, with the data point “Amount disclosed in
the EU Transparency Register” (see section 9.4 Political influence and lobbying activities, p. 77)
to reflect information that is already publicly available.
Risk management and internal controls over sustainability reporting
Sustainability reporting risks and controls are assessed annually. Data owners evaluate risks
related to sustainability data, while a global function maintains the overall risk assessment and
determines the required level of internal controls based on the nature of the risk and severity.
The risk assessment covers risks of incomplete or inconsistent sustainability reporting, including
data accuracy issues and manual errors during consolidation. A centralised online repository is
used to document financial and sustainability risks and controls, applying a risk-based approach
prioritising controls for higher-risk data points. Executive Management is responsible for the
overall internal controls. The Disclosure Committee, established by Executive Management,
reviews sustainability reporting changes in the Company Announcement quarterly. The Audit
Committee oversees financial and sustainability reporting and is informed quarterly of actions
and progress on key sustainability metrics and targets. Novo Nordisk Group Internal Audit
conducts independent audits to evaluate the design and operating effectiveness of risk and
control processes related to reporting.
Statement on sustainability due diligence
The table outlines our sustainability due diligence processes and the location in the statement.
Core elements of environmental and social due diligence Pages
a) Embedding due diligence in governance, strategy and business model 40, 47-49, 134
b) Engaging with affected stakeholders in key steps of due diligence 48, 52, 55, 57, 71, 75-77, 134
c) Identifying and assessing adverse impacts 48-51, 57, 63, 68, 71-72, 74,
75
d) Taking actions to address those adverse impacts 52-56, 58-60, 64-65, 68-69,
71, 73, 74, 77
e) Tracking effectiveness of these efforts and communicating 52-54, 56, 58-61, 64-66,
69-71, 73, 74, 76-78
Updated reporting structure
The reporting structure for 2025 has
changed compared to 2024. Whilst
acknowledging the prescribed
structure in the ESRS (see visualisation
on p. 44), the Sustainability statement
now presents the prioritised topics
first, followed by other material topics
to guide readers to the most material,
decision-relevant topics first.
Basic information and references
within the Sustainability statement
Scope of consolidation and
organisational boundaries
• Scope is the same as the
Consolidated Financial Statements.
• For GHG emissions and pollution
the operational scope is defined
based on financial control.
• NNE is excluded from 'Own
workforce' policies, actions and
targets as it operates under a
different business model and
thereby follows own processes.
Value chain inclusion
• Material IROs across our own
operations and the up- and
downstream value chain are
addressed.
• The inclusion of our value chain
in policies, actions and targets is
determined by our double
materiality assessment.
• A visualisation of our value chain
is provided in the section 'Value
creation' on p. 10.
Incorporation by reference
• See Table 4 in 'Additional
Sustainability statement
information' on p. 134.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / 1. General information 47
1.3 Interests and views of stakeholders
Novo Nordisk strives to understand and reflect the interests of key internal and external
stakeholders in order to create lasting value for society and our business. As a global company,
we depend on numerous stakeholder groups, which we have divided into six categories, to
ensure that we deliver on our Strategic Aspirations with due consideration of our impact. We
ensure that the interests and views of our stakeholders are taken into account through relevant
due diligence processes and regular interactions as part of our business activities.
Stakeholder group Purpose and engagement channels Examples of how outcomes are taken into account
Patient organisations, healthcare
professionals and healthcare
organisations
We take a patient-centred business approach to improve prevention, detection, treatment
and access to quality care for people living with serious chronic diseases. We deliver on
these efforts through for example research collaborations, clinical trials, conferences and
scientific and medical communications.
• Development of new treatments and product improvements,
see section '2.1 Innovation' p. 52
• Protecting the quality and safety of our products and product
communication, see '2.3 Patient protection' on p. 55
Employees We strive to continuously improve the health and safety of our employees, as well as provide
equitable opportunities and competitive working conditions, in order to attract and retain
talent. Interests and views are obtained via our annual employee survey, individual career
development, workers’ councils, Novo Nordisk Way facilitations, the Ombudsman function, etc.
• Foster a culture of safety with attention to increasing employee health
and total wellbeing, including new measures to address symptoms of
stress, see '3.2 Health and safety' p. 59
• Update of our Global strategy on Diversity, Equity, Inclusion and
Belonging to leverage our differences and further drive innovation,
see '3.3. Equal treatment and opportunities for all' p. 60
Suppliers and third-party
representatives
We depend on suppliers and third-party representatives, for example when purchasing
goods and services to manufacture or distribute products and and when partnering on
activities such as filling or assembling final products or performing clinical trials. Our
Responsible Sourcing Programme, supplier audits and established contracting processes
drive our engagement.
• Integration of responsible sourcing principles into contracts with our
business partners, see 'Workers in the value chain' p. 71
• Partnering with suppliers on low-carbon materials and feedstocks, see
actions in section 4 'Climate change' p. 65
Governments, public officials
and regulators
We advance public health issues and ensure early awareness of regulatory developments and
standards by organising and sponsoring events, engaging with industry associations and
driving bilateral dialogues with local, national and international agencies and authorities.
• Advocacy on issues related to therapy areas that can help address
global health challenges, see '9.4 Political influence and lobbying
activities' p. 77
Partners and peers We seek perspectives from partners and peers to advance our commitments, with the aim of
having long-term impacts and improving the resiliency of systems and communities that we
are a part of. We take a multi-level approach to partnerships and collaborate with different
actors such as NGOs, academia and other industry partnerships across our social and
environmental efforts.
• Prevent childhood obesity through UNICEF partnership and reduce
risk of lifetime cardiometabolic diseases through the Childhood
Obesity Prevention Initiative with partners such as cities and academic
institutions, see '2.2 Social responsibility: prevention and access', p. 53.
• Advance our environmental commitments, for example through
partnerships on lower carbon plastics, see 'Resource use and circular
economy' p. 68
Investors We strive to provide timely, accurate and transparent information to our investors through
engagements such as Capital Markets Day, the Annual General Meeting, ESG rating providers
and recurring engagement in response to investor queries.
• Improved sustainability disclosure transparency through investor
feedback.
• Learnings from engagement with ESG rating providers to improve ESG
performance, see latest performance in margin to the right.
The interests and views of stakeholders inform anything from daily business activities to
our review of the corporate and sustainability strategy as set by Executive Management
and the Board of Directors.
Performance of ESG ratings and rankings
Novo Nordisk’s sustainability performance
is recognised by multiple global ESG rating
agencies. Below are the latest 2025
recognitions on our prioritised ESG ratings:
CDP
B (Climate Change) B (Water Security)
On a scale from A-D
MSCI ESG ratings
A
On a scale from AAA-CCC
Corporate Knights Global 100
51
Among 100 most sustainable companies
Access to Medicine Index
12
Out of 20 largest pharma companies
Sustainalytics
Low risk
On a scale from negligible to severe risk
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / 1. General information 48
1.4 Double materiality assessment
Outcomes of the 2025 double materiality assessment
The double materiality assessment (DMA) determines the scope of the Sustainability statement,
ensuring the focus is on the impacts, risks and opportunities (IROs) that are material to Novo Nordisk
and our stakeholders. An overview of the material IROs is shown on p. 50.
Our 2025 DMA resulted in four prioritised topics: patient protection and quality of life (S4),
own workforce (S1), climate change (E1) and resource use and circular economy (E5). These
topics are 1) double-material, 2) have scored the highest in our DMA and 3) are linked to our
Strategic Aspirations. Our core social responsibility is to help improve quality of life and provide
healthcare for people around the world. Our efforts involve ensuring access to life-saving
medicines without compromising safety or quality for patients and vulnerable populations. We
acknowledge that the manufacturing of our medicines generates certain environmental impacts
across our own operations and our upstream supply chain, particularly GHG emissions, energy
use and the use of plastics and other resources. We are working to reduce our material impacts,
including in raw material sourcing, production processes and packaging, while continuing to
identify opportunities to improve circularity and resource efficiency throughout our downstream
distribution and product-use phases.
The DMA resulted in five other material topics that are essential for how we produce our
medicines safely, reliably and with the highest ethical standard: workers in the value chain
(S2), nature incl. water and biodiversity (E3 and E4), pollution (E2) and business conduct (G1).
Our dependencies on an extensive global supply chain, chemical inputs and nature-based
resources reinforce the materiality of these topics and our obligation for transparent disclosure
of our impacts. Strong ethical conduct and governance are fundamental to maintaining trust
with our regulators, partners and society, and sustains our licence to operate.
Only minor refinements have been made since the 2024 Sustainability statement, mainly to
clarify and reclassify certain IROs. As part of this update, the following sub-topics have been
descoped for 2025: substances of concern (E2), severe human-rights-related impacts (S1) and
equal-opportunities-related topics (S2). For the new IROs added in 2025, see the IRO tableoverview, and for non-material topics for 2025 see footnote on p. 50.
Interaction with company strategy and business model
To assess strategic resilience, sustainability is considered as part of our strategy review. Executive
Management and the Board of Directors annually review strategic risks and opportunities within
and beyond a five-year horizon, ensuring our strategy continues to meet society’s needs (see
section 'Risk management' on p. 41 for further details). These resilience discussions draw on
cross-organisational input and focus on sustainability matters that influence our long-term
direction, such as reaching underserved populations and reducing environmental impacts.
Sustainability considerations are embedded in the relevant strategies and discussed on an
ongoing basis with Executive Management.
Processes to identify and assess material impacts, risks and opportunities
In 2025, we updated our double materiality assessment to identify Novo Nordisk’s material
impacts, risks and opportunities across the value chain, in line with ESRS 2 IRO-1. The DMA covers
both impact materiality, i.e. how our activities affect people and the environment, and financial
materiality, i.e. assessing how sustainability-related risks and opportunities influence Novo
Nordisk’s development, performance and position. The process is reviewed annually as part
of disclosure preparations.
The process started with the AR16 sustainability matters list and entity-specific topics were identified
through screening tools, utilising sources such as public reports, regulatory development, as well as
voluntary standards. Stakeholder perspectives informed the assessment. These inputs were drawn
by proxy from internal subject-matter experts who engage with stakeholders as part of their daily
areas of responsibility, complemented by external value-chain insights gathered in 2024.
In 2025, subject- matter expert workshops were used to pressure-test and refine the list of impacts,
risks and opportunities, considering geographic, operational and due-diligence factors as well as
business developments. The process combined bottom-up insights with top-down leadership
calibration and concluded with an Audit Committee review. Control procedures included
documentation of reviews, validation by subject-matter experts and cross-functional governance
to ensure consistency and quality of judgments.
Materiality judgements were based on a structured five-point scoring framework in line with ESRS 1.
Severity, likelihood (of potential impacts) and financial effect were assessed. For human rights
matters, severity outweighs likelihood. Interdependencies across impacts, risks and opportunities
were evaluated jointly with internal experts. Scoring was conducted at the most granular level and
aggregated for reporting.
Impact materiality was assessed using scale (magnitude), scope (reach) and irremediability,
supported by quantitative indicators for environmental matters. Financial materiality aligned with
Novo Nordisk’s Enterprise Risk Management (ERM) approach but applied longer time horizons and
assessed risks on a gross basis. Financial effects were evaluated using qualitative and quantitative
scales across monetary, reputational, ethical and quality dimensions.
Thresholds were applied to determine materiality. For impact materiality, topics rated critical,
significant or important and deemed to be current were considered material. Financial
materiality applied the same approach, but impact materiality intentionally applied lower
thresholds than financial materiality (significant and above), ensuring that a broader range
of impacts on people and the environment were captured. For potential impacts, risks and
opportunities, a heatmap was used to determine materiality. Borderline cases were discussed
with management. We continuously assess how sustainability is considered in our overall risk
profile to strengthen integration.
Prioritised topics
Patient protection
and quality of life
Own workforce
Climate Change
Resource use and
circular economy
Other material topics
Workers in the value chain
Nature
Pollution
Business conduct
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / 1. General information 49
Material impacts, risks and opportunities
The illustration provides an overview of the identified material IROs, categorised into prioritised topics
and other material topics. Each IRO has a number, and the illustration below indicates the IROs’ position
in Novo Nordisk’s value chain, along with the associated time horizon (one year, five years or more than
five years). The illustration also highlights where to find further details about our IROs in the topical
sections of the Sustainability statement
.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / 1. General information 50
Prioritised
topics
Patient protection
and quality of life
Own workforce
Climate Change
Resource use and
circular economy
Ambition
Being respected for adding value
to society
Policy
OneCode policy
Human Rights Commitment
Performance
Patient reach for obesity and diabetes
products remained at a similar level
to 2024
Sub-topics
Patient protection and quality of life is
addressed in three sub-topics:
• Innovation
• Social responsibility
• Patient protection
2. Patient protection and quality of life
IRO name Category Sustainability topic Value chain location
Improving quality of life
• Innovation
• Downstream
Potential new discoveries • Own operations
• Downstream
Health promotion and prevention
• Social
responsibility:
prevention
and access
• Downstream
Health equity in clinical trials and for
vulnerable patients
• Own operations
• Downstream
Potential reputational risks related to
access efforts
• Own operations
Product quality and safety, including
clinical trials
• Patient
protection
• Own operations
• Downstream
Protection of patient safety against
illicit trade of our medicines
• Downstream
Protection of clinical trial and patient
information
• Own operations
• Downstream
Potential regulatory and reputational
risks linked to patient protection and
clinical trial participants
• Own operations
• Downstream
Material impacts, risks and opportunities
As a pharmaceutical company, our end-users not only include the people we serve and our
patients, but also clinical trial participants, healthcare- providers and systems. While the
following chapter primarily refers to patients, the IROs should be understood in the broader
context of all our end-users. To address our patient-related sustainability matters, we have split
the chapter into three connected sections, each addressing specific IROs. We take the point of
departure in how we develop innovative treatments (Innovation) to support long-term health.
Social responsibility: prevention and access covers the initiatives and programmes enabling those
treatments to reach the patients who need them. Patient protection is the guiding principle
throughout our operations, ensuring that safety and quality standards govern every stage
from discovery to delivery.
.
Innovation
Novo Nordisk adds value to society and creates material positive impacts for people through
discovering and developing innovative products to address unmet medical needs. As we
continuously strive to set new standards for innovation through AI-supported R&D and digital
technologies, we strengthen our ability to innovate, discover and create opportunities to
improve the lives of patients.
Social responsibility: prevention and access
Novo Nordisk takes a comprehensive approach to social responsibility, combining prevention
efforts with actions to improve the access to and affordability of our products. Defeating chronic
diseases depends on tackling root causes, which is why we focus on prevention. With a focus on
children and vulnerable populations, our initiatives have the potential to positively impact society
and patients by improving health and wellbeing, and addressing shared risk factors across
cardiometabolic diseases.
We remain committed to creating positive impact by expanding access to our products,
improving affordability as well as supporting vulnerable populations and children with serious
chronic diseases in low- and middle-income countries. Access is also central to our clinical trials,
enabling our clinical programmes to adequately represent the patient population affected by
the diseases we study and treat. We recognise that persistent health inequities pose material
reputational risks, and we continue to collaborate with relevant stakeholders, such as
policymakers and health authorities, to expand access to affordable care.
Patient protection
Safeguarding patient safety and product quality is our highest priority. We strive to mitigate any
negative health impacts associated with clinical trial participation or marketed products. This
includes our continuous fight against illicit trade to protect patients from serious health risks of
counterfeit, diverted or illicitly compounded medicines.
Protecting patients from information-related impacts, such as data privacy and adequate product
information, is central to our business. As we rely on health data in research and increasingly
adopt AI in our operations, we remain committed to safeguarding personal data. We aim to
provide transparent and responsible information on our products and clinical trials to support
optimal treatment choices. Any failure to protect patients would represent both a material
negative impact and a risk to Novo Nordisk’s business and reputation. For this reason, we never
compromise on safeguarding patients from adverse impacts.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Prioritised topics / 2. Patient protection and quality of life 51
2.1 Innovation
Policies and approach
Building on more than a century of scientific knowledge, we are committed to promoting long-term
health by developing treatments across the spectrum of cardiometabolic health as well as within
rare diseases. Our innovation in GLP-1 medicines delivers benefits beyond glycaemic control –
including weight loss and lower risks of cardiovascular events, improving outcomes for the people
we serve and for society. Beyond GLP-1 medicines and across R&D programmes, our goal is to
meet the unmet need in obesity and diabetes with therapies that deliver durable, meaningful
improvements in health and quality of life. These efforts are guided by our OneCode policy, which
reflects our patient-centred commitment and sets requirements for how we act across policies and
procedures. OneCode is continuously monitored and updated to reflect the evolving regulatory
landscape and safeguard our licence to operate.
As a testament to our purpose, we respect the human rights of our patients as outlined in our
Human Rights Commitment (see section 6 'Workers in the value chain', p. 71). In cases where
we cause or contribute to human rights impacts, we commit to providing remedy. For more
information on our Compliance Hotline see section 9.2 on p. 76. Guided by our Patient Voice
Strategy, we take a patient-centric approach, collaborating with patients and their legitimate
representatives throughout the product life cycle, adapting engagement based on development
stage and therapy area. We use various channels, including advisory boards, workshops and
surveys to gather insights from respondents at frequencies based on need. This engagement
process, overseen by two chief patient officers, ensures that insights from patients and care
partners are embedded in decision-making to drive ongoing improvements, enhance disease
understanding, meet real-world needs and deliver better outcomes.
The adoption of AI in our R&D processes aims to accelerate discovery and development of new
treatments, shortening time to market and expanding access to care. Safeguards for data
protection in relation to AI are detailed in section 2.3 'Patient protection' p. 55.
Actions
We invest strategically across our R&D value chain and through business development.
Building on decades of leadership in incretin biology, our R&D pipeline includes key assets such
as CagriSema, a once-weekly combination therapy in phase 3 trials, and continues to deliver
breakthrough results, most recently demonstrated by the FDA approval of the oral semaglutide
25 mg ('the Wegovy® pill'). Opportunities to accelerate innovation within our therapy areas are
further outlined in 'Innovation and therapeutic focus', see p. 26-31.
While we are strengthening our pipeline to improve outcomes for people with obesity, diabetes
and related comorbidities, we are adapting our commercial strategy to better serve patient
needs and expand access (see graph 2.1.1 to the right). Our commercial execution is adapting to
reflect those evolving needs by integrating digital pathways, expanding pharmacy and telehealth
partnerships, while promoting appropriate use to ensure safe, accessible and effective care.
For more details on how we translate our discoveries into real-world outcomes through
commercial delivery, read our chapter on 'Commercial execution' on p. 20-25.
We consider sustainability in our product development process by estimating and informing on
the social and environmental profile of each project throughout the product lifecycle. We aim to
improve how we use sustainability information as part of product development and decisionmaking processes.
Performance
Patients reached is a key performance indicator for tracking progress and impact for our actions.
The number of patients treated with Novo Nordisk’s obesity and diabetes care products is
monitored to estimate our global positive impact of improving quality of life through medicine.
The total number of patients reached in 2025 remained at a similar level to 2024. The number of
patients reached with diabetes care products decreased by 2% due to lower sales of human
insulin products. However, we increased the number of patients reached with diabetes GLP-1
products and new-generation insulin by 10% in 2025 compared to 2024.
The number of patients treated with obesity care products increased significantly by 64%, mainly
driven by Wegovy® expanding reach in existing markets and launched in 35 new markets in 2025.
Patient reach is calculated based on annual usage dose per patient. Therefore, this method does
not count the actual number of individuals on Wegovy®, since treatment duration may be shorter
than a full year.
2.1.1 Patients reached with obesity
and diabetes care products
(Number in millions)
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Prioritised topics / 2. Patient protection and quality of life 52
2.2 Social responsibility: prevention and access
Policies and approach
As part of social responsibility, we invest in evidence-based health promotion and primary
prevention of serious chronic diseases targeting vulnerable populations. We have a specific
focus on the prevention of the shared risk factors across cardiometabolic diseases including
overweight, obesity and type 2 diabetes. While we have no formal prevention policy, these
activities are integrated into our therapy areas’ strategies and local affiliates’ priorities.
Novo Nordisk has publicly available position papers on access to diabetes care and medicine
pricing. We advocate equal rights to healthcare for all1
 and are committed to overcoming barriers
to effective diabetes care in low- and middle-income countries. Our position on medicine pricing
states that prices should reflect products’ value to patients, society and the healthcare system,
including factors such as the medical need met for clinicians and patients, improvement of shortand long-term health outcomes and quality of life. Other factors include the contracting, pricing
and reimbursement system of a given country. We acknowledge global affordability challenges,
including in high-income countries, and collaborate with policymakers and health authorities to
find solutions to ensure affordable access for all patients.
In line with our OneCode policy, we also advance access and representation in clinical research.
Internal procedures ensure that we plan, design and execute trials representative of the diseases
we study to build confidence in the safety and efficacy of our products.
Actions
Our social responsibility programmes and initiatives focus on advancing prevention, access and
affordability for vulnerable populations and children. The impact of our work is measured across
initiatives and performance indicators, with increasing efforts to evaluate the health-economic
impact and social return on investment. Funding for our initiatives is anchored in our Social
Responsibility team, with investments assessed through financial planning. Additional value is
delivered via grants to non-profits organisations in the US through our internal Communities for
Better Health programme as well as to health, sustainability and the life science ecosystem via the
Novo Nordisk Foundation, our majority shareholder, through Novo Holdings A/S.
Health promotion and prevention
We drive action through public-private and multi-sector partnerships at individual, community
and national levels, with a specific focus on urban environments. Together with global and local
partners, including governments, NGOs and academic institutions, we address societal issues such
as nutrition, physical activity, mental health and education through evidence-based interventions,
documenting the shorter- and longer-term health-economic societal impact. As part of our in-house
for-profit work, we are partnering with companies in biotech and digital health to develop
technologies that identify individuals on a disease trajectory using risk predication insights.
1. The position on access to diabetes care is aligned with the UN Universal Declaration of Human Rights
Besides these ongoing actions, we have expanded our Cities for Better Health programme (see
box to the right) and also implemented the following key actions in 2025:
2025 actions
Partnership with UNICEF
• Prevent childhood overweight and obesity by fostering healthy environments through
policy change, advocacy and innovation in food and urban systems.
• Countries with direct programmatic activities: Brazil, Columbia, Mexico and Indonesia.
• From June 2024 - June 2025, more than 468,000 children under the age of 19 benefited
from UNICEF’s local programmatic activities.
Communities for Better Health
• Prevent chronic diseases in vulnerable populations in the US by funding partners across 27
US states and Washington D.C., supporting initiatives that address food-related social
determinants of health.
• From August 2024 - September 2025, we invested over USD 20 millions in 29 projects, and
our partners served up to 280,000 community members.
Access to care
We collaborate with external partners to strengthen supply chains, expand access and build
healthcare capacity. For vulnerable patient populations, we provide low- or no-cost programmes,
alongside donations and contributions to access-related causes (see table 2.2.2 on the next page).
Under our Access to Insulin Commitment, we have a ceiling price of USD 3 per vial in low- and middleincome countries (LMICs) and USD 2 per vial for humanitarian organisations, covering 77 countries
(45 least developed countries2
 and 32 LMICs3
). In rare disease, we partner with the Sickle Cell
Disease community to improve access to continuous, affordable care. In sub-Saharan Africa, we
collaborate with the Consortium on Newborn Screening in Africa (CONSA) and Reach52 to build
capacity and capabilities, improve disease management and patient outcomes.
In the US, we continue to support accessible routes to our medicines by offering rebates and
discounts for insurers and other payers. We are strengthening direct-to-consumer pathways by
expanding NovoCare®, partnering with telehealth providers to broaden access and collaborating
with retail pharmacies such as CVS to ensure continuity of care. In 2025, we reduced prices for selfpay patients and we are currently in discussion with the US Administration to further expand access
to FDA-approved obesity and diabetes medicines for millions of Americans. Information on our
patient-assistance programmes is available at our NovoCare® website. Besides these ongoing
actions, we have also implemented the following key actions in 2025 (see next page):
2. Categorisation of the least developed as defined by the United Nations. 3. Categorisation of low- and middle-income
countries as defined by the World Bank.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Prioritised topics / 2. Patient protection and quality of life 53
2025 actions
Changing Diabetes® in Children
• Provide diabetes care to children and youth with type 1 diabetes living in LMICs. This can
include life-saving medicine, blood glucose monitoring equipment and medical supplies.
• Target: 100,000 children by 2030.
• Metric: 2.2.1
iCARE Integrated Business Model
• Improve access to cardiometabolic care for vulnerable populations by embedding social
responsibility into commercial objectives of affiliates guided by four pillars: capacity,
affordability, reach and empowerment.
• It includes 49 countries in sub-Saharan Africa and Indonesia.
• 2024 Action on Access Innovation Incubator has been integrated into the iCARE model
• In 2025, Indonesia implemented the iCARE model, which is now evolving into a holistic,
cross-therapy approach in existing markets.
• Metric: 2.2.3
Human Insulin Thermal Solutions (HITS)
• Develop new flexible storage options for two human insulin products: Actrapid® and
Insulatard®, to provide access to care for people with diabetes in settings where
refrigeration is a challenge.
• In 2025, the accumulated number of label updates for Actrapid® and Insulatard® reached
more than 40 countries, informing users of the new storage options. The ambition is to
reach more than 50 countries, where the products are launched.
• Metric: 2.2.3
Clinical trials
We implement trial and therapy area specific measures to advance representativeness in clinical
research, including identifying and addressing potential enrolment and retention barriers.
Through the IHI READI public-private partnership, we collaborate with key stakeholders with the
aim of creating an inclusive clinical study ecosystem for underrepresented populations. We are
expanding decentralised clinical trial elements to improve access, for example by enabling
assessments to be conducted at the participants’ preferred locations.

Targets and performance
In 2025, the number of vulnerable patients treated with our diabetes care products decreased
by 15% (see graph 2.2.3 to the right) driven primarily by lower insulin tender sales caused by
portfolio consolidation. Even though the overall number of vulnerable patients reached has
decreased, the number of vulnerable patients reached with diabetes GLP-1 products has
increased in 2025 compared to 2024. Looking ahead, we remain committed to our social
responsibility and to develop solutions that meet diverse needs across geographies and
health systems.
We are aiming to reach 100,000 children with type 1 diabetes by 2030, building on our Changing
Diabetes® in Children (CDiC) programme launched in 2009. The programme spans 30 partner
countries, with the target based on International Diabetes Federation (IDF) estimates of children
with type 1 diabetes in LMICs. Local partners set milestones to improve diabetes care, while Novo
Nordisk tracks progress quarterly through reports received by the local implementing partners.
By the end of 2025, 81,946 children had been reached in total. The addition of 17,203 children
during 2025 was due to new enrolments in primarily China, Morocco, Ethiopia and Pakistan which
ensures we are on track to reaching our target.
 2.2.1 Children reached through the Changing Diabetes® programme
 (Number since 2009)
Novo Nordisk pays out donations and other contributions to a variety of organisations and
foundations, among others the World Diabetes Foundation (WDF) and NNHF. In accordance with
our agreement, the contribution to WDF was DKK 121 million, an increase of 1% compared to
2024. Moreover, total donations paid out to NNHF increased by 12% to support ongoing projects.
2.2.2 Donations and other contributions
mDKK 2025 2024 2023
World Diabetes Foundation (WDF) 121 120 119
Novo Nordisk Haemophilia & Haemoglobinopathies Foundation
(NNHF)1 29 26 19
Total donations and other contributions 150 146 138
1. Previously reported as Novo Nordisk Haemophilia Foundation (NNHF).
2.2.3 Vulnerable patients reached with
diabetes care products
(Number in millions)
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Prioritised topics / 2. Patient protection and quality of life 54
2.3 Patient protection
Policies and approach
Product quality and safety
People depend daily on the quality and safety of our products. Our quality management system
ensures that we work in compliance with Good Practices (GxP) regulations and integrates quality
into all processes. Our global pharmacovigilance system monitors and manages the safety profile
throughout the products’ lifecycle in line with regulatory requirements. These systems manage
the information reported through our publicly available portals including product complaints,
side effects or falsified products. For information on illicit trade, see margin to the right.
Guided by national laws, international conventions4 and our public position on clinical trial ethics,
patient safety is central to our clinical trials and research. A cross-functional safety committee
oversees safety data from the outset of our studies, providing assessments of safety data
throughout the product or device’s lifecycle. Special consideration is given to vulnerable patient
populations, including children and the elderly. If clinical research involves vulnerable patients,
we evaluate whether the study should have an external Data Safety Monitoring Board to ensure
independent safety review of the study.
Information-related impacts
We rely on patients and clinical trial participant health data for clinical research. Data protection
is embedded in our global governance framework, guided by our public data ethics standards,
processing principles and global compliance framework with strengthened safeguards for
patient and clinical trial data. We have also adopted a set of principles data and AI ethics, which
is similarly embedded in our ethics and compliance framework to ensure ethical decision-making
and risk management.
Sharing clinical trial knowledge accelerates scientific progress and advances public health. Outlined
in our disclosure and reporting instructions, we ensure that results from studies sponsored by Novo
Nordisk are disclosed in public registers. Plain Language Summarises (PLS) of phase 3 publications
are developed to improve accessibility of findings by translating complex scientific information into
easy-to understand formats, in line with our standard operating procedures. Following trial
completion, we work with local health authorities to ensure informative and accurate product
labelling to guide patients’ use. Processes for safeguarding labelling quality in the markets in
which Novo Nordisk operates are outlined in standard operating procedures.
We only promote and communicate responsibly about our products for uses that have been
approved by regulatory authorities in a manner that is truthful, accurate, non-misleading,
balanced and consistent with the approved product label. Off-label promotion is prohibited
as outlined in our OneCode policy.
4. Including The Declaration of Helsinki, the International Conference on Harmonisation Guideline for Good Clinical Practice,
Good Pharmacoepidemiology Practices, the Nuremberg Code, the UN Guiding Principles on Business and Human Rights,
the Belmont Report and UNESCO’s Universal Declaration on Bioethics and Human Rights.
Actions
Protecting our patients from adverse impact underpins our licence to operate, with action plans
implemented through organisation-wide programmes and activities.
Product quality and safety
Our Customer Complaints- and Global Safety Department records, investigates and responds to
safety data from clinical trials, side-effect reports and quality complaints concerning the quality,
labelling, durability, reliability, effectiveness, safety, performance or malfunction of our products.
This enables us to take timely and appropriate action and fulfil our reporting obligations to
health authorities. Outcomes are monitored and addressed in our risk management system
and a risk management plan is prepared. Effectiveness of our safety procedures is tracked
through recalls and inspections (see table 2.3.1 on the next page).
To protect the paediatric population in our clinical trials, we design these to minimise disruption
to families’ daily lives. Paediatric plans are developed with guidance from our internal,
multidisciplinary Paediatric Expert Group to ensure the safety and efficacy of our products
for the paediatric populations.
Information-related impacts
We act across the organisation to prevent and mitigate any information-related risks and impacts
for patients and clinical trial participants while adhering to all relevant regulations. Management
of AI-related risks to patients is continuously strengthened through AI Literacy and awareness
building to develop competences across the company. In line with the EU AI Act and corporate
requirements, all AI systems are assessed from an ethical standpoint to phase out unacceptable
use cases. We completed an update of our Patient Information and Informed Consent (PIIC)
forms to enhance general transparency with respect to engaging in our clinical trials and
ensuring protection of our patients data and privacy.
To ensure responsible communication, all promotional product materials undergo legal,
medical and regulatory review. Our internal guidelines are continuously strengthened to
ensure healthcare professionals receive accurate product information and clinical data for
quality patient care.
Besides these ongoing actions, we have also implemented the following key actions in 2025
(see next page):
Illicit trade
• Illicit trade encompasses a range of
criminal activities including:
• Counterfeiting
• Illicit diversion
• Illicit compounding
• These practices pose serious
threats to patient safety, public
health and business integrity.
Policies and approach
• Management of illicit trade is
anchored in our OneCode policy
and covered in our standard
operating procedures and quality
management system.
• Our Prevent, Detect and Respond
strategy outlines how we address
potential adverse impacts of illicit
trade e.g., educating global
communities, driving efforts to
reinforce regulations, maintaining
supply chain integrity, detecting
illegal products via patient/HCP
complaints, field and online
monitoring and responding to cases
by reporting these to authorities
and taking legal action, when
relevant.
• Our positions on falsified medicines
and illicit compounding of
semaglutide provides further
details on our principles.
Actions
• We have increased detection and
takedowns of fraudulent online
offers by expanding the scope of
our proactive monitoring to address
illicit trade risks. As a member of
the Pharmaceutical Security
Institute, Novo Nordisk also
contributes to joint industry action.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Prioritised topics / 2. Patient protection and quality of life 55
2025 actions
Capability building for combatting illicit trade • We delivered targeted awareness sessions in most affected markets, training more than
1,500 law enforcement and customs officials.
• Internally, over 2,000 employees responsible for incidents response were trained to report
to authorities and ensure proactive engagement with regulators
.
• As a measure of effectiveness, an increase in law enforcement vigilance and information
sharing was observed.
Patient data protection and AI • Enhance data ethics risk management across our processes, supplier interactions and use
of AI technologies. The scope is global for relevant suppliers, systems and processes.
• New AI clauses in contract templates were implemented, and the Data Protection Impact
Assessment was refined across projects to 1) identify patient data protection risks and 2)
implement actionable measures to mitigate these
.
Patient-centric lay language documents • Obtain and implement patient insights on our communication in lay language to enhance
the comprehension and accessibility of clinical trial information.
• Lay language documents in clinical reporting were in scope for feedback from the
established Innovation Patient Advisory Board. Based on the insights, relevant template
updates will be rolled out in 2026.
e
-labelling
• Develop e-labelling to provide an additional channel for accessing labelling information
and allowing for faster access to labelling updates (e.g., safety information updates) for
end-users. e-labelling is applied in mandated or accepted markets.
• In 2025, a global process for e-labelling was implemented.
Performance
To manage product safety and quality risks, Novo Nordisk tracks product recalls. In 2025, four
product recalls occurred; cracked cartridges of Ozempic
® in Canada, out-of-specification (OOS)
dissolution results for Vagifem
® 10 micrograms in Canada and the Netherlands, errors in shipping
documents sent to clinical trials in Italy and Greece, and the risk of biological particulate matter in
Semaglutide (Wegovy
®) filling batches in the US. None of the recalls occurred at patient level or led
to any health consequences.
We monitor inspections to ensure regulatory compliance. In 2025, 171 inspections were conducted,
of which 130 inspections were passed, 40 were in-progress, as final inspection reports had not
yet been received, or the final authority’s acceptance was pending. Follow-up on in-progress
inspections will continue in 2026. In 2025, a US FDA inspection at the Bloomington site, recently
acquired from Catalent, received an 'Official Action Indicated' (OAI) status and subsequent warning
letter. We are working closely with US FDA to resolve the issues raised in this inspection and
warning letter.
2.3.1 Product recalls and failed inspections
Number 2025 2024 2023
Product recalls
4
3
2
Failed inspections
1
0
0
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Patients reached with Novo Nordisk’s obesity and diabetes care products
Estimated by dividing Novo Nordisk’s net sales, samples and donations volume by the annual
usage dose per patient for each product class, as defined by the WHO (for diabetes) or in
accordance with the dose strength of the product (for obesity). Devices are excluded.
Vulnerable patients reached with Novo Nordisk’s diabetes care products
Vulnerable patients are estimated by using two methods: firstly, reach of one vulnerable patient
is defined as sales volumes in low-, lower middle- or upper middle- income countries (LMICs)
corresponding to an annual drug usage dose per patient as defined by WHO through public tender
sales, products sold under affordability thresholds (based on World Bank data and local healthcare
expenditures), humanitarian donations and for vulnerable patients reached in the US through products
supplied in select programmes. Secondly, for US access and affordability programmes, reaching one
vulnerable patient is defined at the time of enrolment based on patient programme reports. Due to
different methodologies applied, vulnerable patients reached with diabetes care products are not fully
to be considered a portion of overall patients reached.
Children reached through the Changing Diabetes
® in Children programme are estimated as the total
accumulated number of children and youth enrolled since the initiation of the partnership in 2009.
Children participating for multiple years are only included once in the year of enrolment. Children
and youth are defined as 0-25 years old and living in poverty as defined by the World Bank.
Donations and other contributions
The monetary donations from Novo Nordisk to the World Diabetes Foundation (WDF) and the Novo
Nordisk Haemophilia & Haemoglobinopathies Foundation (NNHF) are recognised when the donation
or contribution is paid out.
Product recalls
Number of times Novo Nordisk has instituted a recall of a product from the market due to patient safety
reasons, including recalls in connection with clinical trials. A recall may affect multiple countries.
Failed inspections
Inspections where FDA warning letters or European Medicines Agency non-compliance letters related to
Good Medical Practice inspections are received, Good Medical Practice/ISO certificates for strategic sites
are lost, pre-approval inspections result in a complete response letter, study conclusions are changed
due to Good Clinical Practice/Good Laboratory Practice inspection issues, or marketing or import
authorisations are withdrawn due to inspection issues. Strategic sites are defined as the manufacturing
sites in Brazil, China, Denmark, France and the US. Inspections at acquired companies run by Novo
Nordisk are reported as Novo Nordisk inspections. Inspections of acquired companies run by the
acquired company are excluded.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Prioritised topics / 2. Patient protection and quality of life 56
Prioritised
topics
Patient protection
and quality of life
Own workforce
Climate Change
Resource use and
circular economy
Ambition
Being recognised as a
sustainable employer
Policy
Labour Code of Conduct
Health and Safety policy
Diversity and Inclusion policy
Performance
• Gender distribution in Senior
Leadership was 56:44 (men/women)
• The LTIR remained on par with the
2024 level
Sub-topics:
Own workforce is addressed in
the following three sub-topics:
• Working conditions
• Health and safety
• Equal treatment and opportunities
For more information on our
Compliance Hotline, see section 9.2
on p. 76
3. Own workforce
IRO name Category Sustainability topic Value chain location
Fair working conditions • Working
conditions
• Own operations
Protection of health and safety • Working
conditions
• Own operations
Ensure equal treatment and
opportunities
• Equal treatment
and opportunities
• Own operations
Potential talent attraction risks
• Working
conditions
• Equal treatment
and opportunities
• Own operations
Material impacts, risks and opportunities
Novo Nordisk depends on a skilled and diverse workforce across production sites, laboratories,
commercial functions and administrative roles to deliver innovative treatments for people living
with serious chronic diseases. Fair labour rights and employee benefits are a fundamental part
of our workforce approach, supporting stable and attractive working conditions globally and
safeguarding against negative impacts. Central to building an inclusive, diverse and resilient
organisation, is protecting our employees health and safety and ensuring equal treatment and
opportunities. Strong workforce practices and inclusive cultures help safeguard risks such as
not attracting or retaining critical talent, particularly in R&D and specialised roles, which could
undermine innovation and competitiveness.
Transformation
In 2025, Novo Nordisk announced a company-wide transformation to simplify the organisation,
speed up decision-making and redirect resources towards obesity and diabetes growth
opportunities. The plan is designed to sharpen commercial execution, ensuring we remain
competitive while upholding high standards of ethics and compliance. As part of this
transformation, we have reduced around 9,000 positions globally of which 5,000 in Denmark.
We recognise that organisational changes of this scale may affect fair labour rights and
employee benefits. Maintaining a close dialogue with labour-market representatives and
ensuring compliance with applicable labour regulations have therefore been key priorities
throughout the transition. The process has been conducted in accordance with local labourmarket requirements, with clear and timely communication to affected employees.
We also acknowledges the importance of safeguarding health and safety during periods of
change, ensuring that workforce considerations remain integral to our strategy. We take
responsibility for ensuring that our actions do not cause harm, embedding the protection
of employee rights, health and well-being into our policies and ways of working.
3.1 Working conditions
Policies and approach
Our Labour Code of Conduct1
 sets minimum labour standards safeguarding employee rights
and ensuring consistent working conditions across global operations. We continuously assess
the effectiveness of our Labour Code of Conduct. A global due diligence review covering a 5-year
period was completed in 2025. It confirmed that our working condition standards are upheld and
that a strong speak-up culture has been established, supported by multiple channels for
reporting concerns.
Employee compensation at Novo Nordisk exceeds local living wage standards (covering basic
needs plus discretionary income) and is reviewed regularly to reflect changes in cost of living
and economic conditions. Employees can apply for flexible work arrangements, such as career
breaks, compressed work weeks, or reduced hours, with corresponding adjustments to pay and
benefits. All employees are covered by social protection through public or company-provided
benefits. Parental leave for non-birthing parents has been extended globally to 14 weeks paid
leave. In Denmark and EU, working hours are monitored to support work–life balance, in
accordance with EU legislation. In markets where no laws or collective agreements apply, we
aim to keep working hours under 48 hours per week.
Novo Nordisk maintains policies to help ensure a workplace free from discrimination and
harassment, based on both legal requirements and broader commitments to inclusion. The
global Anti-Harassment Framework sets minimum process standards, implemented by local
People & Organisation and Ethics & Compliance teams. In the US, these are supplemented by
local frameworks.
We ensure that workforce engagement takes place through direct dialogue and formal structures,
such as our annual employee engagement survey Evolve. Employees have the right to organise
and bargain collectively. Where legislation restricts these rights, we protect and support alternative
representation and grievance mechanisms. In Denmark, five collective agreements are in place
with elected employee representatives, and management meets union representatives quarterly.
In Denmark and other EU countries, employees are represented through works councils or
equivalent bodies. The European Works Council engages regularly, including an annual meeting
of all representatives. These engagements support our assessment and continuous improvement
of workforce practices, including target setting, implemented through local HR teams.
1. The Labour Code of Conduct is aligned with the UN Guiding Principles on Business and Human Rights, the International
Bill of Human Rights, the International Labour Organisations Declaration on Fundamental Principles and Rights at work and
the Global Compact Ten Principles
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Prioritised topics / 3. Own workforce 57
Actions
The Novo Nordisk Way guided our actions throughout the transformation process, ensuring
assistance for colleagues affected by the organisational changes e.g., by offering mental
wellbeing resources and professional outplacement. Severance pay and other terms met
local legal and market benchmarks, and a fair, transparent termination process across
countries was prioritised. Employee representatives were engaged where required, and
the European Works Council was informed and consulted during the process.
Performance
Novo Nordisk underwent a company-wide transformation in 2025, reducing the number of
employees to 69,505 by year-end equal to 10% reduction when comparing to year-end 2024
including Catalent. The reorganisation in 2025 also impacted the number of leavers, increasing
the employee turnover rate to 18.4%.
3.1.1 Characteristics of Novo Nordisk’s employees1
Number 2025 2024 2023
Total number of employees (FTEs)2 68,794 73,109 63,370
Total number of employees (headcount)2 69,505 74,156 64,319
• Men 35,453 37,416 –
• Women 33,992 36,711 –
• Other/ not reported 60 29 –
Country by country3
• EUCAN (Europe and Canada) 39,004 42,308 35,402
• Hereof Denmark 29,613 34,185 28,692
• USA 9,961 8,829 7,869
• APAC (Japan, Korea, Oceania and Southeast Asia) 8,862 9,953 8,806
• Region China (Mainland China, Hong Kong and Taiwan) 6,188 6,977 6,485
• Emerging Markets (Latin America, the Middle East and Africa) 5,490 6,089 5,757
Number of leavers 13,274 3,574 –
Employee turnover 18.4% 5.5% 5.5%
1. All 2024 employee related metrics exclude Catalent. 2. 2024 figures: FTE and headcount are excluding Catalent.
Including Catalent, FTE is 76,302 and headcount is 77,349. 3. Geographical split has been reorganised to align with the
geographical regions applied throughout the Annual report. Hence 2024 and 2023 figures have been restated.
Novo Nordisk’s HR systems currently provide employees the option to select their self-identified
gender. Efforts are being made to raise awareness of this self-identification feature for future
reporting, including other/not reported categories.
By end of 2025, Novo Nordisk employed 64,974 permanent and 4,531 temporary employees,
similar to the 2024 split (68,669 permanent and 5,487 temporary). No employees in Novo
Nordisk’s own workforce are hired on non-guaranteed hours contracts.
Through the Evolve survey we track overall engagement, the 2025 index score remained broadly
stable year on year, with only a 1-point decline in favourable responses. Engagement remains
high when benchmarked against external organisations. As the survey preceded the September
2025 reorganisation, any impact of this may be reflected in 2026 results.
3.1.2 Enterprise Evolve score
Favorable % score 2025 2024 2023
Enterprise Evolve score 84 85 86
We have continued to advance our speak-up culture and anti-harassment framework as part of
our company-wide campaigns to ensure awareness of speak-up channels, while recognising that
some cases may not be reported to the Compliance Hotline. In 2025, the number of
substantiated people-related cases increased by 5% compared to 2024. None of the cases were
deemed as severe cases of human rights incidents. For substantiated cases, Novo Nordisk follows
prescribed procedures to provide remediation. For more information about our grievance
mechanism and non-retaliation policy, see section 9.2 on page 76.
3.1.3 Incidents and complaints
Number 2025 2024 2023
Substantiated people-related cases 175 167 –
• Hereof substantiated cases of harassment, including
discrimination
150 139 –
Amount of material fines, penalties and compensation related
to the above-mentioned incidents (mDKK)
– – –
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Prioritised topics / 3. Own workforce 58
3.2 Health and safety
Policies and approach
We prioritise the health, safety and wellbeing of our workforce to ensure safe and reliable
delivery of medicines. Our Global Health and Safety policy covers physical and psychological
safety, occupational health and health promotion, with a strong focus on prevention, continuous
improvement and regulatory compliance. The policy is implemented globally through a Health
and Safety Management System, which addresses chemical and biological exposure, ergonomic
hazards, noise, machine safety and psychosocial wellbeing. All production facilities are ISO 45001
certified with acquired sites being certified within a three year period and subject to regular
internal and external audits. Leaders and employees are accountable, and safety is never
compromised for cost or productivity. Health and safety principles are also embedded in
expansion projects and construction sites, ensuring safe conditions throughout the value chain.
Actions
Health and safety actions are implemented in close collaboration with all business areas. Each
area maintains a local plan addressing strategic risks and legal requirements, supported by
global resources for remediation. An annual bottom-up review evaluates the effectiveness of the
management system. In 2025, we sharpened our focus on preventing high-risk incidents,
specifically those with Potential Serious Injuries and Fatalities (PSIF) and Serious Injuries and
Fatalities (SIF). We are prioritising the identification, investigation and systematic prevention of
PSIF/SIF, introducing a target to ensure that over 80% of PSIF/SIF incidents undergo systematic
root cause analysis, in alignment with our Health & Safety policy. Formal performance monitoring
against the new target will be initiated in 2026. To raise awareness and strengthen capabilities,
we conducted intensive, targeted awareness training for key personnel and shared incident
examples on a monthly basis. Integration of Health and Safety standards into acquired sites is
ongoing, with full integration expected by 2027. One new site underwent internal health and
safety audit, with remaining new sites scheduled for 2026–2027. Besides these ongoing actions,
we have also implemented the following key actions in 2025:
2025 actions
Protecting psychological safety
• An enterprise-wide psychological safety concept was developed for all employees globally,
with tools, frameworks, processes and awareness training in place.
• In 2025, external vendors offering classes and workshops to support the psychological
safety journey of employees were identified.
• Metric: 3.2.1 (see table to the right)
 Executing safely on construction and expansion projects
• Introduced a construction safety standard for high-risk activities identified in 2024
mapping, rolled out across major construction projects.
• A 2025 gap analysis, supported by independent consultants, guided site improvements.
• Metric: 3.2.1 (see table to the right)
Targets and performance
We have determined that our stable rate of LTIR is satisfactory following a benchmark against
peers. As a result, we discontinued the year-on-year 10% improvement target for Lost Time Injury
Rate (LTIR) in 2025. Instead, we have refocused our target on high-risk incident prevention to
reduce incident frequency in the future. We will however continue to monitor LTIR. In 2025, the
LTIR remained stable at 1.2 lost time injuries per million hours worked (ppm), even though the
number of recordable work-related lost time injuries increased by 5%. The reason for the LTIR
remaining stable is that the number of work-related lost time injuries was counteracted by
average FTE also increasing in 2025 compared to 2024. The increase in number of work-related
injuries reflects the continued production expansion and workforce growth prior to the
transformation in September. Immediate corrective actions were launched following each injury.
Stress symptoms and symptoms of physical pain are measured through our annual Evolve
survey, which shows performance at a point in time. As the survey preceded the September 2025
reorganisation, any impact of this may be reflected in 2026 results. Evolve survey insights inform
annual targets, with outcomes monitored continuously and reported annually.
Stress symptoms were reported by 14.0% of employees, missing the 10% improvement target
since 2024. Business areas with a high reporting of stress symptoms received customised
interventions from internal organisational psychologists, leading to a 20% reduction in reported
stress symptoms for these specific areas between 2024 and 2025. Work-related physical pain has
declined, continuing last year’s downward trend. However, the 5% reduction target was not fully
achieved. 'Pain Awareness Workshops' in high-risk areas contributed to the improvement, though
additional measures may be needed to meet future targets.
3.2.1 Health and safety (own employees)
Number 2025 2024 2023
Recordable work-related lost time injuries 182 173 153
Lost time injury rate (LTIR) (ppm) 1.2 1.2 1.3
Fatalities as result of work-related lost time injuries, incl. other
workers working on Novo Nordisk sites 0 0 1
Employees reporting symptoms of stress 14.0% 13.8% 13.8%
Employees reporting symptoms of work-related physical pain 6.7% 6.8% 7.1%
Workforce (headcount) covered by health and safety
management system 100% 100% –
3.2.2 Lost time injury rate
Lost time injuries per million hours worked
(ppm)
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Prioritised topics / 3. Own workforce 59
3.3 Equal treatment and opportunities for all
Policies and approach
Novo Nordisk strives to build a diverse and inclusive workplace that leverages differences,
fosters learning and growth and drives innovation. We recognise that diversity is any dimension
that differentiates our people and enables diverse thinking, for example gender, ethnicity, race,
nationality, disability and sexual orientation. Our Diversity and Inclusion policy supports our
organisation as reflective of our patients and customers and society at large. We focus on
mitigating bias by creating inclusive workplaces and ensuring leaders act as role models. Equality
is applied to all stages of employment, including recruitment, remuneration and promotion in
line with all local laws and regulations in the jurisdictions in which we operate. Input from
employees, leadership and peers ensures that our Diversity, Equity, Inclusion and Belonging
efforts reflect workforce needs and societal expectations.
To foster a workplace where everyone can meaningfully participate, perform their best and
to build a strong talent pipeline, we cultivate belonging by leveraging the diverse skill sets,
knowledge and experience of our employees. Promoting equal opportunities also means
creating a strong learning culture. Personal and professional growth is ensured through
ongoing development dialogues and documented development plans. These plans focus
on both short-term goals and long-term career aspirations and are structured to focus on
both learning experiences and formal training. While we have no standalone training policy,
we apply compliance-driven and job-specific training procedures.
Actions
A new Global Diversity, Equity, Inclusion and Belonging strategy has been launched to leverage
differences, adapt to changes and foster an engaged workforce that drives innovation for
patients. We continue to assess how to improve learning and career advancement opportunities
for our employees. At a minimum, we provide access to self-directed learning content,
opportunities for internal mentors and coaches and advertise short-term developmental job
rotations for all employees. In response to the transformation, we paused all global talent,
leadership and learning programmes in Q4 2025 to evaluate and realign them with our strategic
priorities. Our updated learning and development portfolio will be launched in Q1 2026 to deliver
the capabilities needed for the future.
We perform equal pay reviews to ensure that individuals with similar roles and responsibilities
are compensated equitably, regardless of background, gender, or ethnicity to safeguard equal
and fair pay. This process covers global operations, excluding US and Canada, which follows
its own processes. Alongside the equal pay review process, Novo Nordisk has enhanced
transparency of reward elements, including salary ranges, short-term incentives, benefits,
and long-term incentives. Employees can now access their own salary positioning. These
measures aim to minimise bias and support fair and equal pay.
2. The previously stated minimum 45% gender split is no longer a target but an aspirational objective.
Performance
In 2021, we defined two global aspirations2
: one for balanced gender representation at all
managerial levels, and one aiming for at least 45% women and 45% men in senior leadership
(VP+) by the end of 2025. The aspirations, covering Novo Nordisk A/S, excluding the US, was
benchmarked against peers, leading Danish companies, industry standards and academic
research. They were developed with executive input, approved by the Board and have been
transparently monitored. In 2025, women occupied 47% of all leadership positions and men
occupied 53%, consistent with 2024 figures and thereby meeting our aspiration for balanced
gender distribution across all managerial levels (see table 3.3.3 on the following page). At the
senior leadership level, 44% of roles were held by women and 56% were held by men at the end
of 2025 (see graph 3.3.2 to the right). Despite the 2% point change since 2024, the aspiration for
senior leadership was not met by the December 2025 deadline. We will continue to monitor the
gender distribution across senior leadership levels. Across all of our efforts, we monitor our
global inclusion index, which is part of our annual employee engagement survey, Evolve. It
indicates how our employees rate the state of inclusion at Novo Nordisk, and it resulted in 80% of
our employees rating the inclusion statements favourably in 2025.
As of 31 December 2025, the Board of Directors (BoD) had equal gender representation with four
women and five men (as of 31 January 2026, the BoD consists of five women and four men).
Excluding employee representatives, shareholder-elected members included one woman and
four men, not meeting the Danish Gender Balance Act. Novo Nordisk remains committed to
achieving balanced gender representation on the BoD in line with applicable legislation. For
details on how this will be ensured and how diversity is considered during candidate evaluation,
see the section on 'Gender Balance Act' on page 61 and the Corporate Governance Report.
In 2025 we have refined our methodology on the gender pay gap to present the weighted
gender pay gap across all job levels and countries. The weighted gender pay gap considers
geographical differences, but it does not take into account job level variances. This adjustment is
intended to further enhance transparency around our compensation practices. In 2025, the
gender pay gap is 1.2% in favour of women.
The remuneration ratio was impacted by a lower payout on the short-term incentive programme
for 2025, and a lower performance on the long-term incentive programme for 2025.
3.3.1 Remuneration metrics 2025 2024 2023
Gender pay gap1
(1.2%) (0.4%) –
Annual total remuneration ratio2 37 63 –
1. 2024 figure for Gender pay gap has been restated from (3)% due to a methodological change. 2. Based on present CEO
as highest paid employee. If calculated based on former CEO's remuneration, the ratio would be 148 due to severance
payment in 2025.
3.3.2 Gender in senior leadership positions
(CEO, EVP, SVP, CVP, and VP)
(% men:women)
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Prioritised topics / 3. Own workforce 60
3.3.3 Diversity metrics – Management levels
Men Women
Number 2025 2024 2023 2025 2024 2023
Number of employees (headcount) at senior leadership – CEO, EVP, SVP, GVP and VP1 491 504 – 379 361 –
Percentage of employees (headcount) at senior leadership – CEO, EVP, SVP, GVP and VP 56% 58% 59% 44% 42% 41%
Number of employees (headcount) at other leadership levels – Director, manager, team leader 4,598 4,726 – 4,075 4,171 –
Percentage of employees (headcount) at other leadership levels – Director, manager, team leader 53% 53% 54% 47% 47% 46%
Gender in leadership positions (overall) 53% 54% 54% 47% 46% 46%
Gender on the Board of Directors 56% 50% 50% 44% 50% 50%
Gender on the Board of Directors without employee representatives 80% 62% 62% 20% 38% 38%
1. Historical data for Number of employees (headcount) at senior leadership level has been merged into one row instead of two in last year’s reporting. This has not impacted the reported number (headcount) at senior leadership level.

Gender Balance Act - Applicable for Novo Nordisk A/S only
Novo Nordisk A/S, as resident in Denmark, is subject to the Danish Gender Balance Act and obliged
to disclose information on gender diversity in the Board of Directors and other management levels
for employees employed in Novo Nordisk A/S. Other management levels are defined as two levels of
management under the Board of Directors: (i) Executive Management (EVPs employed by Novo
Nordisk A/S), and (ii) individuals with personnel responsibility who report directly to the first
management level1
. Hence, Other management levels are not equal to senior leadership levels.
Measures taken to achieve gender balance
When evaluating candidates for election and re-election for the shareholder-elected Board
members, the People & Governance Committee and the Board considers the Competency
Profile of the Board of Directors of Novo Nordisk A/S which includes diversity in terms of e.g.,
gender and other relevant criteria. In regards to employee representatives, Novo Nordisk A/S
has employee representation in its Board of Directors and promotes the election to all eligible
employees regardless of backgrounds.
For selecting employees at Other management levels, Novo Nordisk A/S ensures a strong
leadership pipeline of diverse talents through its commitment to promoting equality of
opportunities within Novo Nordisk A/S.
Status on achieving gender balance
Novo Nordisk A/S has achieved gender balance as defined in the Danish Gender Balance Act
for employee representatives in the Board of Directors and in Other management levels,
however, it has not achieved gender balance for Board of Directors elected by shareholders.
1. For other management levels, the reporting only regards employees of Novo Nordisk A/S.
2. Ratio as of 31 December 2025. As of 31 January 2026, all employee representatives are women.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Prioritised topics / 3. Own workforce 61
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Enterprise Evolve score
Measures the average percentage of favourable answers to the 18 engagement items shared in Novo
Nordisk’s annual employee survey. Favourable answers are defined as 'Agree' and 'Strongly agree' to
positively framed questions. The survey is performed once per year in the spring administered by an
external vendor.
Employees (headcount)
Measured as the headcount of all employees at year-end, excluding externals, employees on unpaid
leave, interns, Bachelor’s and Master’s thesis employees and substitutes. Employee data are based on
registrations in Novo Nordisk’s HR systems. Employees are attributed to geographical regions according
to their primary workplace.
Number of leavers
The number of employees (headcount), excluding temporary employees, who left the Novo Nordisk
Group during the year.
Employee turnover
Measured as the number of leavers during the financial year, divided by the average number of
employees (headcount), excluding temporary employees.
Substantiated people-related cases
Cases that, through a formal process, have been reported to or filed with the Compliance Hotline and
have been substantiated or partially substantiated based on an investigation during the year (partially
substantiated: an allegation encompasses several aspects, but only a subset of them can be confirmed).
Cases are within the overarching categories of the global anti-harassment framework, the Novo Nordisk
Way and Ombudsman, as well as other potential human rights breaches for internal employees,
consultants and other externally hired individual workers.
Substantiated cases of harassment, including discrimination
Cases that have been closed as substantiated or partially substantiated based on an investigation under
the Novo Nordisk Way and the global anti-harassment framework for our own workforce (partially
substantiated: an allegation encompasses several aspects, but only a subset of them can be confirmed).
Amount of material fines, penalties and compensation related to the above-mentioned incidents
Damages resulting from violations of social or human rights laws, including discrimination and severe
human rights incidents, where a Novo Nordisk legal entity (parent or affiliate) has been found in violation
by a court of law and been condemned to pay material fines, penalties or compensation.
Recordable work-related lost time injuries
Total number of work-related incidents causing absence for one full day or more, in addition to the day
of incident. Absence is considered as calendar days.
Lost time injury rate (LTIR)
Rate of recordable work-related injuries for our own workforce, measured in work-related injuries per
million hours worked, also referred to as the lost-time accident frequency (LTAF). Contractors, visitors,
employees on unpaid leave, interns and Bachelor’s and Master’s thesis students are not included. The
number of hours worked is based on 2,000 working hours annually per full-time equivalent and the
monthly records of number of employees converted into full-time equivalents to calculate FTE average
for the year.
Fatalities as a result of work-related lost time injuries
Work-related injuries resulting in the death of an employee or other workers working on a Novo Nordisk
site. All employees (headcount), permanent, temporary and non-guaranteed hours, have been included
in this metric.
Percentages of employees reporting symptoms of stress/work-related physical pain
Reported via the annual employee survey Evolve. In 2025, the scope of the survey was extended to a
few Catalent entities acquired in late 2024. In the survey, stress is defined as a situation where the
employee feels tense, restless, nervous or troubled, or unable to sleep at night due to thoughts about
their problems. Regarding symptoms of physical pain, the survey asks if an employee’s work generally
causes them physical pain. The two relative targets of improving mental and physical wellbeing are
measured as the percentage of employees responding 'Quite much' or 'Very much' for mental wellbeing
or 'Unfavourable' to the statement related to physical pain.
Workforce covered by health and safety management system (headcount)
The percentage of employees in Novo Nordisk’s own workforce who are covered by our health and
safety management system based on legal requirements and/or recognised standards or guidelines
is defined as the number of employees covered by health and safety management systems (headcount)
divided by all employees (headcount).
Gender pay gap
Calculated as the difference between the weighted average annualised salary for men and women
divided by the weighted average annualised salary of men and expressed as the percentage of the
average annualised salary of men. All employees at all job levels and in all countries have been included
in this metric.
Annual total remuneration ratio
Calculated as the ratio between the annual remuneration of the highest paid individual (the present CEO)
and the average annual remuneration for all employees excluding registered executives. Payments
include salary, incentive schemes and severance payments if applicable.
Gender in leadership and senior leadership positions
Reported as the percentage of gender in leadership and senior leadership positions. Senior leadership
positions are defined as employees in the global job levels chief executive officer (CEO), executive vice
president (EVP), senior vice president (SVP), group vice president (GVP) and vice president (VP). These
are the top management positions in the Novo Nordisk Group. Other leadership levels are defined as
employees in the global job levels of director, manager and team leader. Leadership positions overall
are defined as directors, managers, team leaders and senior leadership positions. Diversity on the Board
of Directors is reported as the percentage split by gender among all members, including employee
elected members.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Prioritised topics / 3. Own workforce 62
Prioritised
topics
Patient protection
and quality of life
Own workforce
Climate Change
Resource use and
circular economy
Ambition
We aim to build a climate-resilient
business by assessing and adapting to
climate risks, reducing GHG emissions
in line with a well-below 2°C pathway,
and transparently reporting across our
value chain under the GHG Protocol.
Policy
Environmental policy
Performance
• Scope 1, 2 and 3 emissions
increased 19% since 2024
Suppliers for Zero Programme
• In 2025, we launched the Suppliers
for Zero programme to align
suppliers with our climate, nature
and plastics goals.
• All Tier 1 suppliers must source
100% renewable electricity by 2033.
• Suppliers must also meet our
Responsible Sourcing Standards
• Additional initiatives will be defined
by Novo Nordisk in individual
engagements.
4. Climate change
IRO name Category Sustainability topic Value chain location
CO2e emissions contributing to
climate change
• Mitigation
• Energy
• Upstream
• Own operations
• Downstream
Potential reputational risks linked to
CO2e emissions and speed of
mitigation efforts
• Mitigation
• Energy
• Upstream
• Own operations
• Downstream
Potential risks of climate-related
disruptions in operations or supply
chain
• Adaptation • Upstream
• Own operations
• Downstream
Material impacts, risks and opportunities
As a global pharmaceutical company, we recognise that our activities, from sourcing raw
materials to manufacturing and distribution, have a material climate impact. As we expand,
so does the impact unless we take deliberate action to change it. The majority of our GHG
emissions (93%) arise upstream and downstream in our value chain.This includes emissions from
sourcing of raw materials and services (direct), other goods and services (indirect) for medicine
production, the construction of new manufacturing facilities (investments) and the distribution
of raw materials and finished products. Direct operational emissions (scope 1 and 2) represent
only 7%. We acknowledge that until we fully decouple business growth from emissions, our
operations will continue to generate negative environmental impacts and expose us to transition
and reputational risks. We are actively advancing decarbonisation and adaptation plans to
strengthen resilience and progress our climate roadmap.
4.1 Climate mitigation, adaptation and energy
Policies and approach
The Novo Nordisk Environmental policy affirms our commitment to providing life-changing
treatments for people with serious chronic diseases while minimising environmental impact.
Pharmaceutical production, from producing APIs and excipients to manufacturing, packaging,
cold-chain distribution and end-of-life handling, has a material climate footprint.
We are committed to achieving our CO₂e emission reduction targets through energy efficiency,
renewable energy, process optimisation and other decarbonisation levers (see illustration 4.1.2),
while systematically assessing and adapting to climate-related risks. The policy covers all our
activities globally and is embedded across the pharmaceutical value chain.
Implementation is led by management teams and supported by on-site environmental partners
at all production facilities, ensuring compliance and continuous improvement. Production sites
are ISO 14001 certified for environmental management (excluding all new acquisitions and
construction projects) and our Kalundborg site is also certified according to ISO 50001, energy
management. Our ISO 14001 is linked to our Circular for Zero Factory Model, which assists
manufacturing sites to identify strategic maturity level in line with Novo Nordisk’s environmental
roadmaps: climate, nature and plastics, while also driving actions throughout
our Environmental Management System.
Transition- and physical climate risks assessment
We assess transition and physical climate risks through our Enterprise Risk Management (ERM)
framework across our production, including the sourcing of APIs, excipients, packaging and
logistics. In 2024, we conducted a forward looking climate resilience analysis using 1.5 °C (RCP
2.6) and 4 °C (RCP 8.5) scenarios from the IPCC towards 2030 and 2050, which assume economic
constraints arising from moderate population and GDP growth. These scenarios were selected
to reflect both 'business as usual' as well as rapid decarbonisation pathways and their impact on
our activities. Short-, medium- and long-term risks were evaluated and scenario outcomes are
used to inform strategic decisions on site resilience, supply chain planning and our
decarbonisation roadmap.
The physical risk assessment focused on site exposure and critical raw materials. Physical climate
risks are screened annually at production sites (excluding warehouses) and in parts of the supply
chain. For production sites, we assess risks based on geographic location, while for supply chain
assessments we consider supplier countries. The transition risks assessment was evaluated using
an Integrated Assessment Model (IAM) to capture sector- and region-specific macroeconomic
shifts, energy supply, raw materials pricing, labour costs and revenue changes. We assess and
adjust mitigation measures, where feasible based on parameters such as evolving national
policies, availability of low carbon technologies, energy supply conditions, thereby increasing
business resilience to climate risks. No aspects of our business were identified as incompatible
with a transition to climate-neutral economy.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Prioritised topics / 4. Climate change 63
4.1.1 Scope 1, 2 and 3 GHG emissions targets Annual %
(target/
1,000 tCO base) 2e 20241 2025 2030 2033 2045
Scope 1 and 2 GHG emissions - market-based 101 183 0 0 0 17%
Scope 3 GHG emissions2
 (SBTi) 1,448 1,616 – 970 0
3 4%
Scope 3 GHG emissions (excluded from SBTi target) 712 891 Not applicable
Scope 3 GHG emissions 2,160 2,507
1. Base year 2. Following the target validation by SBTi in 2025, we revised base-year emissions from 1,493 to 1,448.
3. Net emissions with residual emissions after the decarbonisation levers (150 thousand tCO2e) to be neutralized
through carbon removals.
4.1.2 Main decarbonisation levers for our 2033 scope 3 target and 2045 net-zero target
(1,000 tonnes CO2e)
Climate targets and transition plan
Novo Nordisk has three targets for climate as outlined in the margin to the right and summarised
in table 4.1.1: 2030 target for scope 1 and 2, 2033 target for scope 3 (2033) and a 2045 net-zero
target for scope 1, 2 and 3.
Our transition plan and decarbonisation levers
Our transition plan is aligned with our climate targets and our strategic priorities, and is based on
projected growth in production volumes and expansion projects. It takes into account several
uncertainties and assumptions, such as business growth projections to reflect the increased
resource use in the coming years and the reduction potential of available technologies. The plan
addresses both transition pathways for our direct operations (scope 1 and 2) and our value chain
(scope 3). Emissions reduction efforts in our own operations are focused on switching to
renewable energy, increased energy efficiency and transition to electric vehicles (EV). For scope 3
emissions, our transition plan relies on a portfolio of low-carbon value chain initiatives, and we
will further focus on our suppliers’ transition to renewable electricity as well as process
optimisation to reduce overall demand for materials and services and optimise our processes
even further.
Our main decarbonisation levers are (as outlined in 4.1.2):
• Direct spend: Procurement of low-carbon feedstocks for key raw materials, such as
e-methanol for plastic devices, low-carbon ammonia and glucose from regenerative
agriculture;
• Indirect spend: Procurement of low-carbon goods and services;
• Investments: Converting to low-carbon construction materials;
• Distribution: Converting product distribution from air freight to sea- and road freight, while
sourcing Sustainable Aviation (SAF) and Marine Fuels (SMF) and converting to electric trucks;
Assumptions and uncertainties
We recalibrate priority areas continuously. Although some scope 3 decarbonisation levers
are already implemented to mitigate projected emission increase, many of our levers have a
delayed effect and will not materialise until 2030. Overall emissions are therefore expected to
keep increasing before reductions take effect towards 2033. This reflects planned expansion
and the timing of decarbonisation measures, not a deviation from our transition pathway.
Progress against targets is monitored through interim milestones to ensure alignment with
our transition plan. We acknowledge that going forward we will need to explore other initiatives
to address unallocated opportunities.
Beyond 2033, we will continue to work with our value chain initiatives and we plan to neutralise
up to 10% of baseline emissions through carbon removals to meet our 2045 net-zero target, in
line with SBTi and IPCC guidance. We are exploring both nature-based and technology-based
removal solutions. Read more about our restoration efforts in section 7 'Nature' p. 72.
Targets within transition plan
• 2030: Zero scope 1 and 2 emissions.
• Ambition: 1.5°C aligned
• 2033: 33% reduction in scope 31
emissions compared with 2024 baseline.
• Ambition: Well-below 2°C,
not 1.5°C aligned
• 2045: Net-zero emissions,
• Ambition: Aligned with the
Corporate Net-Zero Standard
1. Our 2033 scope 3 target covers ~67% of
emissions, excluding categories 3, 5, 7, 12 and
parts of 1, 2 and 6, in line with SBTi provisions for
high-uncertainty categories. The target follows a
sectoral decarbonisation pathway. The 2045 netzero target includes all scope 1, 2 and 3
emissions. The targets and the transition plan
have been approved by our Board of Directors
and Executive Management.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Prioritised topics / 4. Climate change 64
Actions
Many of our 2025 actions addressed our aim to decarbonise own operations. We have worked
with initiatives to reduce energy consumption through optimising sites and processes and we
started to develop site-specific conversion plans for fossil-based heat and steam systems. To
reduce emissions across our value chain we increased the number of suppliers committed to
renewable electricity (see margin to the right) and we successfully implemented initiatives with
several of our key suppliers in the highest-impact sourcing categories.
Besides these ongoing actions, we have also implemented the following key actions in 2025:
2025 actions
Scope 1 and 2: Energy efficiency and optimisation, ongoing to 2030.
• Advanced district cooling and heating ring in Kalundborg (completion 2026, ~20,000 MWh/yearly
savings) and new heat pump in Hillerød completed in 2025 (~3,300 MWh/yearly savings).
• Target: Zero scope 1 and 2 by 2030, Metric: 4.1.4
Scope 1 and 2: Converting to renewable heat and steam, ongoing to 2030.
• Investigating heat and steam decarbonisation levers across production sites to
enable cost-efficient implementation. Specific roadmap to be finalized in 2026.
• Target: Zero scope 1 and 2 by 2030, Metric: 4.1.4
Scope 1 and 2: Reducing emissions from fossil-based vehicles, ongoing to 2030.
• Expanding EV transition in alignment with local infrastructure across operational countries.
• Target: Zero scope 1 and 2 by 2030, Metric: 4.1.4
Scope 3: Reducing emissions from purchased good and services, until 2033 and beyond.
• Partnering with suppliers on low-carbon materials and feedstocks: first large-scale e-methanol
project in Kassø for e-POM production.
• In 2025, over 10% of the glucose we procured was from regenerative agriculture and a large
share of purchased ammonia was low-carbon.
• Converting to low-carbon (e.g., steel, concrete) and recycled materials at site Clayton.
• Target: Reduce scope 3 by 33% by 2033, Metric: 4.1.4
Scope 3: Reducing emissions from air and sea distribution, to 2033 and beyond.
• Securing sustainable aviation fuel (SAF) and marine fuel (SMF) agreements
with logistics partners.
• Target: Reduce scope 3 by 33% by 2033, Metric: 4.1.4
Climate adaptation to address physical climate risks, until 2033 and beyond
• In 2025, natural hazard exposure reassessed for all production sites and critical suppliers,
with detailed climate and nature risk evaluations for key commodities. The analysis indicated
5 key commodities that could potentially be impacted by climate change.
Performance
Total energy consumption increased by 23% compared to 2024, mainly due to the integration of
electricity and natural gas consumption at acquired production sites. These acquisitions
accounted for over 80% of the energy consumption increase at production sites, while our
construction and expansion activities played only a minor role in the overall increase.
In 2025, we refined our reporting methodology to better distinguish between renewable and
non-renewable steam and heat, and we now include contractual biomass-derived sources in
Kalundborg, Denmark, under renewable energy (both for 2024 and 2025). Otherwise, we
continue to adopt a conservative approach with only including energy as renewable, if suppliers
have contractual agreements in place. In 2024, renewables, mainly electricity, biogas and
biomass-based heat and steam, accounted for 66% of total energy use, but declined to 57% in
2025 due to the increase in fossil energy consumption in our recent acquisitions. Specifically, the
share of renewable electricity for production sites dropped from 100% in 2024 to 86% in 2025,
driven by the acquisition of new sites without renewable electricity setup. We have also started
to measure and report on self-generated renewable electricity in 2025.
In 2025, the total amount of energy savings achieved through our energy saving initiatives
increased from 13.7GWh in 2024 to 29.8 GWh. Yet, this reduction could not offset the overall
growth in energy consumption.
4.1.3 Energy consumption and mix
GWh 2025 2024 2023
Total energy consumption related to own operations 1,726 1,400 1,051
Total energy consumption from fossil sources 742 476 –
• Fuel consumption from crude oil and petroleum products 169 188 –
• Fuel consumption from natural gas 369 196 –
• Consumption of purchased or acquired electricity, heat, steam,
and cooling2 204 92 –
Total energy consumption from renewable sources 984 924 –
• Fuel consumption from renewable sources 156 154 –
• Consumption of purchased or acquired electricity, heat, steam
and cooling from renewable sources2 827 770 –
• Total self-generated non-fuel renewable energy 1 0 –
Percentage of fossil sources in total energy consumption 43% 34% –
Percentage of renewable sources in total energy consumption1 57% 66% –
Energy intensity (total energy consumption per net revenue2
)
(MWh/mDKK) 5.58 4.82 –
1. Contractual biomass-derived heat and steam is included under renewable sources in 2025 and the 2024 values were
restated from 54% to 66%, 46% to 34%. Accordingly, the values for consumption of fossil-based electricity heat and steam
was restated from 264 GWh to 92 GWh in 2024 and consumption of renewable electricity, heat and steam was restated from
599, GWh to 770 GWh. 2. Please see note 2.1 'Net sales and rebates' on page 88 in the Consolidated financial statements.
Suppliers for Zero Program
To reach our scope 3 targets, we need our
suppliers and CMOs to implement specific
decarbonisation levers and support us to
improve data foundations to measure
impacts and potentials.
We provide support to our suppliers
through collaborative partnerships and
free training
% of GHG emissions from suppliers who
have committed to sourcing renewable
electricity1
54%
41% in 2024
1. Commitments cover electricity consumption
from suppliers to Novo Nordisk within scope 3
category 1 and 2.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Prioritised topics / 4. Climate change 65
4.1.4 Scope 1, 2 and 3 GHG emissions
1,000 tCO2e 2025 2024 2023
% change
(2025/2024)
Scope 1 GHG emissions 120 85 78 41%
Scope 2 GHG emissions - market-based 63 16 15 294%
Scope 2 GHG emissions - location-based 198 174 – 14%
Scope 1 and 2 GHG emissions - market-based 183 101 93 81%
Scope 3 GHG emissions 2,507 2,160 1,743 16%
• Category 1: Purchased goods and Services 1,383 1,215 1,018 14%
• Category 2: Capital goods 609 465 303 31%
• Category 3: Fuel- and energy-related activities 86 74 56 16%
• Category 4: Upstream transportation and distribution 116 101 108 15%
• Category 5: Waste generated in operations 7 6 6 17%
• Category 6: Business travel 190 188 154 1%
• Category 7: Employee commuting 56 52 43 8%
• Category 9: Downstream transportation and
distribution
 57 57 52 0%
• Category 12: End-of-life treatment of sold products 3 2 3 50%
Total GHG emissions - market-based 2,690 2,261 1,836 19%
Total GHG emissions - location-based 2,825 2,419 – 17%
GHG emissions intensity, market-based (total GHG
emissions per net revenue1
) (tCO2e/mDKK) 8.7 7.8 – 12%
GHG emissions outside of scope 1 and 2 (1,000 tCO2
) 108 110 – (2%)
• Biogenic emissions (scope 1) 38 37 – 3%
• Biogenic emissions (scope 2) 70 73 – (4%)
1. Please see note 2.1 'Net sales and rebates' on p. 88 in the Consolidated financial statements.
Performance
Scope 1, 2 and 3 GHG emissions increased, as anticipated (see graph 4.1.5 to the right).
Therefore we did not achieve any emission reductions in 2025.
Scope 1 emissions (see table 4.1.4 to the left) increased by 41% from 2024 to 2025 primarily due
to an overall increased use of fossil natural gas. The five acquired sites accounted for the majority
of the increase in scope 1 emissions. Even though total scope 1 emissions increased, scope 1
emissions related to the consumption of diesel as well as gasoline declined in 2025, in line with
our aim to reduce emissions from fossil-based vehicles.
Scope 2 (market-based) emissions increased by 294% from 2024 to 2025, driven by
non-renewable electricity use at three of the acquired production sites. Our ambition is
to transition to long-term renewable solutions that add new renewable capacity to the grid,
rather than relying on standalone certificates. This means acquisitions may have an adverse
effect on the renewable share before long-term solutions are implemented. Besides the growth
in non-renewable electricity consumption at the acquired sites, non-renewable steam
consumption at our site expansion in China was also another contributing factor to the increase
in scope 2 emissions.
Scope 3 emissions increased by 16% from 2024 to 2025, driven by both procurement of goods
and services (category 1) and higher CapEx for property, plant and equipment (category 2).
Categories 1 and 2 made up nearly 80% of total scope 3.
Purchased goods and services (category 1) continue to be the largest scope 3 emissions source.
In 2025, the biggest increase in category 1 came from service-related activities, followed by
overall increase in the procurement of production materials and services. To address this
challenge, we have in 2025 started to source low-carbon materials and increased the share
of our suppliers sourcing renewable electricity (see margin on preceding page).
As anticipated, the fastest growth in scope 3 emissions was reported in category 2, where our
construction and expansion activities were the single largest driver of the total growth.
To address this challenge, we focused our efforts in 2025 to foster circularity in the construction
of new sites, by setting new thresholds for building design and material choice, and
implementing a new standard to design sites for deconstruction and adaptability. For details, see
the Action table in section 5.1 'Resource use and circular economy').
Decarbonisation efforts in category 4 (Distribution) were challenged by company growth
and increased by 15% compared to 2024. Supply chain optimisation as well as procurement of
sustainable aviation fuel (SAF) and sustainable marine fuel (SMF) were not able to fully offset
this growth. Category 6 (Business travel), on the other hand, remained stable compared to 2024,
reflecting the reduction in employee travel in the second half of the year following the business
transformation. Other scope 3 categories remained similar to the 2024 levels.
4.1.5 Scope 1, 2 and 3 emissions
(1,000 tCO2e)
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Prioritised topics / 4. Climate change 66
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Total energy consumption from fossil sources under Novo Nordisk control
Primary energy consumption from coal, crude oil, petroleum products and natural gas, as well as
consumption of externally purchased secondary non-renewable energy such as electricity, heat, steam
and cooling. Energy consumption is based on meter readings and/or invoices.
Total energy consumption from renewable sources
Primary energy consumption from renewable fuels (wood, biogas, bioethanol and biodiesel); as well as
externally purchased and self-generated renewable electricity and biomass-derived heat and steam, as
defined in the contractual agreements. Consumption is based on meter readings and/or invoices and
complemented with contractual agreements.
Energy intensity/GHG intensity
Total energy consumption/total GHG emissions per net revenue. For energy intensity this corresponds to
energy intensity from activities in high climate impact sectors. It is assumed that all activities of the Novo
Nordisk Group are in a high climate impact sector (NACE code C21). Net revenue refers to total net sales
generated by Novo Nordisk.
The reporting of GHG emissions follows the ESRS and GHG Protocol. All impact is measured in tonnes of
CO2e; using the Global Warming Potential (GWP) values published by the IPCC based on a 100-year time
horizon and includes emissions of CO2
, CH4
, N2O, HFCs, PFCs, SF6
 and NF3
.
Scope 1 GHG emissions
Scope 1 includes CO2e emissions from fuels used in stationary installations on site and mobile
installations, as well as fugitive emissions of refrigerants. Emission factors for the respective energy
types are based on the UK Government GHG Conversion Factors for Company Reporting. N2O and CH4
emissions from the consumption of biofuels are included in scope 1 and 2, while bio-based CO₂ emission
are assumed to be zero and are not included but disclosed separately under biogenic emissions. GHG
removals, carbon credits and avoided emissions are not included.
Scope 2 emissions
Indirect GHG emissions from electricity, heat and steam, purchased and consumed by Novo Nordisk.
Location-based emissions are calculated using grid average emission factors on local/regional/national
level. Market-based scope 2 emissions are calculated taking into account contractual instruments such as
Energy Attribute Certificates, Power Purchase Agreements and Guarantees of Origin from sources such
as wind, hydro, solar and biomass. For sites without such contractual agreements, residual mix emission
factors are applied when available, alternatively the grid average emission factor. For steam and district
heating, the market-based scope 2 emissions are calculated using supplier specific emission factors. In
general, sources of emission factors for scope 2 emission calculations include IEA, AIB, Green-e and
supplier specific factors.
Biogenic emissions refer to out of scope emissions of CO2
 from the combustion of biomass-based primary
fuels (scope 1) and biomass-derived electricity, steam and district heating (scope 2). Biogenic emissions
from our fermentation process are not included due to high calculation uncertainty.
Scope 3 emissions
Indirect GHG emissions that originate from our value chain. Novo Nordisk has identified nine categories
of scope 3 emissions out of the fifteen defined by the GHG Protocol as significant. The remaining six
categories are not reported on separately, as they are not applicable to Novo Nordisk. Accounting
policies are detailed only for the two most material categories of scope 3 – category 1 and 2.
Our calculation methods for remaining categories 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 9 and 12 are in line with the GHG Protocol
and include the supplier-specific method, distance-based approach, average-activity method, average
spend-based method and other hybrid methods.
In general, major sources of emission factors include EPA, DEFRA, EXIOBASE, GaBi and other industry
databases and standards. We continuously strengthen scope 3 reporting to improve accuracy, track
action levers and reflect progress as low-carbon materials are introduced. Our goal is to use supplierspecific emission factors for much of scope 3 reporting. Given limited data availability and evolving
science, future restatements remain plausible.
Category 1: Purchased goods and services
Purchased goods and services include purchased raw materials, packaging materials and consumables,
as well as services such as marketing, IT and facility services. If available, direct spend is converted into
CO2e emissions using the average activity data method where material weights are matched with CO2e
factors. A spend-based factor is applied for other direct spend data where no weight can be obtained.
Indirect spend is converted into CO2e using a spend-based method.
Category 2: Capital goods
Capital goods include emissions related to all indirect investment spend from external suppliers, mainly
production utilities and equipment. Indirect spend is converted into CO2e emissions via the average
spend-based method using emission factors.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Prioritised topics / 4. Climate change 67
Prioritised
topics
Patient protection
and quality of life
Own workforce
Climate Change
Resource use and
circular economy
Ambition
We aim to reduce our plastic
footprint by extending the life
of materials beyond patient use
and minimising plastic through
smarter design, reusable solutions,
optimised processes and sustainable
alternatives.
Policy
Environmental policy
Performance
• Plastic footprint per patient
decreased 5% since 2024
Plastic roadmap
1. Reduce by converting to reusable
devices and less frequent dosing
2. Change by transitioning to nonvirgin-fossil plastic
3. Avoid by expanding the ReMedTM
take-back programme
5. Resource use and circular economy
IRO name Category Sustainability topic Value chain location
Resource use associated with
manufacturing and capacity
expansions
• Resource inflow • Upstream
• Own operations
End-of-life waste from products • Resource outflow • Own operations
• Downstream
Resource waste associated with
manufacturing
• Waste • Own operations
• Downstream
Potential reputational risks
associated with resource use
• Resource inflow
• Resource outflow
• Waste
• Upstream
• Own operations
• Downstream
Material impacts, risks and opportunities
At the core of our Circular for Zero strategy is a commitment to decouple resource use and waste
from our ability to serve growing number of patients. Novo Nordisk depends on resource inflows
such as plastics, glucose, solvents and packaging to produce medicines and devices, and
construction materials to expand manufacturing. Environmental impacts occur across our
operations and value chain, such as at product end-of-life, where limited recycling options for
pharmaceuticals lead to incineration or landfill, e.g., plastic device waste. Production waste is
another key impact, where most waste is sent for recycling and landfill is minimised.
We also recognise reputational risks tied to resource consumption that arise mainly in connection
with the production of our devices.
5.1 Resource inflow, outflow and waste
Policies and approach
Circularity is anchored in our Environmental policy, which states our commitment to designing
out waste and pollution and keeping materials in loops. Our Environmental policy outlines our
commitment to promoting low impact products and processes, when possible, for example by
finding ways to use waste from one process as a resource in another process. We also strive to
source reused, recycled and renewable materials, while always considering patient safety and the
stringent regulatory requirements applicable to the pharmaceutical sector. The processes to
assess impacts and risks involves annual environmental assessments at our production sites and
within product development processes.
We systematically use third-party-validated LCA’s (Life Cycle Assessments) to understand and
reduce product impacts. We prioritise waste avoidance and reduction over waste treatment and
address all levels of the waste hierarchy, from prevention and reuse to recycling, energy recovery
and disposal. For details on chemical and water management, see section 8 'Pollution' and
section 7 'Nature'.
Actions
We focus on plastics and production waste, guided by our target to reduce the plastic footprint
per patient with 30% by 2033 compared to 2024. Ongoing actions include initiatives such as
recycling of ethanol in our production, applying Circular Design Guidelines and innovating
treatment methods that reduce the plastic footprint (e.g., with Awiqli®). To further address waste
from our own products, we have a take-back and recycling scheme called ReMed
TM. As of the end
of 2025, the scheme is scaled up to the national level in Denmark and the UK, while in other
countries (Brazil, France, Italy, Japan and Germany) it is currently available in selected geographic
areas. We also work to enhance packaging circularity for the future.
To address waste associated with production, we continuously work to eliminate landfill waste
from our production sites globally by diverting waste to incineration with energy recovery, other
recovery operations or recycling.
Besides these ongoing actions, we have also implemented the following key actions in 2025
(see next page):
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Prioritised topics / 5. Resource use and circular economy 68
2025 actions
Convert to lower-carbon plastics (non-virgin-fossil alternatives with a lower carbon footprint)
in our medical devices globally by 2033.
• In 2025, first large-scale e-methanol project in Kassø (DK) inaugurated for e-POM
production.
• Target: Reduce scope 3 CO2e emissions by 33% by 2033, Metric: 4.1.4
Fostering circularity in construction of new sites towards 2033.
• In 2025, new LCA thresholds launched to drive sustainable building design and material
choices.
• In 2025, new standard introduced for designing sites for deconstruction and adaptability,
promoting long-term reuse and procurement of more sustainable or recycled materials.
• For our expansion at site Clayton (USA), approximately 46% of civil, architectural and
structural (CSA) materials procured are classified as more sustainable (bio-based, FSCcertified wood, or recycled content); the target for circularity in expansions is to reach 50%..
• Target: Reduce scope 3 CO2e emissions by 33% by 2033, Metric: 4.1.4
Converting to reusable devices by 2033 to treat more patients with reusable devices.
• In 2025, we worked on preparing a cost-efficient reusable injection pen for launch.
• Target: Reduce our plastic footprint per patient by 30% by 2033.
• Metric: 5.1.3 Plastic footprint per patient (kg/patient).
Innovating treatment methods by 2033
• Awiqli® - the world's first once-weekly basal insulin; going from daily to weekly injection
reduces the need for injection pens, thereby reducing the plastic footprint of treatment by
approximately two thirds compared to once daily treatment.
• In 2025, Awiqli® was launched in two additional markets: Italy and Japan.
• Target: Reduce our plastic footprint per patient by 30% by 2033.
• Metric: 5.1.3 Plastic footprint per patient (kg/patient).
Targets and performance
In 2024, we set a voluntary global target to reduce our plastic footprint per patient by 30% by
2033 compared to base year 2024. The scope of the target includes plastic in devices and primary
packaging for obesity and diabetes products. Internal and external experts were involved in
setting the target. In 2024, we did not include primary packaging for needles for which we have
made a restatement for our 2024 base year for both absolute- and relative plastic footprint, as
well as our 2033 target value.
The target addresses both resource inflows and outflows, including the minimisation of primary
raw materials, converting to reusable devices and innovating treatment methods. Achieving this
target requires treating patients with fewer devices and/or delivery solutions with lower plastic
footprints, which addresses both resource inflows and outflows and relates to the waste
prevention layer of the waste hierarchy. In 2025, we achieved a 5% reduction from 0.38 kg/
patient in 2024 to 0.36 kg/patient mainly driven by an increase in once-weekly treatments
combined with a reduction of once-daily treatments (see graph 5.1.3 in the margin).
Resource outflows leaving Novo Nordisk include medicines, injection devices, packaging
materials and waste. Key products aligned with circularity principles are our reusable devices.
A conservative estimate of recyclable content in our products' packaging is 29%, reflecting the
lowest share of recyclable content across they key geographies (Europe, US and Japan) according
to our product lifecycle assessments (LCAs). Some products in certain geographies have a
recyclable content in packaging of 29%, while in other geographies or for other products the
recyclable content can be as high as 92%.
5.1.1 Resource outflows 2025 2024 2023
Plastic footprint (absolute) (tonnes)1
 16,463 17,128 –
Plastic footprint per patient (kg/patient)2 0.36 0.38 –
Recyclable content in products packaging 29% 28% –
1. Plastic footprint (absolute) restated from 15,654 to 17,128 tonnes in 2024 due to the inclusion of primary packaging for
needles. 2. Relative plastic footprint restated from 0.35 to 0.38 in 2024.
With business growth, the total weight of technical and biological materials used in
manufacturing of our medicines increased by 15%. As in 2024, about two-thirds were technical
materials and one-third was biological components. In 2025, we took the first steps to source
glucose from regenerative agriculture, enabling us for the first time to report a share of
sustainably sourced biological materials of 11%.
5.1.2 Resource inflows
1,000 tonnes 2025 2024 2023
Overall total weight of technical and biological materials used 259 226 –
Percentage of biological materials (and biofuels used for nonenergy purposes) that are sustainably sourced 11% 0% –
To address our waste impact, we have a global target of zero landfill from production sites by
2030. In 2025, we refined the methodology to allow up to 0.05% of waste to landfill, e.g., due to
local infrastructure or national regulation.
In 2025, out of a total of 174 tonnes waste directed to landfill, 154 tonnes were generated in
production, corresponding to 0.06% of our total production waste. This represents a 64%
increase compared to production-related waste directed to landfill in 2024 (94 tonnes). This
increase was entirely attributable to recent acquisitions. The acquired sites accounted for over
80% of all waste sent to landfill during 2025.
5.1.3 Plastic footprint
(Plastic footprint per patient, kg/patient/year)
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Prioritised topics / 5. Resource use and circular economy 69
At Novo Nordisk, the major waste streams include non-hazardous organic waste (e.g., yeast
slurry), water waste (hazardous) and ethanol waste (hazardous). Total waste increased by 18%
from 2024 to 2025, driven primarily by a rise in production waste. The increase in production
waste was mainly caused by a temporary shift in the handling of yeast slurry, where it in 2025
was disposed of a higher water content, thereby resulting in a larger volume of production waste.
In 2025, we managed to reduce our hazardous waste by 9% to 48,282 tonnes. The decline was
largely due to lower ethanol and water waste volumes. The share of hazardous waste in total
waste therefore declined.
5.1.4 Resource outflows - Waste
Tonnes 2025 2024 2023
Total
Total waste generated 271,771 229,690 189,091
Non-recycled waste 33,416 34,132 -
Percentage of non-recycled waste 12% 15% -
Hazardous
Total hazardous waste 48,282 52,982
Waste diverted from disposal 24,145 26,713 -
• Preparation for Reuse 43 - -
• Recycling 16,561 14,099 -
• Other recovery operations 7,541 12,614 -
Waste directed to disposal 24,137 26,269 -
• Incineration 24,129 26,022 -
• Landfill 8 0 -
• Other disposal operations 0 247 -
Non-hazardous
Total non-hazardous waste 223,489 176,708
Waste diverted from disposal 214,210 168,845 -
• Preparation for Reuse 981 40 -
• Recycling 197,810 149,853 -
• Other recovery operations 15,419 18,952 -
Waste directed to disposal 9,279 7,863 -
• Incineration 9,113 7,743 -
• Landfill 166 120 638
• Other disposal operations 0 - -
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Overall total weight of technical and biological products and materials
Total amount of materials used in our operations. Technical materials cannot be processed by the
biological cycle, while biological materials can. Total weight includes all raw materials, associated process
materials and semi-manufactured goods or parts sourced into production. Approximately 2% of the total
cannot be categorised into biological or technical material but is still included in the total. No material
was included in both categories to avoid double-counting.
Sustainably sourced biological materials are biological materials grown in a way that preserves the ecosystem without degrading it further but might fall short of being regeneratively produced. Biological
materials sourced from regenerative agriculture or eco-labelled with e.g., FSC or PEFC are included.
Recyclable content in packaging
Novo Nordisk’s definition of recyclable content reflects practical recyclability in line with the Ellen
McArthur Foundation’s definition and the EU Packaging and Packaging Waste Regulation. For recyclable
content in product packaging, data on total packaging weights by geography have not been available
and the metric shows the lower end of the range of recyclable content across markets and
not the weighted average.
Plastic footprint
Absolute plastic footprint is defined as the total amount of plastic placed on the market by Novo Nordisk
in connection with obesity and diabetes products, including plastic from Novo Nordisk devices (pens and
needles) and primary packaging (e.g., cartridges, vials, blister packs and tablet bottles). The metric does
not capture additional plastic used in the process. Plastic footprint per patient refers to the absolute
volume divided by patients reached.
Total waste generated by Novo Nordisk
Waste handled by a certified waste management company, measured by weight receipts or other data
from the waste management company, including all waste fractions and disposal methods. Waste data
for offices and affiliates outside Denmark are extrapolated based on headcount data available for their
Danish counterparts. All waste subcategories are split between hazardous and non-hazardous waste
according to the EU’s Waste Framework Directive. Construction waste is not included.
Non-recycled waste refers to all waste (hazardous and non-hazardous) directed to disposal by
incineration, both with and without energy recovery, by landfill at designated landfill sites and by
other disposal operations.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Prioritised topics / 5. Resource use and circular economy 70
Other material
topics
Workers in the value chain
Nature
Pollution
Business conduct
Ambition
Safeguarding human rights,
protecting labour and social rights
Ensuring safe, secure and healthy
working conditions and preserving the
environment and climate.
Policy
Responsible Sourcing Standard
Human Rights Commitment
Modern Slavery Act Statement
Performance
• 19 Responsible Sourcing Audits
performed in 2025
For more information on supplier
engagement and our Compliance
Hotline, see section 9.2 on page 76
6. Workers in the value chain
IRO name Category Sustainability topic Value chain location
Protect labour rights and health
and safety
• Working
conditions
• Upstream
• Downstream
Potential human rights violations • Other workrelated rights
• Upstream
• Downstream
Material impacts, risks and opportunities
Novo Nordisk depends on a global value chain that spans more than 150 countries and includes
over 54,000 suppliers delivering goods and services. Supplier representation is highest in
Denmark, China and India. Value chain workers include contractors on expansion projects,
manufacturing staff for sourced materials and logistics and warehouse partners. We have
identified higher-risk areas among our direct suppliers related to device components, medical
consumables, primary packaging, construction, warehousing and logistics in specific
geographies. Despite our efforts to minimise negative impacts on value chain workers and
their labour rights, we recognise the risks that exist where suppliers fail to meet our standards.
Past impacts have been linked to health and safety incidents and suppliers’ deficiencies of
supplier due diligence and management systems.
6.1 Working conditions and other work-related rights
Policies and approach
The Novo Nordisk Responsible Sourcing Standards¹ (RSS) set minimum requirements to our
suppliers on responsible business conduct. The RSS covers protection of human, labour and
social rights; prevention of bribery and corruption; environmental protection; and promotion of
good governance, including protection of worker data and privacy. It is aligned with our Human
Rights Commitment2
 that prohibits forced labour, child labour and human trafficking, requiring
suppliers to prevent such practices.
With several global capacity expansion projects underway, we have implemented a new global
minimum construction safety standard, that emphasises safety policies, providing protective
equipment and training of workers.
1.Aligned with UN Guiding Principles, OECD Guidelines, ILO Conventions and the Corporate Sustainability Due Diligence
Directive (CSDDD). 2. Includes the International Bill of Human Rights, ILO Declaration on Fundamental Principles and Rights
at Work and the Convention on the Rights of the Child.
Annually, we provide training to our procurement organisation to reinforce their expertise and
ensure the RSS is consistently incorporated into contracts. To ensure supplier adherence to the
RSS, we conduct risk-based human rights and environmental due diligence to prevent, identify
and address potential negative impacts. When impacts are identified, we develop and implement
preventive measures in collaboration with our suppliers. In cases where Novo Nordisk causes or
contributes to human rights impacts specifically, we commit to providing remedy. We conduct
responsible sourcing audits for selected suppliers at risk-based frequencies. Audits assess
implementation of our RSS through review of documentation, on-site visits and worker
interviews. Besides these efforts, our procurement organisation and local RS Experts maintain
regular engagement with suppliers and their representatives.
Concerns, including human rights grievances, can be reported via our Compliance Hotline.
For more information on the Hotline, see section 9.2 on p. 76. Suppliers are required to
establish anonymous grievance mechanisms to ensure employees can raise issues without
fear of retaliation.
Actions
We continuously strengthen our human rights and environmental due diligence processes using
our due diligence tool. Full implementation of the tool is targeted by 2028. Throughout 2025, we
continued our phased-in approach to ensure the RSS were included in all new and renegotiated
contracts. We conducted 19 responsible sourcing audits (see accounting policy in section 9
'Business Conduct' p. 79). Where policy breaches were identified, we issued corrective action
plans and monitored timely resolution and remediation.
Besides these ongoing actions, we have also implemented the following key action in 2025:
2025 actions
Implementation of supplier due diligence tool
• The tool enables automated risk screenings, covering areas such as human rights,
environmental impacts and governance. The aim is to further strengthen responsible
sourcing across our supply chain in compliance with evolving regulation.
• In 2025, we have initiated configuration of the tool with the future scope being active
suppliers with spend recorded in the latest 12 months.
• We will continue configurations and implementation of the supplier due diligence
tool in 2026.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Other material topics / 6. Workers in the value chain 71
Other material
topics
Workers in the value chain
Nature
Pollution
Business conduct
Ambition
We aim to halt the loss of nature
by 2033 and become nature positive
by 2045 as guided by the Nature
Roadmap.
Policy
Environmental policy
Performance
• Water withdrawal increased 15%
since 2024
Nature roadmap
Approved in 2024, implementation
will run from 2025–2045 and cover
our entire value chain.
Five broad ambitions
• Avoid degradation of land
• Reduce our relative impact on
water at priority sites
• Restore biodiversity at
priority sites
• Initiate restoration projects
• Reduce and replace glucose
7. Nature
IRO name Category Sustainability topic Value chain location
Reliance on water resources
and quality
• Water withdrawal
• Water discharge
• Upstream
• Own operations
• Downstream
Potential water scarcity risks • Water withdrawal • Upstream
• Own operations
Reliance on natural resources
and ecosystems
• Direct impact
drivers
• Impacts on the
condition of
ecosystems
• Impacts and
dependencies on
ecosystem
services
• Upstream
• Own operations
• Downstream
Dependency on vulnerable species
for safety testing
• Impact on the
state of species
• Upstream
• Own operations
Material impacts, risks and opportunities
As illustrated in 7.1.3 on the following page, our nature impacts occur through sourcing of raw
materials of agricultural and forestry origin, where freshwater use, land-use change, deforestation
and pollution (e.g., pesticides) can degrade ecosystems and lead to loss of natural habitats. We rely
on natural resources, in particular agricultural inputs (such as glucose), forestry products (like paper),
fossil-based materials (plastic) and other materials (such as glass) that can create dependencies that
expose Novo Nordisk to short-, medium- and long-term risks that impact nature within areas such as
water, biodiversity and land.
The processes used to assess nature-related impacts are aligned with Science Based Targets
Network (SBTN) and are based on primary activity data, lifecycle assessment databases and
data on the state of nature in our value chain. Physical and transition risks were assessed
through the World Wildlife Fund Biodiversity Risk Filter and through a qualitative scenario
analysis, while dependencies on nature were assessed using the ENCORE (Exploring Natural
Capital Opportunities, Risks and Exposure) tool. Water-related risks were assessed through
production site screenings using the World Resources Institute’s Aqueduct 4.0 tool and local
water risk assessments. In 2025, we submitted our SBTN step 1 and 2 assessment (impacts
and priorities) for validation by the Accountability Accelerator.
Water is a critical resource for manufacturing Novo Nordisk’s products and for sourcing key
commodities in our supply chain. For Novo Nordisk, risks related to water include potential water
scarcity at production sites and in our supply chain and stricter water quality regulations in
pharmaceutical production.
Novo Nordisk also depends on certain species, notably horseshoe crabs, whose blood is used for
endotoxin testing to ensure the safety of our products (see also section 9.5 'Bioethics and animal
welfare', p. 78). To reduce our negative impact, we no longer use products from endangered
horseshoe crab species (Tachypleus sp./TAL) and are working to phase out the use of products
from vulnerable horseshoe crab species (Limulus sp./LAL).
7.1 Water withdrawal and discharge, and biodiversity
Policies and approach
Guided by our nature roadmap, our Environmental policy addresses key drivers of biodiversity
loss such as water- and land use, over-exploitation, pollution and climate change to mitigate
material impacts. We adhere to our nature roadmap aimed at contributing to a nature positive
future in alignment with the Global Biodiversity Framework. We commit to protecting and
restoring nature by managing impacts, dependencies and risks, collaborating with suppliers
on sustainable land, forest and water management.
The Environmental policy applies to all owned, leased, or managed operations, including those
near biodiversity-sensitive areas, and covers water withdrawal for production sites and suppliers
operating in areas of water stress. We aim to design water-efficient processes by reusing and
recycling water, and ensuring production-related wastewater is treated according to regulations.
While we do not yet have a formal deforestation policy, our nature roadmap sets an ambition for
a deforestation- and conversion-free (DCF) value chain. We collaborate with our suppliers on raw
material traceability.
Transition and physical nature risks assessment
To inform the development of our nature roadmap, we conducted a high-level resilience analysis
of the exposure of our current business model to ecosystem-related risks. The analysis assumed
two scenarios - one where we meet our nature ambitions and one where we do not with
continuous nature degradation towards 2030 and 2050. The scope included upstream value
chain of strategic raw materials in selected geographies, water withdrawal in our own operations
and chemicals in water discharge. The results indicated that implementation of the roadmap
could decrease our exposure to nature-related risks linked to raw material shortage and
emerging deforestation regulation and highlighted the need for continued focus on water
management. Novo Nordisk has therefore identified resource optimisation and reducing and
replacing glucose as nature-related opportunities.


––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Other material topics / 7. Nature 72
Actions
Through our nature roadmap, we have identified priority sites for action on biodiversity
and water (see table 7.1.1). Priority sites (for water; and water and biodiversity) account for
approximately 70% of the total water withdrawal. In 2025, we have mapped potential water
savings at Kalundborg and Hillerød and will continue with the process for other priority sites
setting savings targets for 2028.
7.1.1 Priority sites
Water Chartres (FR), Tianjin (CN)
Water and biodiversity Kalundborg (DK), Hillerød (DK), Montes Claros (BR), Clayton (US)
Biodiversity Durham (US), New Hampshire (US), Tietgenbyen (DK), Bagsværd (DK), Køge (DK)
Priority sites for biodiversity action were identified based on impact and proximity to natural
habitats or protected areas. With our ongoing actions we aim to reduce biodiversity impact and
to enhance water conditions near production sites including replenishment, to ensure positive
impacts by 2033. We initiated nature restoration projects near our priority sites, incorporating local
knowledge, currently in China, with further projects planned in Brazil and USA.
2025 actions
Engaging priority suppliers water stewardship programme towards 2033
• Screened and prioritised suppliers for engagement on water stewardship based on their
water risks and maturity on the topic.
Saving water and increasing wastewater treatment
• Phasing out surface water withdrawal from Lake Tissø through industrial collaboration in
Kalundborg (DK). Completion expected in 2026, with projected annual savings of 400,000 m3
• Expansion of on-site wastewater treatment operated by Novonesis, increasing the industrial
wastewater and biomass treatment capacity. Completion expected in 2026.
• Metric: 7.1.2 Water.
Avoiding degradation of land in supply chain by sourcing glucose from regenerative
agriculture. Programme running until 2033.
• Supplier engagement to transition our glucose to regenerative sources to restore soils and
reduce nature and carbon impacts.
• In 2025, more than 10% of the glucose we sourced was from regenerative sources.
• Metric: 4.1.4
Nature restoration near priority sites
• In 2025, we entered into a partnership with Conservation International to restore 170
hectares of forest in the same water basin as our production site in Tianjin (China).
• We made a landmark investment in a carbon removal initiative with Re.green to restore 500
hectares of Amazon rainforest in Brazil and capture over 87,000 tonnes of CO2
 over the
project’s lifetime across 20 years.
The majority of pressure on nature occurs through our sourcing of raw materials (see 7.1.3),
particularly paper, cardboard and glucose. As part of our nature roadmap, to avoid the degradation
of land, we are taking key actions, for example engaging with suppliers to source glucose from
regenerative agriculture. We have also initiated the groundwork internally to ensure that our supply
chain is in compliance with upcoming regulations such as the EU Deforestation Regulation 2026.
We are continuously working on minimising and phasing out the use of biological products from
vulnerable and endangered species, including LAL from the horseshoe crab, with most testing
expected to end by 2027 (pending regulatory approval), and full discontinuation targeted for
2025–2035, both related to the internal Novo Nordisk processes.
Performance
In 2025, water withdrawals increased 15% primarily due to acquisitions of five production sites.
Our savings programme delivered 112,000 m3
 in savings, with additional 408,000 m3
 estimated as
water reused or recycled at our production facilities. We have not defined external water targets;
however, as a part of our 2024 nature roadmap, we aim to reduce relative water impact at priority
sites, with savings plans and targets in place by 2028.
7.1.2 Water
1,000 m3 2025 2024 2023
Total water withdrawal 5,988 5,213 4,150
Total water discharge 5,275 4,583 –
Total water recycled and reused 408 416 –
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Total water withdrawal
Includes all types of water such as drinking water, industrial water, steam water, water from remediation
wells and rainwater. Data are based on meter readings and invoices (primary data). Data for offices and
affiliates outside Denmark are extrapolated based on data available for their Danish counterparts
(approximately 97% of the total is based on primary data).
Total water discharge
Includes discharge of process and sanitary water and discharge from storm water to outside Novo Nordisk’s
boundaries, and water discharge used for irrigation. For sites where metered discharge data are not
available, it has been assumed that water discharge equals water withdrawal.
Total water recycled and reused
Total quantity of water and water discharge (treated or untreated) that has been used more than once
at the production sites before being discharged. The volume is estimated based on key indicators for
specific water treatment equipment and technologies available at the sites. This includes steam
condensate returned to steam generator, reverse osmosis water treatment and water discharge used
for irrigation. The metric is estimated with a conservative approach.
7.1.3 Impact on Nature1
(%)
1. Nature Baseline Assessment for Novo Nordisk
conducted in 2025. Nature impact represents the
average contribution (%) of each category to the
impact from seven distinct nature pressures.
2. Raw material used in the production of tablets
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Other material topics / 7. Nature 73
Other material
topics
Workers in the value chain
Nature
Pollution
Business conduct
Ambition
Our ambition is to take ownership to
reduce the use of toxic chemicals and
minimise pharmaceuticals in the
environment.
Policy overview
Environmental policy
Performance
• Substances of very high concern
declined overall since 2024
Our chemical roadmap
Approved in 2025, implementation will
run from 2026–2033 and cover our
entire value chain.
Four focus areas to reduce SVHCs:
• Design products
• Design processes
• Optimise and scale production
• Develop data tools and enablers
8. Pollution
IRO name Category Sustainability topic Value chain location
Use of chemicals to produce
medicines, devices and packaging
• Substances of very
high concern
• Upstream
• Own operations
• Downstream
Material impacts, risks and opportunities
Novo Nordisk relies on biological processes and chemicals to produce medicines, devices and
packaging. Our material impact is primarily linked to active pharmaceutical ingredient (API)
production, which uses substances of very high concern (SVHCs) and other substances with
same inherent properties1
, such as solvents. These can harm health and ecosystems if not
handled safely. Almost all SVHCs and similar substances are subsequently collected as waste
during production processes. Very small concentrations leave as emissions to air and water or
in our products, primarily in devices or as preservatives for medicines.
8.1 Substances of very high concern
Policies and approach
Our Environmental policy commits us to responsible chemical management and to proactively
eliminating SVHCs, similar substances and pollution. We strive to avoid the use of SVHCs
and similar substances, when developing or designing new products and processes, whether
own operations or outsourced, and to minimise or substitute their use for existing treatments.
We reuse chemicals where feasible and ensure compliance with production site-specific
environmental permits. We conduct annual environmental assessments at all production sites,
covering waste, noise, water use/discharge, air, soil and groundwater. Breaches of regulatory
terms are registered as a non-conformity, investigated and corrective actions implemented.
Actions
In 2025, we developed a new chemical roadmap to steer our efforts for the coming years
based on two priorities: reducing SVHCs and similar substances and minimising the release of
pharmaceuticals in the environment. We track the use of chemicals through various internal
KPIs and environmental assessments. We work with innovation projects across in-house and
outsourced production to reduce product impacts. During the product development process we
screen for SVHCs and similar substances. Most medicines in our current portfolio and pipeline
(e.g., CagriSema, Cagrilintide, IcoSema, Amycretin) are expected to be readily biodegradable and
assessed to have no significant impact on the environment2
.
1. SVHCs are chemicals that have serious irreversible effects on human health or the environment, in accordance with
REACH. Other substances with similar inherent properties, but currently not classified as SVHCs are referred to as ‘similar
substances’ in the remainder of this chapter 2. The assessment has been performed according to the European Medicines
Agency’s Environmental Risk Assessment guideline.
Besides these ongoing actions, we have also implemented the following key actions in 2025:
2025 actions
Reducing SVHCs and similar substances in production of medicines
• Scope includes own production, contract manufacturers and suppliers.
• In 2025, we optimised the manufacturing processes for Ozempic® and Wegovy®, oral
GLP-1 products for obesity and diabetes and reduced the use of SVHCs in the process.
• Metric: 8.1.1
Performance
In 2025, procurement of SVHCs for our production decreased by 19%. We plan to further reduce
their use through substitution or by purifying materials for reuse, which is part of our chemical
roadmap. SVHCs leaving Novo Nordisk as emissions remained on par with 2024. In 2025, we
identified a new SVHC in our devices and updated our 2024 data accordingly. This SVHC will be
fully decommissioned by 2026, a culmination of one of our internal innovation projects, which
is a development already seen in the 2025 performance of the metric.
8.1.1 Substances of very high concern
Tonnes 2025 2024 2023
Total amount of substances of very high concern that are procured 1,500 1,859 -
Total amount of substances of very high concern leaving facilities as
emissions, as products, or as part of products 0.8 1.5 -
• Substances leaving facilities as emissions1
 0.3 0.3 -
• Substances leaving facilities as products, or part of products2
 0.5 1.2 -
1. 2024 value was overestimated and had to be restated from 1 to 0.3 tonnes. 2. 2024 value was restated from 0.003 to 1.2
tonnes due to a new SVHC identified in our devices.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Disclosures in Table 8.1.1 are manually calculated and carry a high degree of uncertainty. Substance weights
are based on known concentrations; where this information is missing, we assume a concentration of 100%,
which may lead to overestimation. The list of materials may not be fully complete. Hazard class categorisation
is not applicable to substances of very high concern.
Total amount of substances of very high concern (SVHCs) that are procured comprise the total weight of
substances procured into production. Data sources include receipts of materials and purchase orders
mapped against a chemical database.
Total amount of SVHCs that leave facilities as emissions to air or water are based on available data for Denmark
for our API production, Chemistry, Manufacturing and Control processes and Aseptic Manufacturing.
Total amount of SVHCs that leave Novo Nordisk as products or part of products are defined as SVHCs identified
either in excipients or devices. Data sources include production data (with final product quantities), bills of
materials and purchase orders mapped against a chemical database.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Other material topics / 8. Pollution 74
Other material
topics
Workers in the value chain
Nature
Pollution
Business conduct
Ambition
We define good ethics as conducting
every interaction in a way that
protects trust, prevents harm and
promotes fairness, ensuring that our
values are consistently embedded in
daily practice and rooted in the
practices of our founders.
Policy
OneCode policy
Labour Code of Conduct
Responsible Sourcing Standard
Bioethics policy
Performance
• Total supplier audits decreased by
6% since 2024
• Animals purchased for research
decreased 5% since 2024
9. Business conduct
IRO name Category Sustainability topic Value chain location
Promoting Novo Nordisk Way • Corporate culture • Own operations
Treating stakeholders in line with
ethical standards
• Protection of
whistleblowers
• Corruption and
bribery
• Management of
relationships with
suppliers
• Political influence
and lobbying
• Upstream
• Own operations
• Downstream
Potential risks associated with breach
of anti-corruption legislation
• Corruption and
Bribery
• Upstream
• Own operations
• Downstream
Promoting public health • Political
engagement and
lobbying
• Downstream
Promoting bioethics • Bioethics • Own operations
Reliance on animals
in research
• Animal welfare • Upstream
• Own operations
Material impacts, risks and opportunities
The impacts and risks we have identified underpin our business model and strategy. We uphold
ethics through integrity, anti-corruption, fair competition and protection of whistleblowers,
safeguarding patient trust and market access. A strong corporate culture is promoted through
the Novo Nordisk Way (NNWay), reinforcing ethical behaviour, accountability and compliance.
Transparent advocacy and responsible political engagement and lobbying support healthcare
resilience. Clear supplier expectations and responsible supplier management promote
transparency and sustainability, reducing ethical, social and environmental risks.
Stakeholder interests, including patients, healthcare professionals, suppliers and regulators, are
integrated through structured engagement, supported by robust frameworks to prevent
corruption, bribery and undue influence.
High bioethical standards are central to protecting patients, research participants and society.
Reliance on animals in research remains material to ensuring the safety, efficacy and quality of
medicines, and we are committed to animal welfare and the continued pursuit of alternatives.
Across these areas, we embed governance, training, due diligence and stakeholder consultation
to reinforce resilience, preserve trust and align responsibility with long-term business growth.
9.1 Corporate culture
Policies and approach
Our corporate culture is embedded in the Novo Nordisk Way and its 10 essentials (see right-side
margin on the following page), which establishes expectations for how we act. Guided by the
Board of Directors and Executive Management, our culture ensures that ethical principles are
consistently acted on, shaping behaviours across the organisation and aligning business growth
with integrity. Our OneCode policy translates these principles into practice, guiding all employees
and third parties working on Novo Nordisk’s behalf in areas such as ethical decision making,
workplace standards and our speak-up culture.
We implement ongoing actions through our compliance framework, including annual Novo
Nordisk Way facilitations, training, awareness programmes, supplier audits and whistleblowing
procedures, which are embedded in our day-to-day governance and operations. We monitor
adherence through reputational scores, engagement surveys and hotline reporting. We initiate
follow-up action plans across all affiliates and sites on an ongoing basis with yearly cycles, with
corrective measures implemented where gaps are identified and progress tracked.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Other material topics / 9. Business conduct 75
Performance
A team of facilitators evaluates the adherence to the Novo Nordisk Way on selected units based
on rotation every year. The units facilitated in 2025 represent 18,000 employees with interviews
of ~3,000 employees and 800 close collaborators. One unit was found to be not operating in line
with the NNWay and two units were assessed as borderline in their NNWay compliance.
Immediate actions have been initiated, which if not taken would have lead to breaches of the
Novo Nordisk Way. All other units were found in compliance, requiring no immediate actions.
Key improvement opportunities reflected the increasingly volatile and competitive market
environment in which Novo Nordisk operates in.
9.1.1 Facilitations of the Novo Nordisk Way
Number 2025 2024 2023
Facilitations of the Novo Nordisk Way 63 51 42
9.2 Anti-corruption and anti-bribery
Policies and approach
Our commitment to integrity is reflected in the OneCode policy, which prohibits any form of
bribery and corruption in our operations and the value chain. Novo Nordisk integrates these
into daily practice.
Ethics and compliance training is mandatory for all employees globally. Annual e-learning and
testing ensure awareness of anti-corruption and anti-bribery obligations, with completion rates
monitored and followed up. Both shareholder-elected members and employee representatives of
the Board of Directors receive annual training in our OneCode policy. Novo Nordisk has not
formally defined functions at risk, but our policy applies to all employees and third parties acting
on our behalf.
Procedures are in place to prevent, detect and address allegations or incidents of corruption and
bribery across all operations. Group Internal Audit conduct regular reviews and operate
independently of management when investigating cases. Outcomes and trends from significant
investigations are reported to the Audit Committee and Executive Management on a quarterly
basis. Sanctions are guided globally by intent and frequency, applied consistently and in line with
local laws and agreements.
Employees and stakeholders can report ethical or legal concerns via our Compliance Hotline, which
offers multiple formats and guarantees confidentiality, anonymity and protection from retaliation.
Reports may address ethics breaches, financial misconduct, fraud, bribery, corruption, antitrust or
data privacy violations, quality- or environmental issues, deviations from the Novo Nordisk Way,
other serious offences such as espionage, sabotage, or information security breaches and animal
use concerns (see section 9.5 'Bioethics and animal welfare, on page 78) and human rights
considerations. Reports are investigated promptly, independently and objectively, and outcomes are
monitored to ensure accountability and continuous improvement. The Compliance Hotline is
regularly reviewed and independently assessed to ensure trust
.
We have zero tolerance for retaliation or discrimination against whistleblowers, good-faith reporters,
supporting parties, or investigation participants as outlined in our anti-retaliation policy.
Any retaliation against employees reporting misconduct will result in disciplinary action, including
possible termination. The reporting channel 'Compliance Hotline' is described in detail both internally,
on the intranet and externally, on the Novo Nordisk website. The mandatory annual compliance
training courses also cover how to report suspected misconduct in a secure and confidential manner
through the Compliance Hotline. Protections comply with the EU Whistleblowing Directive
(2019/1937), with adherence to local laws during investigations outside Europe.
Performance
We continue to have almost full coverage of our global mandatory ethics and compliance
training. Measures such as the annual Ethics Days support awareness, and we will continue to
assess such initiatives in the future to strengthen performance. The amount of fines for violation
of anti-corruption and anti-bribery laws was zero in 2025. In 2025, 261 substantiated cases were
reported via the Compliance Hotline relating to accounting fraud and business ethics, which is
an 8% increase compared to 2024. For substantiated cases, Novo Nordisk follows prescribed
procedures to provide remedy.
9.2.1 Anti-corruption and anti-bribery
Number 2025 2024 2023
Employees trained in ethics and compliance 99% 99% 99%
Convictions for violation of anti-corruption and anti-bribery laws
–
–
–
Substantiated cases reported within accounting issues, fraud
and business ethics matters via the Compliance Hotline 261 242 221
9.3 Management of relationships with suppliers
Policy and approach
Our Global Procurement policy governs contracting from qualification and tendering to invoicing
and spend management. It applies to indirect spend, while goods and services used in
manufacturing are covered by dedicated internal standard operating procedures. We aim to
promote transparency, fair treatment and sustainability through our engagement, while
monitoring and mitigating ethical, social and environmental risks across the supply chain in line
with the UN Guiding Principles on Business and Human Rights (see section 6 on 'Workers in the
value chain', p. 71).
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Other material topics / 9. Business conduct 76
We perform two types of supplier audits: quality audits and responsible sourcing audits. Quality
audits qualify new suppliers and monitor performance through regular audits with risk-based
frequencies, while audit requirements depend on usage categories and are governed through
our manufacturing setup. Responsible sourcing audits cover factors such as country of operation
and supplier spend. Procurement decisions are guided by our Responsible Sourcing Standards.
We screen and evaluate suppliers and promote partnerships with preferred suppliers who
demonstrate continuous improvement, innovation and reliable delivery. E-sourcing and
e-auction tools ensure fast, fair and transparent negotiations.
Performance
The number of supplier audits have been reduced from 429 in 2024 to 403 in 2025, which is
within the normal fluctuation associated with routine audits and requests for qualification audits.
We continue to focus on conducting supplier audits as a key tool for identifying potential
deviations from Novo Nordisk’s policies. No critical findings related to responsible sourcing or
quality audits were issued during 2025.
9.3.1 Supplier audits
Number 2025 2024 2023
Total supplier audits 403 429 382
Our standard payment term is 60 days, for SMEs this is 30 days to ensure timely payments. In
2025, the overall average time to pay invoices increased by 5% mainly due to longer clearing time
after processing and due to a general extension of payment terms. Percentage of payments
aligned with standard payment terms defined in our Payment Guideline has increased by 2%
points overall since 2024. We remain firmly committed to preventing late payments, particularly
for small enterprises, and had no outstanding legal proceedings related to late payments in 2025.
9.3.2 Payment practices
Days 2025 2024 2023
Average number of days to pay invoice 44 42 –
• Small suppliers 26 24 –
• Large suppliers 50 49 –
Percentage of payments aligned with standard
payment terms 85% 83% –
• Small suppliers 82% 77% –
• Large suppliers 85% 84% –
Outstanding legal proceedings for late payments (Number) 0 0 –
9.4 Political influence and lobbying activities
Policies and approach
Our OneCode policy sets out clear commitments for ethical political engagement. We stand by the
objectives of having patients’ interests as our priority, acting with professionalism and integrity.
We apply a zero-tolerance policy on offering any undue influence, gifts, or favours to public officials
or decision-makers, including zero-tolerance with regards to in-kind political contributions. No
member of our Board of Directors has held a comparable position in public administration in the
two years preceding their appointment. Our lobbying activities primarily focus on public health
policy and access to medicines and are intended to support the material positive impact identified
in the DMA related to promoting public health.
We participate in national and international industry associations to advance broad policy issues.
Memberships are regularly assessed for alignment with Novo Nordisk’s objectives and advocacy
priorities. We support industry-wide initiatives and regulations that promote: evidence-based
chronic disease prevention, patient care and healthcare resilience through innovation, sustainable
pharma practices and optimal conditions for discovery. We ensure transparent disclosure of
advocacy priorities and provide global staff guidance. Lobbying in the EU and US is reported
annually, reviewed, corrected when needed and tracked through yearly activity and expenditure
reports. We are registered in the EU Transparency Register (REG no. 29570313329-11).
Actions
Through our engagement with various stakeholders, such as industry and trade associations,
we have taken actions for the implementation of our objectives.
Besides these ongoing actions, we have also implemented the following key actions in 2025:
2025 actions
Advocacy via EFPIA
• Advocacy via the EFPIA Obesity Policy Platform to advance care for people living with
obesity, recognise it as a relapsing chronic disease and highlight its economic burden.
• Ongoing collaboration with the EFPIA Health Systems Working Group to tackle key
challenges to health system resilience.
Advocacy via European Diabetes Forum
• Advocacy through the European Diabetes Forum for policy change that enables healthcare
systems to better manage diabetes care.
Approach to suppliers and
sustainability
We engage suppliers through a riskbased approach, guided by global
standards (UNGP, OECD, CSDDD),
with audits, corrective actions and
continuous improvement
requirements.
Our supplier selection and
management embed sustainability
criteria, ensuring labour rights
including health and safety, human
rights, and environmental
stewardship are central to every
partnership.
We hold suppliers accountable
through due diligence, requiring
documentation, risk assessments
and enforcing consequences for
non-compliance.
RSS applies globally but we emphasise
proportionate support for SMEs,
enabling inclusion of smaller and local
suppliers in our supply chain.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Other material topics / 9. Business conduct 77
Performance
In 2025, a new metric on financial political contributions was introduced, namely 'Amount
disclosed in the EU Transparency Register'. The metric replaced the previously reported metric
'Trade association membership fees' to ensure greater consistency with peers and use already
publicly available data. The financial contributions are paid to target EU pharmaceutical-related
policy, as well as broader health, environmental and business-related policy. In accordance with
our zero-tolerance policy, we did not make any in-kind political contributions in 2025.
9.4.1 Financial and in-kind political contributions made
mDKK 2025 2024 2023
Amount disclosed in the EU Transparency Register 8.2–9 – –
In-kind political contributions made – – –
9.5 Bioethics and animal welfare
Policies and approach
Our Bioethics policy sets operational guidelines for R&D to uphold high global ethical standards
in research involving people, animals, human materials and gene technology. These extend to
partners, Contract Research Organizations (CROs) and suppliers with performance monitored
through oversight processes. Our commitments are detailed in publicly available position
statements on clinical trials, human biosamples, animal ethics, gene therapy and technology.
We uphold high standards of animal welfare, fully aligning with EU Directive 2010/63/EU and
the Marseille Declaration, and collaborating with regulators, NGOs, researchers and welfare
organisations1
 to advance ethics and transparency. Our Bioethics policy embeds these strict
welfare requirements for all animals purchased for research, whether conducted in-house or
by contractors. It follows the 3R principles (Replace, Reduce, Refine) and sets clear standards
for animal housing, care, transport and health monitoring, ensuring every precaution has been
considered. As mentioned under section 7 'Nature', we continuously work on minimising the use
of products from vulnerable and endangered species such as the horseshoe crab. Use of nonhuman primates is approached with care and consideration, and is limited to cases only where
necessary, i.e. where homology to the human genome is essential when testing potential new
therapies. Oversight mechanisms include veterinarians, animal unit managers and our Ethical
Review Council, which reviews all studies involving living and sentient animals performed at, or
on behalf of, Novo Nordisk.
1. These include the Danish Animal Welfare Society, the UK’s Royal Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals, the
Danish Association of the Pharmaceutical Industry and the Universities Federation for Animal Welfare.
Performance
The number of animals purchased for research in 2025 has decreased by 5% compared to 2024,
due to our continuous efforts to reduce the number of animals used in research. In 2025, 96% of
the animals were rodents. The increased use of dogs and non-human primates in 2025 are driven
by an increased number of late-stage research projects in the portfolio (pre-clinical development),
resulting in a higher demand for regulatory-required studies. It also reflects the nature and
maturity of the research projects, where species qualification determines the number needed
for testing in dogs and non-human primates.
9.5.1 Animals purchased for research
Number 2025 2024 2023
Mice, rats and other rodents 44,917 47,478 54,410
Pigs 521 615 608
Rabbits 214 689 289
Dogs 529 126 356
Non-human primates 475 366 807
Fish 202 0 36
Other vertebrates 11 10 2
Total animals purchased 46,869 49,284 56,508
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Other material topics / 9. Business conduct 78
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Facilitations of the Novo Nordisk Way
A facilitation is an internal process for assessing adherence to the Novo Nordisk Way. The number of
facilitations is measured as the number of facilitations completed. The assessments are based on a review of
documentation and feedback from stakeholders, followed by an on-site visit during which randomly selected
employees and management are interviewed. Identified gaps and improvement opportunities related to the
Novo Nordisk Way are presented to, and discussed with, Executive Management. The facilitators and
Executive Management agree on an action plan to address any gaps and improvement opportunities.
Employees trained in ethics and compliance
The mandatory ethics and compliance training for employees working at Novo Nordisk comprises globally
applicable e-learning. The percentage of employees trained is calculated as the number of employees that
have completed the training divided by the total number of employees (invited to the training) at year-end.
We exclude employees on long-term leave, externals as well as student assistants
Number and amount of convictions for violation of anti-corruption and anti-bribery laws
Anti-corruption and anti-bribery instances where any reported undertaking including parent or affiliated
entities has been found in violation by a court of law. Disclosures include incidents involving actors in our
value chain only where Novo Nordisk or its employees are directly involved.
Substantiated cases of accounting, fraud and business ethics reported via the Compliance Hotline
Number of cases reported to the Compliance Hotline, where reported allegations of suspected
misconduct have been substantiated or partially substantiated (partially substantiated is defined as an
allegation which encompasses several aspects, but only a subset of them can be confirmed). When a case
has been substantiated or partially substantiated, corrective actions are initiated.
Average number of days to pay invoice
Average number of days it takes Novo Nordisk to settle an invoice from the invoice date (when
contractual or statutory term of payment starts to be calculated) until the invoice has been cleared.
The three fill-finish Catalent sites acquired in 2024 are not included in this metric for 2025. SME invoices
are measured against a 30-day standard, i.e. the proportion of SME invoices paid within 30 days of issue.
For non-SME invoices, performance is measured against the actual due date stated on the invoice, in line
with the contractually agreed payment terms (most commonly 60 days, but other terms may apply).
Percentage of payments aligned with standard payment terms
Includes all transactions where the invoice cycle time is equal to or less than the specified payment
terms, divided by the total number of transactions. Small suppliers (with less than DKK 1 million in
spend over the last twelve months) are measured based on 30-day payment terms, other suppliers
are assessed using payment terms from the invoice document recorded in our internal systems. The
three fill-finish Catalent sites acquired in 2024 are not included in this metric for 2025.
Number of outstanding legal proceedings for late payments
Number of all outstanding legal proceedings (litigation or arbitration) for late payment.
Supplier audits
Total number of supplier audits, concluded by Novo Nordisk’s Corporate Quality and Inspections
function, consisting of the number of responsible sourcing audits and quality audits conducted at
suppliers, selected using various risk parameters. Audits for responsible sourcing are conducted
according to Novo Nordisk’s Responsible Sourcing Standard to ensure compliance. In addition, suppliers
of goods and services used in the manufacture of Novo Nordisk pharmaceuticals are subject to extensive
quality audits in accordance with different quality standards, including third-party audits. The three fillfinish Catalent sites acquired in 2024 are not included in this metric for 2025.
Amount disclosed in the EU Transparency Register
Novo Nordisk discloses the annual costs in DKK related to activities (lobbying and advocacy activities)
covered by the EU Transparency Register for the reporting year.
In-kind political contributions
In-kind contributions can include advertising, use of facilities, design and printing, donation of
equipment, provision of board membership, employment or consultancy work for elected politicians
or candidates for office.
Animals purchased for research
Number of animals purchased for all research undertaken by Novo Nordisk, either in-house or by
external contractors. It is based on internal registration of purchased animals and yearly reports from
external contractors.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / Other material topics / 9. Business conduct 79
10. EU Taxonomy
On 04 July 2025, the European Commission introduced simplification measures for the EU
Taxonomy under a new Delegated Act, effective 1 January 2026 and applicable to the 2025
financial year. We have chosen to adopt the new rules already for financial year 2025.
Taxonomy-eligibility- and alignment
To identify potentially eligible economic activities, we have screened all the activities listed in our
financial statement and cross-referenced them with the EU Taxonomy’s list of eligible activities.
In performing the screening, we have only considered activities that were contributing to at least
10% cumulatively of the relevant KPI. For non-material economic activities, please refer to the
'Additional Sustainability statement information' p. 135. The eligibility screening resulted in the
following activities being identified as relevant to Novo Nordisk:
• 7.1 Construction of new buildings (environmental objective 'Climate change mitigation'):
Relevant for CapEx (eligibility and alignment)
• 7.2 Renovation of existing buildings (environmental objective 'Climate change mitigation'):
Relevant for CapEx (eligibility)
• 1.2 Manufacture of medicinal products (environmental objective 'Pollution prevention and
control'): Relevant for the Turnover and CapEx KPIs (eligibility)
Novo Nordisk adjusted EU Taxonomy overview1 Turnover CapEx
2025 2025
Environmental objective Economic activity (mDKK) (%) (mDKK) (%)
Total Turnover and CapEx 309,064 100 94,249 100
Not assessed activities considered non-material 0 0 2,491 3
Taxonomy-non-eligible activities 0 0 26,282 28
Climate change mitigation 7.1 Construction of new buildings 17,298 18
7.2 Renovation of existing buildings 2,472 3
Pollution prevention and control 1.2 Manufacture of medicinal products 309,064 100 39,871 42
Eligible not aligned 309,064 100 59,641 63
Eligible and aligned 7.1 Construction of new buildings 0 0 5,835 6
1. See mandatory reporting templates Tables 5a, 5b and 5c in 'Additional Sustainability statement information' on p. 135 and 136
Performance
Novo Nordisk has assessed the technical screening criteria for eligible economic activities
deemed material. The summary for 2025 can be seen below:
• 7.1: 6% of our CapEx investments in 2025 related to new building constructions are Taxonomyaligned. In addition to the two major ongoing construction projects that we began aligning to
Taxonomy requirements last year, three more construction projects meet the criteria for
Taxonomy-alignment. While certain criteria have yet to be fulfilled due to the relevant
construction phases not being reached, we are confident in their fulfilment based on precalculations from the design phases and the implementation of appropriate controls
throughout the entire construction process. With regard to our assumptions from the previous
year, there are no changes.
• 7.2: We were not able to claim alignment for this activity in 2025, and we do not currently have
any plans to pursue alignment in the future.
• 1.2: In continuation of our assessment of alignment criteria focused on our Danish
manufacturing sites for Ozempic® and Wegovy®, we have explored opportunities to close
gaps where feasible. We still face challenges in securing evidence for, or addressing the
practical aspects of certain criteria. In light of the review of the existing EU Taxonomy
screening criteria related to the EU Omnibus package, we have decided to await the revised
and updated requirements before proceeding further.
EU Taxonomy
The EU Taxonomy is a classification
system with a shared definition of
economic activities identified as
environmentally sustainable, in
accordance with established technical
criteria.
Contextual information about
the KPIs
• We consider all Novo Nordisk’s
turnover Taxonomy-eligible under
economic activity 1.2 'Manufacture
of medicinal products'.
• Taxonomy-eligible CapEx includes
only CapEx directly associated with
the manufacturing process or
related to construction or renovation
of buildings; intangible assets are
included (excluding goodwill).
• Eligible CapEx mainly relates to
equipment for manufacture of
medicinal products and additions to
property, plant and equipment, as
per note 3.3 'Property, plant and
equipment' on p. 96 in the
Consolidated financial statement
For a description of our Taxonomy
disclosure process, incl. substantial
contribution and 'do no significant
harm' (DNSH), accounting policies and
the mandatory reporting templates,
please refer to the 'Additional
Sustainability statement information',
p. 135.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Sustainability statement / 10. EU Taxonomy 80
Financial
statements
82 Consolidated financial statements
120 Statements and auditor’s reports
125 Financial statements of
 the parent company
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 81
Consolidated financial statements
Income statement and Statement of comprehensive income 83 Section 4 100
Cash flow statement 84 Capital structure and financial items 100
Balance sheet 85 4.1 Earnings per share 100
Equity statement 86 4.2 Distribution to shareholders 100
4.3 Share capital, Treasury shares and Other reserves 100
Notes to the Consolidated financial statements 87 4.4 Financial risks 101
Section 1 87 4.5 Derivative financial instruments 103
Basis of preparation 87 4.6 Borrowings 104
1.1 Material accounting policies and key accounting estimates 87 4.7 Cash flow statement specifications 106
1.2 Changes in accounting policies and disclosures 87 4.8 Financial assets and liabilities 107
4.9 Financial income and expenses 108
Section 2 88
Results for the year 88 Section 5 109
2.1 Net sales and rebates 88 Other disclosures 109
2.2 Segment information 89 5.1 Share-based payment schemes 109
2.3 Research and development costs 91 5.2 Commitments 110
2.4 Employee costs 91 5.3 Acquisition of businesses 110
2.5 Other operating income and expenses 92 5.4 Related party transactions 111
2.6 Income taxes and deferred income taxes 92 5.5 Fees to statutory auditors 112
5.6 Companies in the Novo Nordisk Group 113
Section 3 94
Operating assets and liabilities 94 Part of the Annual review (not audited) 114
3.1 Intangible assets 94 Financial definitions and ratios 114
3.2 Goodwill 95 Non-IFRS financial measures 115
3.3 Property, plant and equipment 96
3.4 Inventories 97
3.5 Trade receivables 97
3.6 Provisions and contingent liabilities 98
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements 82
Income statement and Statement of comprehensive income
for the year ended 31 December
DKK million Note 2025 2024 2023
Income statement
Net sales 2.1, 2.2 309,064 290,403 232,261
Cost of goods sold 2.2 (58,788) (44,522) (35,765)
Gross profit 250,276 245,881 196,496
Sales and distribution costs 2.2 (64,310) (62,101) (56,743)
Research and development costs 2.2, 2.3 (52,039) (48,062) (32,443)
Administrative costs 2.2 (5,969) (5,276) (4,855)
Other operating income and expenses 2.2, 2.5 (300) (2,103) 119
Operating profit 127,658 128,339 102,574
Financial income 4.9 9,660 6,198 2,945
Financial expenses 4.9 (6,778) (7,346) (845)
Profit before income taxes 130,540 127,191 104,674
Income taxes 2.6 (28,106) (26,203) (20,991)
Net profit 102,434 100,988 83,683
Earnings per share
Basic earnings per share (DKK) 4.1 23.06 22.67 18.67
Diluted earnings per share (DKK) 4.1 23.03 22.63 18.62
DKK million Note 2025 2024 2023
Statement of comprehensive income
Net profit 102,434 100,988 83,683
Other comprehensive income:
Exchange rate adjustments of investments in subsidiaries 4.3 (7,759) 3,096 (1,404)
Cash flow hedges:
Realisation of previously deferred (gains)/losses 4.3, 4.5 5,763 (1,612) (1,026)
Deferred gains/(losses) related to acquisition of businesses 4.3 — 1,154 —
Deferred gains/(losses) on hedges open at year-end 4.3, 4.5 4,339 (5,763) 1,612
Tax and other items 4.3 (2,632) 1,343 (355)
Items that will be reclassified subsequently to the income statement (289) (1,782) (1,173)
Remeasurements of retirement benefit obligations 26 (119) 13
Items that will not be reclassified subsequently to the income statement 26 (119) 13
Other comprehensive income (263) (1,901) (1,160)
Total comprehensive income 102,171 99,087 82,523
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Income statement and Statement of comprehensive income 83
Cash flow statement
for the year ended 31 December
DKK million Note 2025 2024 2023
Cash flow statement
Net profit 102,434 100,988 83,683
Adjustment of non-cash items:
 Income taxes in the income statement 2.6 28,106 26,203 20,991
 Depreciation, amortisation and impairment losses 3.1, 3.3 21,982 19,107 9,413
 Other non-cash items1 4.7 (3,122) 445 424
Changes in working capital1 4.7 3,737 2,589 19,713
Interest received 1,398 1,884 1,072
Interest paid (3,419) (612) (491)
Income taxes paid 2.6 (32,014) (29,636) (25,897)
Net cash flows from operating activities 119,102 120,968 108,908
Purchase of intangible assets 3.1 (29,973) (4,145) (13,090)
Purchase of property, plant and equipment 3.3 (60,140) (47,164) (25,806)
Cash used for acquisition of businesses 5.3 — (82,163) —
Settlement for prior year's acquisition of businesses 5.3 1,004 — —
Proceeds from other financial assets 30 — 33
Purchase of other financial assets (225) (786) (271)
Purchase of marketable securities (498) (19,028) (13,018)
Sale of marketable securities 10,644 24,391 8,260
Net cash flows from investing activities (79,158) (128,895) (43,892)
1. Effective 1 January 2025, 'Sales deductions and product returns' are presented as a separate line item on the balance sheet to enhance clarity of
presentation and disclosures. In prior years, a portion of these balances was included within 'Provisions' and has therefore been reclassified from 'Other
non-cash items', which captures movements in provisions, to 'Changes in working capital'. Refer to note 4.7 for further information.
DKK million Note 2025 2024 2023
Purchase of treasury shares 4.2 (1,388) (20,181) (29,924)
Dividends paid 4.2 (51,763) (44,140) (31,767)
Proceeds from borrowings 4.6 103,931 79,391 —
Repayment of borrowings 4.6 (79,188) (6,335) (1,467)
Net cash flows from financing activities (28,408) 8,735 (63,158)
Net cash generated from activities 11,536 808 1,858
Cash and cash equivalents at the beginning of the year 15,655 14,392 12,653
Exchange gains/(losses) on cash and cash equivalents (727) 455 (119)
Cash and cash equivalents at the end of the year 26,464 15,655 14,392
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Cash flow statement 84
Balance sheet
at 31 December
DKK million Note 2025 2024
Assets
Intangible assets1 3.1 110,208 90,804
Goodwill1 3.2 19,845 20,017
Property, plant and equipment 3.3 208,378 161,680
Investments in associated companies 366 400
Deferred income tax assets 2.6 23,647 24,648
Other receivables and prepayments 5,864 4,016
Other financial assets 4.8 2,141 2,277
Total non-current assets 370,449 303,842
Inventories 3.4 49,623 40,849
Trade receivables 3.5 70,856 71,949
Tax receivables 4,848 2,853
Other receivables and prepayments 13,482 13,503
Marketable securities 4.4 498 10,653
Derivative financial instruments 4.5 6,682 6,326
Cash at bank 4.4 26,464 15,655
Total current assets 172,453 161,788
Total assets 542,902 465,630
1. Effective 1 January 2025, 'goodwill' is presented as a separate line item to enhance clarity of presentation and disclosures. In prior years, goodwill was
included in the line item 'intangible assets' and has therefore been reclassified to the new line item.
2. Effective 1 January 2025, 'sales deductions and product returns' are presented as a separate line item to enhance clarity of presentation and disclosures.
In prior years, these amounts were included in the line items 'provisions', 'other liabilities', and 'trade payables' and have therefore been reclassified to the
new line item. Refer to note 2.1 for further information.
DKK million Note 2025 2024
Equity and liabilities
Share capital 4.3 446 446
Treasury shares 4.3 (2) (2)
Retained earnings 195,298 144,448
Other reserves 4.3 (1,695) (1,406)
Total equity 194,047 143,486
Borrowings 4.6 118,941 89,674
Deferred income tax liabilities 2.6 6,611 5,515
Retirement benefit obligations 861 903
Provisions2 3.6 5,730 6,982
Sales deductions and product returns2 2.1 1,051 1,456
Total non-current liabilities 133,194 104,530
Borrowings 4.6 12,017 13,113
Trade payables2 4.8 19,758 17,140
Tax payables 8,416 9,716
Other liabilities2 4.8 39,721 35,372
Derivative financial instruments 4.5 2,026 7,531
Provisions2 3.6 374 289
Sales deductions and product returns2 2.1 133,349 134,453
Total current liabilities 215,661 217,614
Total liabilities 348,855 322,144
Total equity and liabilities 542,902 465,630
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Balance sheet 85
Equity statement
at 31 December
2025 2024 2023
DKK million
Share
capital
Treasury
shares
Retained
earnings
Other
reserves Total
Share
capital
Treasury
shares
Retained
earnings
Other
reserves Total
Share
capital
Treasury
shares
Retained
earnings
Other
reserves Total
Balance at the beginning of the year 446 (2) 144,448 (1,406) 143,486 451 (5) 104,839 1,276 106,561 456 (6) 80,587 2,449 83,486
Net profit 102,434 102,434 100,988 100,988 83,683 83,683
Other comprehensive income 26 (289) (263) (119) (1,782) (1,901) 13 (1,173) (1,160)
Total comprehensive income 102,460 (289) 102,171 100,869 (1,782) 99,087 83,696 (1,173) 82,523
Transfer of cash flow hedge reserve to intangible assets (note 4.3) — — (900) (900) — —
Transactions with owners:
Dividends (note 4.2) (51,763) (51,763) (44,140) (44,140) (31,767) (31,767)
Share-based payments (note 5.1) 1,435 1,435 2,289 2,289 2,149 2,149
Purchase of treasury shares (note 4.2) (0) (1,388) (1,388) (2) (20,179) (20,181) (4) (29,920) (29,924)
Reduction of the B share capital (note 4.3) — — — (5) 5 — (5) 5 —
Tax related to transactions with owners 106 106 770 770 94 94
Balance at the end of the year 446 (2) 195,298 (1,695) 194,047 446 (2) 144,448 (1,406) 143,486 451 (5) 104,839 1,276 106,561
Refer to note 4.3 for details of movements in Other reserves.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Equity statement 86
Notes to the Consolidated financial statements
Section 1
Basis of preparation
1.1 Material accounting policies and key accounting
estimates and judgements
The Consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report have been
prepared in accordance with IFRS® Accounting Standards as issued by the
International Accounting Standards Board (IASB) and in accordance with IFRS
Accounting Standards as endorsed by the EU and further requirements in the
Danish Financial Statements Act.
Measurement basis
The Consolidated financial statements have been prepared on the historical cost basis
except for derivative financial instruments, equity investments, marketable securities
and trade receivables in a factoring portfolio, which are measured at fair value.
Material accounting policies
Novo Nordisk’s material accounting policies are described in each of the individual notes
to the Consolidated financial statements. The accounting policies have been applied
consistently in the preparation of the Consolidated financial statements for
all the years presented.
Functional and presentation currency
The Consolidated financial statements are presented in Danish kroner (DKK), which
is also the functional and presentation currency of the parent company.
Key accounting estimates
The use of reasonable estimates is an essential part of the preparation of the Consolidated
financial statements. Given the uncertainties inherent in Novo Nordisk’s business
activities, Management must make certain estimates regarding valuation and make
judgements on the reported amounts of assets, liabilities, net sales, expenses and
related disclosures.
The key accounting estimates identified are those that have a significant risk of resulting
in a material adjustment to the carrying amount of assets and liabilities in the following
reporting period. An example being the estimation of US sales deductions and provisions
for sales rebates.
When determining estimates and assumptions, Management has assessed the qualitative
and quantitative impact of climate-related matters, geopolitical risks including US tariffs
and reference pricing, and other uncertainties. It is Management’s assessment that,
based on the current facts, these uncertainties do not significantly impact estimates
and assumptions.
Estimates are based on historical experience and various other assumptions that are held
to be reasonable under the circumstances. The estimates and underlying assumptions are
reviewed on an ongoing basis. If necessary, changes are recognised in the period in which
the estimate is revised. Management considers the key accounting estimates to be
reasonable and appropriate based on currently available information. The actual amounts
may differ from the amounts estimated as more detailed information becomes available.
In addition, Management has made certain judgements in the process of applying the
accounting policies, for example in assessing events relevant to recognising revenue
related to the 340B Drug Pricing Program, including events after the reporting date, and
in determining the implications for the financial statements.
Management regards those listed below as the key accounting estimates and judgements
applied in the preparation of the Consolidated financial statements. Refer to the specific
notes for further information on the key accounting estimates and judgements, as well as
assumptions applied.
Applying materiality
The Consolidated financial statements are a result of processing large numbers of
transactions and aggregating those transactions into classes according to their nature or
function. The transactions are presented in classes of similar items in the Consolidated
financial statements. If a line item is not individually material, it is aggregated with other
items of a similar nature in the Consolidated financial statements or in the notes.
Management provides the specific disclosures required by IFRS Accounting Standards
unless the information is not applicable or is considered immaterial to the decisionmaking of the primary users of these financial statements.
Key accounting estimates and judgements Risk Note(s)
Estimate and judgement related to US sales
deductions and liabilities for sales deductions High 2.1, 3.6
Estimate in determining the fair values of assets
acquired in prior year's business combinations Medium 5.3
Estimate in determining the fair values of intangible
assets in impairment reviews Medium 3.1
Estimate regarding deferred income tax assets
and provision for uncertain tax positions Medium 2.6
Estimate of ongoing legal disputes, litigation
and investigations Medium 3.6
1.2 Changes in accounting policies and disclosures
Management has assessed that new or amended IFRS Accounting Standards
and interpretations issued by the IASB and endorsed by the EU effective on or
after 1 January 2025 have not had a significant effect on the Consolidated
financial statements. New or amended IFRS Accounting Standards and interpretations
issued by the IASB that have not yet become effective are generally not adopted until
they become effective and endorsed by the EU. Management does not anticipate any
significant impact on the Consolidated financial statements in the period of initial
application from the adoption of these new standards and amendments, apart from
IFRS 18 which replaces IAS 1 effective from 1 January 2027.
IFRS 18 implementation
IFRS 18 will revise the presentation of Novo Nordisk’s Income statement, mainly due
to the classification of 'financial income' and 'financial expenses' into three new line
items: 'operating financial income and expenses', 'investment income' and 'interest
expenses'. This reclassification will result in a difference between the IAS 1 operating
profit reported in prior periods and the new IFRS 18-defined operating profit, mainly
due to the inclusion of operating foreign exchange differences from intragroup
balances and related hedging activities. Reported net results remain unaffected.
Further, IFRS 18 is expected to introduce a new note with 'management-defined
performance measures' in the audited section of the financial statements, as well
as introduce additional disclosures. 'Goodwill' is presented as a separate line item
in the balance sheet with effect from 2025 in line with IFRS 18 requirements.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 1 Basis of preparation 87
Section 2
Results for the year
2.1 Net sales and rebates
Gross-to-net sales reconciliation
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Gross sales 729,423 680,563 608,645
US Managed Care and Medicare (247,003) (238,946) (223,191)
US wholesaler charge-backs (69,504) (64,437) (74,435)
US Medicaid rebates (38,749) (32,919) (31,821)
Other US discounts and sales returns (39,375) (30,737) (28,481)
US rebates, discounts and sales returns (394,631) (367,039) (357,928)
Non-US rebates, discounts and sales returns (25,728) (23,121) (18,456)
Total gross-to-net sales adjustments (420,359) (390,160) (376,384)
Net sales 309,064 290,403 232,261
Liabilities for sales deductions and product returns
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Sales deductions at beginning of the year 132,815 116,090 83,469
Additions, including increases to existing
liabilities 310,248 318,812 285,266
Amount paid during the year (294,690) (301,247) (248,074)
Adjustments regarding prior years, including
unused amounts reversed during the year (4,193) (6,452) (2,364)
Effect of exchange rate adjustment (12,848) 5,612 (2,207)
Sales deductions at end of the year 131,332 132,815 116,090
Liabilities for product returns 3,068 3,094 1,532
Sales deductions and product returns 134,400 135,909 117,622
Sales discounts and sales rebates are predominantly issued in the US. As such, total US
rebates, discounts and sales returns amount to DKK 394,631 million, corresponding to
70% of gross sales in the US (69% in 2024 and 74% in 2023). Liabilities for sales rebates
include US Managed Care, Medicare, Medicaid, 340B Drug Pricing Program and other
US rebate types, as well as rebates in a number of European countries and Canada.
Pricing mechanisms in the US market
In the US, sales rebates are paid in connection with public healthcare insurance
programmes, including Medicare and Medicaid, as well as rebates to pharmacy
benefit managers (PBMs) and managed healthcare plans. Key customers in the US
include private payers, PBMs and government payers. PBMs and managed healthcare
plans play a role in negotiating price concessions with drug manufacturers for both
the commercial and government channels, and determine which drugs are covered
on their formularies (or 'preferred drug lists').
US Managed Care and Medicare
For Managed Care and Medicare, rebates are offered to a number of PBMs and
managed healthcare plans. These rebate programmes allow the customer to receive a
rebate after attaining certain performance parameters relating to formulary status or
pre-established market share thresholds. Rebate liabilities are estimated according to
the specific terms in each agreement, historical experience, anticipated channel mix,
growth rates and market share information. Novo Nordisk adjusts the liabilities
periodically to reflect actual sales performance. Managed Care and Medicare rebates
are generally settled around 100 days from the transaction date.
US wholesaler charge-backs
Wholesaler charge-backs relate to contractual arrangements between Novo Nordisk and
indirect customers in the US whereby products are sold at contract prices lower than the
list price originally charged to wholesalers. Estimates of expected charge-backs are made
using a combination of factors such as historical experience, current wholesaler inventory
levels, contract terms and the value of claims received but not yet processed. Wholesaler
charge-backs are generally settled within 30 days after receipt of claim.
In January 2021, Novo Nordisk changed its policy in the US related to the 340B Drug
Pricing Program, whereby Novo Nordisk no longer provides 340B statutory discounts
to certain pharmacies that contract with covered entities participating in the 340B Drug
Pricing Program. Novo Nordisk’s 340B policy has been the subject of legal challenges.
As a result, Novo Nordisk has only recognised revenue related to the 340B Drug Pricing
Program to the extent that in Management’s assessment it is highly probable that its
inclusion will not result in a significant revenue reversal in the future. Management’s
assessment considers interpretations of applicable laws, and legal and administrative
rulings, as well as attrition and experience from historical claims. Given the passage
of time and the current legal and regulatory landscape relating to enforcement of
the 340B program, the provision for 340B statutory discounts was reduced
by USD 0.4 billion during 2025 to USD 4.2 billion at 31 December 2025, reflecting
an assessment of applicable laws, and legal and administrative rulings as well as
attrition and experience from historical claims. Refer to note 3.6 for further details.
US Medicaid rebates
Medicaid is a government insurance programme. Medicaid rebates have been
estimated using a combination of historical experience, product and population
growth, price changes and the impact of contracting strategies. The calculation also
involves interpretation of relevant regulations that are subject to changes in
interpretative guidance from government authorities. Novo Nordisk adjusts the
liabilities periodically to reflect actual sales performance. Medicaid rebates
are generally settled around 150 days from the transaction date.
Other US and non-US discounts and sales returns
Other discounts are provided to distributors, wholesalers, hospitals, pharmacies, etc.
Further, discounts are provided to patients through different programmes. They are
usually linked to sales volume or provided as cash discounts. Discounts are calculated
based on historical data and recorded as a reduction in gross sales at the time the
related sales are recorded. Sales returns relate to damaged or expired products.
Other net sales disclosures
In 2025, Novo Nordisk had 3 major wholesalers distributing products in the US,
representing 23%, 18% and 14% respectively of global net sales (23%, 17% and 17% in
2024 and 22%, 17% and 15% in 2023). Sales to these 3 wholesalers are within both
Obesity and Diabetes care and Rare disease.
Net sales to be recognised from existing customer contracts containing fixed or
minimum sales volumes, with an original term greater than 12 months, are expected
to be DKK 4,139 million within 12 months (DKK 3,753 million in 2024) and DKK 3,193
million thereafter (DKK 5,822 million in 2024).
KEY ACCOUNTING ESTIMATE AND JUDGEMENT RELATED TO SALES DEDUCTIONS
AND LIABILITIES FOR SALES REBATES
Sales deductions are estimated at the time the related sales are recorded. These
estimates of unsettled rebates and discounts are considered a key accounting
estimate as not all conditions are known at the time of sale, for example total sales
volume to a given customer. The estimates are based on analyses of existing
contractual obligations and historical experience. Liabilities are calculated on the basis
of a percentage of sales for each product as defined by the contracts with the various
customer groups. Liabilities for sales rebates are adjusted to actual amounts as
rebates, discounts and returns are processed. Revenue related to the 340B Drug
Pricing Program can only be recognised to the extent that it is highly probable that a
significant reversal of the recognised revenue will not occur. As discussed below in this
note 2.1 and in note 3.6, Management determined that it was appropriate to record a
provision for 340B statutory discounts of USD 4.2 billion at 31 December 2025.
Following a favourable Administrative Dispute Resolution (“ADR”) ruling on a 340B
petition filed against Novo Nordisk, that became final and effective on 20 January 2026
after the expiration of a reconsideration deadline, Management concluded that the
legal uncertainty relating to the 340B program was resolved only after the balance
sheet date. Consequently, it was concluded that it was not highly probable at 31
December 2025 that a significant revenue reversal after that date would not occur.
On that basis, Management considered all pertinent factors and applied judgement
determining that the event was a non-adjusting event after the 31 December 2025,
and that estimates made in respect of variable consideration constraints at 31
December 2025 are unaffected by the expiration of the reconsideration deadline on 20
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 2 Results for the year 88
January 2026. As such, the Company will in the first quarter of 2026 recognise revenue
of USD 4.2 billion comprising the entire amount of provisions for 340B statutory
discounts included in ‘sales deductions and product returns’. Refer to note 3.6 for
further details.
Novo Nordisk considers the liabilities established for sales rebates to be reasonable
and appropriate based on the information currently available. However, the actual
amount of rebates and discounts may differ from the amounts estimated by
Management as more detailed information becomes available.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Revenue from sale of goods is recognised when Novo Nordisk has transferred
control of products sold to the buyer. Control of the products is transferred at a point
in time, typically on delivery. Where contracts contain customer acceptance criteria,
Novo Nordisk recognises sales when the acceptance criteria are satisfied. The amount
of sales to be recognised is based on the consideration Novo Nordisk expects to
receive in exchange for goods. When sales are recognised, Novo Nordisk also records
estimates for a variety of sales deductions including product returns as well as rebates
and discounts to government agencies, wholesalers, health insurance companies,
managed healthcare organisations and retail customers. Sales deductions are
recognised as a reduction of gross sales to arrive at net sales, by assessing the
expected value of the sales deductions (variable consideration).
Effective 1 January 2025, 'sales deductions and product returns' are presented as a
separate balance sheet line for greater clarity. Amounts related to ‘Estimated rebates,
discounts and charge-backs’ and ‘Expected products returns’ were previously included
in ‘provisions’ and ‘Other liabilities’. Furthermore, amounts related to ‘Confirmed sales
rebates’ previously included in ‘trade payables’, have been restated to ‘Sales
deductions and product returns’. Wholesaler charge-backs remain netted against
trade receivable balances.
Reconciliation of new line item 'sales deductions and product returns'
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Estimated sales rebates, discounts and charge-backs — 548 451
Expected product returns 1,051 908 613
Sales deductions and product returns
(non-current) 1,051 1,456 1,064
Estimated sales rebates, discounts and charge-backs 124,967 120,561 102,162
Confirmed sales rebates 6,365 11,706 13,477
Expected product returns 2,017 2,186 919
Sales deductions and product returns (current) 133,349 134,453 116,558
Total sales deductions and product returns 134,400 135,909 117,622
Novo Nordisk issues credit notes for expired goods as a part of the normal business.
In some markets, Novo Nordisk sells products on a sale-or-return basis. Where there
is historical experience or a reasonably accurate estimate of future returns, estimated
product returns are recorded as a reduction in sales and as a provision for estimated
product returns. The provision is measured at net sales value. Expected product
returns are recorded in the balance sheet as 'sales deductions and product returns'.
2.2 Segment information
Operating segments
Novo Nordisk operates in two segments based on therapies: Obesity and Diabetes
care and Rare disease, representing the entirety of the Group's operations. The
activities of the segments include research, development, manufacturing and
marketing of products within the following areas:
• Obesity and Diabetes care: obesity, diabetes, cardiovascular and emerging therapy areas
• Rare disease: rare blood disorders, rare endocrine disorders and hormone
replacement therapy.
Segment performance is evaluated on the basis of operating profit, consistent with the
Consolidated financial statements. Financial income and expenses and income taxes
are managed at Group level and are not allocated to segments. There are no sales or
other transactions between the segments. Costs have generally been split between
segments according to a specific allocation. Certain corporate overhead costs are
Operating segments – Key figures
Obesity and Diabetes care Rare disease Total
DKK million 2025 2024 2023 2025 2024 2023 2025 2024 2023
Net sales 289,456 271,764 215,098 19,608 18,639 17,163 309,064 290,403 232,261
Cost of goods sold (51,998) (37,760) (30,483) (6,790) (6,762) (5,282) (58,788) (44,522) (35,765)
Sales and distribution costs (60,274) (57,840) (52,477) (4,036) (4,261) (4,266) (64,310) (62,101) (56,743)
Research and development costs (44,891) (41,490) (28,073) (7,148) (6,572) (4,370) (52,039) (48,062) (32,443)
Administrative costs (5,580) (4,881) (4,435) (389) (395) (420) (5,969) (5,276) (4,855)
Other operating income and expenses (267) (2,074) (7) (33) (29) 126 (300) (2,103) 119
Segment operating profit 126,446 127,719 99,623 1,212 620 2,951 127,658 128,339 102,574
Operating margin 43.7% 47.0% 46.3% 6.2% 3.3% 17.2% 41.3% 44.2% 44.2%
Depreciation and amortisation expenses (13,063) (7,104) (6,042) (1,603) (1,441) (1,247) (14,666) (8,545) (7,289)
Impairment losses and reversals (6,143) (9,262) (2,153) (1,173) (1,300) 29 (7,316) (10,562) (2,124)
Total depreciation, amortisation, impairment
losses and reversals (19,206) (16,366) (8,195) (2,776) (2,741) (1,218) (21,982) (19,107) (9,413)
allocated between segments based on overall allocation keys. Other operating income
and expenses have been allocated to the two segments based on the same principle.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Operating segments are reported in a manner consistent with the internal reporting
provided to Executive Management and the Board of Directors. We consider Executive
Management to be the operating decision-making body.
Geographical areas
International Operations cover the following Regions:
• EUCAN (covering Europe and Canada),
• Emerging Markets (covering mainly Latin America, the Middle East, and Africa),
• APAC (covering Japan, Korea, Oceania and Southeast Asia), and
• Region China (covering Mainland China, Hong Kong and Taiwan).
Effective 1 January 2025, North America Operations and International Operations were
reorganised into US Operations and International Operations. Of the total net sales of
DKK 309,064 million, DKK 173,166 million was generated from external customers in
the US (DKK 167,402 million in 2024). The country of domicile is Denmark (part of
EUCAN). Denmark is immaterial to Novo Nordisk's activities in terms of sales as 99.1%
of total net sales are realised outside Denmark (99.2 % in 2024). Sales are attributed to
geographical areas according to the location of the customer.
Property, plant and equipment and intangible assets excluding goodwill amount to
DKK 318,586 million (DKK 252,484 million in 2024). DKK 194,790 million is located in
Denmark (DKK 164,744 million in 2024) and DKK 77,394 million is located in the US
(DKK 49,305 million in 2024). Comparatives were restated to reflect changes in the
provisional purchase price allocation from business combination in 2024 (note 5.3).
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 2 Results for the year 89
Net sales – Segments and geographical areas
US Operations International Operations Total Novo Nordisk
USA Total IO EUCAN Emerging Markets APAC Region China net sales
DKK million 2025 20241 20231 2025 20241 20231 2025 20241 20231 2025 20241 20231 2025 20241 20231 2025 20241 20231 2025 20241 20231
Obesity and Diabetes care segment:
Ozempic® 88,467 84,201 63,010 38,622 36,141 32,708 22,774 19,819 17,917 7,235 7,448 7,102 3,214 3,112 2,868 5,399 5,762 4,821 127,089 120,342 95,718
Rybelsus® 8,833 10,795 11,060 13,260 12,506 7,690 7,065 6,783 3,968 2,061 2,182 1,375 3,514 3,030 2,216 620 511 131 22,093 23,301 18,750
Victoza® 471 1,699 3,613 2,549 3,783 5,051 694 1,169 2,059 1,050 1,264 1,137 204 375 599 601 975 1,256 3,020 5,482 8,664
Total GLP-1 97,771 96,695 77,683 54,431 52,430 45,449 30,533 27,771 23,944 10,346 10,894 9,614 6,932 6,517 5,683 6,620 7,248 6,208 152,202 149,125 123,132
Long-acting insulin 5,007 5,538 2,931 13,748 13,557 11,974 6,252 6,699 6,237 2,973 2,803 2,688 1,317 1,359 1,400 3,206 2,696 1,649 18,755 19,095 14,905
• of which Awigli® — — — 410 19 — 104 13 — — — — 18 — — 288 6 — 410 19 —
• of which Tresiba® 4,706 2,806 1,333 7,343 7,099 6,419 3,567 3,633 3,383 1,980 1,642 1,332 847 846 856 949 978 848 12,049 9,905 7,752
• of which Xultophy® 295 281 325 4,324 4,222 2,894 1,864 2,068 1,712 310 347 368 358 393 405 1,792 1,414 409 4,619 4,503 3,219
• of which Levemir® 6 2,451 1,273 1,671 2,217 2,661 717 985 1,142 683 814 988 94 120 139 177 298 392 1,677 4,668 3,934
Premix insulin 567 632 216 9,748 10,157 9,358 930 1,039 1,163 2,049 2,067 1,795 2,106 2,267 1,959 4,663 4,784 4,441 10,315 10,789 9,574
• of which Ryzodeg® — — — 5,382 4,929 3,730 225 186 171 877 627 499 1,316 1,334 1,095 2,964 2,782 1,965 5,382 4,929 3,730
• of which NovoMix® 567 632 216 4,366 5,228 5,628 705 853 992 1,172 1,440 1,296 790 933 864 1,699 2,002 2,476 4,933 5,860 5,844
Fast-acting insulin 8,245 7,773 5,265 10,338 10,749 10,684 5,023 4,963 5,077 2,894 3,111 2,772 1,110 1,201 1,290 1,311 1,474 1,545 18,583 18,522 15,949
• of which Fiasp® 1,079 213 618 1,739 1,656 1,555 1,314 1,270 1,201 210 192 201 215 194 153 — — — 2,818 1,869 2,173
• of which NovoRapid® 7,166 7,560 4,647 8,599 9,093 9,129 3,709 3,693 3,876 2,684 2,919 2,571 895 1,007 1,137 1,311 1,474 1,545 15,765 16,653 13,776
Human insulin 1,415 1,535 1,406 4,069 5,432 6,188 705 868 969 1,830 2,745 2,758 812 1,013 1,248 722 806 1,213 5,484 6,967 7,594
Total insulin 15,234 15,478 9,818 37,903 39,895 38,204 12,910 13,569 13,446 9,746 10,726 10,013 5,345 5,840 5,897 9,902 9,760 8,848 53,137 55,373 48,022
Other Diabetes care 139 213 267 1,631 1,907 2,045 519 552 551 261 277 258 263 296 344 588 782 892 1,770 2,120 2,312
Total Diabetes care 113,144 112,386 87,768 93,965 94,232 85,698 43,962 41,892 37,941 20,353 21,897 19,885 12,540 12,653 11,924 17,110 17,790 15,948 207,109 206,618 173,466
Wegovy® 51,015 45,770 29,430 28,091 12,436 1,913 15,383 7,705 1,799 6,100 2,677 114 5,812 1,858 — 796 196 — 79,106 58,206 31,343
Saxenda® 268 777 3,306 2,973 6,163 6,983 1,444 2,796 3,124 1,238 2,195 2,587 263 1,070 1,126 28 102 146 3,241 6,940 10,289
Total Obesity care 51,283 46,547 32,736 31,064 18,599 8,896 16,827 10,501 4,923 7,338 4,872 2,701 6,075 2,928 1,126 824 298 146 82,347 65,146 41,632
Obesity and Diabetes care total 164,427 158,933 120,504 125,029 112,831 94,594 60,789 52,393 42,864 27,691 26,769 22,586 18,615 15,581 13,050 17,934 18,088 16,094 289,456 271,764 215,098
Rare disease segment:
Rare blood disorders 4,927 5,387 5,070 7,028 6,751 6,706 3,340 3,392 3,359 1,946 2,040 2,027 1,045 956 948 697 363 372 11,955 12,138 11,776
• of which Haemophilia A 399 537 468 2,015 1,917 1,954 987 1,113 1,140 410 348 371 253 220 220 365 236 223 2,414 2,454 2,422
• of which Haemophilia B 545 486 336 867 820 725 610 614 509 83 38 44 157 151 159 17 17 13 1,412 1,306 1,061
• of which NovoSeven® 3,502 4,135 4,065 3,824 3,848 3,893 1,651 1,613 1,661 1,407 1,604 1,560 451 521 536 315 110 136 7,326 7,983 7,958
Rare endocrine disorders 3,478 2,922 1,757 2,481 2,071 2,079 1,002 817 981 594 511 (22) 863 702 904 22 41 216 5,959 4,993 3,836
Other Rare disease 334 160 203 1,360 1,348 1,348 960 945 944 205 195 193 190 199 206 5 9 5 1,694 1,508 1,551
Rare disease total 8,739 8,469 7,030 10,869 10,170 10,133 5,302 5,154 5,284 2,745 2,746 2,198 2,098 1,857 2,058 724 413 593 19,608 18,639 17,163
Total sales by geographical area 173,166 167,402 127,534 135,898 123,001 104,727 66,091 57,547 48,148 30,436 29,515 24,784 20,713 17,438 15,108 18,658 18,501 16,687 309,064 290,403 232,261
Total sales growth as reported 3.4% 31.3% 50.6% 10.5% 17.4% 13.5% 14.9% 19.5% 24.1% 3.1% 19.1% 8.0% 18.8% 15.4% 5.4% 0.8% 10.9% 2.9% 6.4% 25.0% 31.3%
1. Comparative information has been restated to reflect the new geographical structure.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 2 Results for the year 90
2.3 Research and development costs
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Employee costs (note 2.4) 16,598 15,923 12,429
Amortisation, intangible assets (note 3.1) 1,048 931 649
Impairment losses and reversals,
intangible assets (note 3.1) 2,742 7,912 1,108
Depreciation, property, plant and
equipment (note 3.3) 1,439 1,120 1,053
Impairment losses, property, plant and
equipment (note 3.3) 1,588 78 260
Clinical trial cost 16,171 12,232 9,468
Other research and development costs 12,453 9,866 7,476
Total research and development costs 52,039 48,062 32,443
As percentage of net sales 16.8% 16.6% 14.0%
Novo Nordisk's research and development is mainly focused on:
• GLP-1s and combinations for obesity treatment
• Insulins, GLP-1s and other therapeutic compounds for diabetes treatment
• Novel targets for obesity and diabetes treatment and their related comorbidities;
Such as cardiovascular disease, chronic kidney disease and MASH
• New indications with existing assets within MASH, cardiovascular disease and
chronic kidney disease
• Blood-clotting factors and new modes of action for treatment of haemophilia
and other rare blood disorders
• Human growth hormone and new modes of action for treatment of
growth disorders
• Research technology platforms including RNAi for treatment of cardiovascular
disease, chronic kidney disease and MASH
The research activities mainly utilise biotechnological methods based on advanced
protein chemistry and protein engineering. These methods have played a key role in
the development of the production technology used to manufacture insulin, GLP-1,
recombinant blood-clotting factors and human growth hormone. Research activities
further utilise digital scientific methodologies and other technology platforms,
including RNAi therapies and small molecules.
Research and development activities are mainly carried out by Novo Nordisk's
research and development centres in Denmark, the US, the UK and China. Clinical
trials are carried out all over the world. Novo Nordisk also enters into partnerships
and licence agreements to execute R&D activities.
Other research and development costs mainly comprise external consulting
fees, IT services, facilities, consumables and other operational costs.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Novo Nordisk expenses all research costs. Due to significant regulatory uncertainties
and other uncertainties inherent in the development of new products, internal and
subcontracted development costs are also expensed as they are incurred, in line with
industry practice. This means that they do not qualify for capitalisation as intangible
assets until marketing approval by a regulatory authority is obtained or considered
highly probable. Costs for post-approval activities that are required by authorities
as a condition for obtaining regulatory approval are recognised as research and
development costs.
Research and development costs primarily comprise employee costs as well as
internal and external costs related to execution of studies, including manufacturing
costs and facility costs of the research centres. The costs also comprise amortisation,
depreciation and impairment losses related to intellectual property rights and
property, plant and equipment used in the research and development activities.
Amortisations of intellectual property rights related to marketed products are
recognised in cost of goods sold. Royalty expenses paid to partners after regulatory
approval are also expensed as cost of goods sold.
Contractual research and development obligations to be paid in the future are
disclosed separately as commitments in note 5.2.
2.4 Employee costs
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Wages and salaries 61,238 52,311 42,867
Share-based payment costs (note 5.1) 1,435 2,289 2,149
Pensions – defined contribution plans 4,763 4,235 3,267
Pensions – defined benefit plans 129 156 126
Other social security contributions 4,140 3,505 3,039
Other employee costs 5,770 4,929 4,066
Total employee costs for the year 77,475 67,425 55,514
Employee costs capitalised as intangible
assets and property, plant and equipment (4,676) (3,540) (2,337)
Change in employee costs capitalised
as inventories (994) (470) (409)
Total employee costs
in the income statement 71,805 63,415 52,768
Included in the income statement:
Cost of goods sold 24,467 20,074 15,490
Sales and distribution costs 23,757 22,920 20,810
Research and development costs 16,598 15,923 12,429
Administrative costs 5,154 4,265 3,962
Other operating income and expenses 1,829 233 77
Total employee costs in the
income statement 71,805 63,415 52,768
Number of employees

Number 2025 2024 2023
Average number of full-time employees 76,343 69,480 59,552
Year-end number of full-time employees 68,794 76,302 63,370
Year-end employees (total) 69,505 77,349 64,319
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 2 Results for the year 91
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Wages, salaries, social security contributions, annual leave and sick leave, bonuses
and non-monetary benefits are recognised in the year in which the associated services
are rendered by employees of Novo Nordisk. Where Novo Nordisk provides long-term
employee benefits, the costs are accrued to match the rendering of the services by the
employees concerned.
2.5 Other operating income and expenses
Other operating income and expenses comprises items secondary to Novo Nordisk's
main activities. This primarily includes income from non-core manufacturing contracts
with external customers and related expenses. Further, it covers the following items
• Licence income, as well as amortisation and impairment losses, from assets which
are secondary to Novo Nordisk's main activities
• Operating profit from wholly owned subsidiaries not related to core activities, and
• transaction costs associated with acquisition of businesses (see note 5.3 for details).
2.6 Income taxes and deferred income taxes
Income taxes expensed
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Current tax on profit for the year 30,239 32,082 25,918
Deferred tax on profit for the year (1,179) (5,484) (4,464)
Tax on profit for the year 29,060 26,598 21,454
Current tax adjustments recognised
for prior years (1,257) 172 (916)
Deferred tax adjustments recognised
for prior years 303 (567) 453
Income taxes in the income statement 28,106 26,203 20,991
Tax on other comprehensive income
for the year, (income)/expense 2,629 (1,343) 359
Computation of effective tax rate
% DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Statutory corporate income tax
rate in Denmark 22.0% 22.0% 22.0%
Deviation in foreign subsidiaries'
tax rates compared to the Danish
tax rate (net) 0.1% (0.5%) (0.9%)
Non-taxable income less non-taxdeductible expenses (net) (0.4%) (0.7%) (0.7%)
Other adjustments (net) (0.2%) (0.2%) (0.3%)
Effective tax rate 21.5% 20.6% 20.1%
Income taxes paid
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Income taxes paid in Denmark 24,150 21,810 16,899
Income taxes paid outside Denmark 7,864 7,826 8,998
Income taxes paid 32,014 29,636 25,897
The deviation in foreign subsidiaries' tax rates from the Danish tax rate is mainly
driven by Swiss and US business activities. Other adjustments consist of tax related
to prior years.
From 1 January 2024 Novo Nordisk is subject to Global Minimum Tax (OECD BEPS Pillar 2
rules). The rules did not have a material impact on the tax position of Novo Nordisk in 2025
and 2024.
KEY ACCOUNTING ESTIMATES REGARDING DEFERRED INCOME TAX ASSETS AND
PROVISIONS FOR UNCERTAIN TAX POSITIONS
Management has considered future taxable income and has estimated the amount
of deferred income tax assets that should be recognised. The estimate is based on an
assessment of whether sufficient taxable income will be available in the future, against
which the temporary differences and unused tax losses can be utilised. The total tax
value of unrecognised tax loss carry-forwards amounts to DKK 1,383 million in 2025
(DKK 602 million in 2024).
In the course of conducting business globally, tax and transfer pricing disputes with
tax authorities may occur. Management has estimated the expected outcome of the
disputes by using the ‘most likely outcome’ method to determine the provisions for
uncertain tax positions. Management considers the provisions made to be adequate.
However, the actual obligation may deviate and depends on the result of litigation
and settlements with the relevant tax authorities.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
The tax expense for the period comprises current and deferred tax. It also includes
adjustments to previous years and changes in provisions for uncertain tax positions.
Tax is recognised in the income statement except to the extent that it relates to items
recognised in equity or other comprehensive income. Provisions for ongoing tax
disputes are included as part of deferred tax assets, tax receivables and tax payables.
Deferred income taxes arise from temporary differences between the accounting
and tax values of the individual consolidated companies and from realisable tax loss
carry-forwards.
In general, the Danish tax rules related to dividends from group companies provide
exemption from tax for most repatriated profits. In some countries withholding tax
will be applied to dividends paid to Denmark. A provision for withholding tax is only
recognised if a concrete distribution of dividends is planned. The unrecognised
potential withholding tax amounts to DKK 1,261 million (DKK 1,228 million in 2024).
The value of future tax deductions in relation to share programmes is recognised
as a deferred tax asset until the shares are paid out to the employees. Any estimated
excess tax deduction compared to the costs realised in the income statement is
charged to equity.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 2 Results for the year 92
Development in deferred income tax assets and liabilities
Property,
plant and
equipment
 Intangible
assets Inventories Liabilities Other
Offset
within
DKK million countries Total
2025
Net deferred tax asset/(liability) at the beginning of the year (5,484) (6,472) 3,790 18,742 8,557 — 19,133
Income/(charge) to the income statement (52) (532) 2,823 222 (1,585) — 876
Income/(charge) to other comprehensive income — — (407) (14) (2,222) — (2,643)
Income/(charge) to equity — — — — (37) — (37)
Additions from acquisitions — — — — 1,460 — 1,460
Effect of exchange rate adjustment 496 129 (8) (1,908) (462) — (1,753)
Net deferred tax asset/(liability) at the end of the year (5,040) (6,875) 6,198 17,042 5,711 — 17,036
Classified as follows:
Deferred tax asset at the end of the year 579 239 6,267 17,605 11,820 (12,863) 23,647
Deferred tax liability at the end of the year (5,619) (7,114) (69) (563) (6,109) 12,863 (6,611)
2024
Net deferred tax asset/(liability) at the beginning of the year (2,561) (10,241) 1,717 14,427 6,876 — 10,218
Income/(charge) to the income statement (207) 427 2,142 3,485 204 — 6,051
Income/(charge) to other comprehensive income — (254) (71) 17 1,622 — 1,314
Income/(charge) to equity — 254 — — (314) — (60)
Additions from acquisitions1
(2,600) 3,487 — 40 102 — 1,029
Effect of exchange rate adjustment (116) (145) 2 773 67 — 581
Net deferred tax asset/(liability) at the end of the year (5,484) (6,472) 3,790 18,742 8,557 — 19,133
Classified as follows:
Deferred tax asset at the end of the year1 497 231 3,847 19,004 13,112 (12,043) 24,648
Deferred tax liability at the end of the year1
(5,981) (6,703) (57) (262) (4,555) 12,043 (5,515)
1. Comparatives were restated to reflect changes in the provisional purchase price allocation from business combination in 2024. Reference is made to note 5.3.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 2 Results for the year 93
Section 3
Operating assets and
liabilities
3.1 Intangible assets
Amortisation
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Cost of goods sold 5,266 1,400 982
Sales and distribution costs — — 9
Research and development costs 1,048 931 649
Administrative costs 29 14 41
Other operating income and expenses 186 167 153
Total amortisation 6,529 2,512 1,834
Impairment losses and reversals
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Cost of goods sold 12 — —
Research and development costs 2,742 7,912 1,108
Other operating income and expenses 6 1,601 306
Total impairment losses and reversals 2,760 9,513 1,414
DKK million
Intellectual
property
rights and
know-how
Software
and other
intangibles
Total
intangible
assets
2025
Cost at the beginning of the year 106,709 6,402 113,111
Additions during the year 28,719 528 29,247
Disposals during the year — (52) (52)
Effect of exchange rate adjustment (663) (178) (841)
Cost at the end of the year 134,765 6,700 141,465
Amortisation and impairment losses at the beginning of the year 19,873 2,434 22,307
Amortisation for the year 6,211 318 6,529
Impairment losses for the year 2,708 52 2,760
Amortisation and impairment losses reversed on disposals during the year — (52) (52)
Effect of exchange rate adjustment (252) (35) (287)
Amortisation and impairment losses at the end of the year 28,540 2,717 31,257
Carrying amount at the end of the year 106,225 3,983 110,208
2024
Cost at the beginning of the year 60,745 5,584 66,329
Additions from acquisition of businesses (note 5.3)
1
 41,154 90 41,244
Additions during the year 4,165 710 4,875
Disposals during the year (213) (70) (283)
Effect of exchange rate adjustment 858 88 946
Cost at the end of the year 106,709 6,402 113,111
Amortisation and impairment losses at the beginning of the year 8,225 2,162 10,387
Amortisation for the year 2,257 255 2,512
Impairment losses for the year 9,441 72 9,513
Amortisation and impairment losses reversed on disposals during the year (213) (70) (283)
Effect of exchange rate adjustment1
 163 15 178
Amortisation and impairment losses at the end of the year 19,873 2,434 22,307
Carrying amount at the end of the year 86,836 3,968 90,804
1. Comparatives were restated to reflect changes in the provisional purchase price allocation from business combination in 2024.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 3 Operating assets and liabilities 94
Intellectual property rights and know-how
Intellectual property rights and know-how with a carrying value of DKK 106,225 million
(DKK 86,836 million in 2024), comprise intellectual property and licenses related mainly
to marketed products, know-how attributable to manufacturing, products and
technologies in development as well as technologies used in the research and
development phase. Intangible assets not yet available for use amount to
DKK 47,079 million (DKK 23,893 million in 2024) and relate to intellectual property
rights, software and other intangibles.
Know-how with a carrying value of DKK 36,834 million (DKK 40,944 million in 2024),
and a remaining useful life of 9 years (10 years in 2024), is recognised in the
acquisition of three fill-finish sites in 2024 and is primarily attributable to the
documented processes and systems for efficient and large-scale production of GLP-1
products as well as know-how to expand capacity in an efficient way. Products and
technologies in development include efruxifermin, a clinical stage drug candidate for
the treatment of compensated cirrhosis due to MASH, with a carrying value of
DKK 23,478 million. Intellectual property and licenses related to marketed products
include Rybelsus® with a carrying value of DKK 4,887 million (DKK 5,453 million in
2024) and a remaining useful life of 9 years (10 years in 2024). Technologies used in
the research and development phase include a RNAi technology platform with a
carrying value of DKK 9,172 million (DKK 9,530 million in 2024), with a remaining
estimated useful life of 19 years (20 years in 2024).
Impairment losses on intellectual property rights
Impairment losses on intellectual property rights amounted to DKK 2,708 million in
2025 (DKK 9,441 million in 2024). There were no individually material impairment
losses recognised in 2025. The single-largest impairment loss recognised in 2024
amounted to DKK 5,650 million arising from the impairment of ocedurenone. The
impairment loss in 2024 is linked to the termination of a phase 3 trial with
ocedurenone which failed to meet its primary endpoints, hence the recoverable
amount was estimated to nil. The impairment loss is recognised in research and
development costs in the segment Obesity and Diabetes care.
KEY ACCOUNTING ESTIMATES IN DETERMINING FAIR VALUES OF INTANGIBLE
ASSETS IN IMPAIRMENT REVIEWS
Intangible assets not yet available for use are tested for impairment at least annually
or when indicators of impairment are identified. Assets that are subject to
amortisation are reviewed for impairment whenever events or changes in
circumstances indicate that the carrying amount may not be recoverable. Factors
considered material that could trigger an impairment test include the following:
• Development of a competing drug
• Realised sales trending below predicted sales
• Changes or anticipated changes in participation rates or reimbursement policies
• Inconsistent or unfavourable clinical readouts
• Changes in the legal framework covering patents, rights and licences
• Advances in medicine and/or technology that affect the medical treatments
• Adverse impact on reputation and/or brand names
• Changes in the economic lives of similar assets
• Relationship to other intangible assets or property, plant and equipment
Impairment tests are based on Management’s projections and anticipated net present
value of estimated future cash flows. The discount rate used is based on the Group
WACC, adjusted where appropriate, to reflect the risk of the specific asset tested. Fair
value is determined using largely unobservable inputs. Accordingly, the valuation
technique and inputs used to measure fair value are classified as level 3 in the fair
value hierarchy. An impairment loss is recognised when the carrying amount of
intangible assets exceeds the recoverable amount. Impairments on intangible assets
are reviewed at each reporting date for possible reversal.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Research and development projects
Internal and subcontracted research costs are fully charged to the consolidated
income statement in the period in which they are incurred. Consistent with industry
practice, development costs are expensed until regulatory approval is obtained
or is probable; refer to note 2.3.
Payments to third parties under collaboration and licence agreements are assessed
for the substance of their nature. Payments which represent subcontracted research
and development work are expensed as the services are received. Payments which
represent transfer of rights of intellectual property are capitalised.
For acquired research and development projects, and intellectual property rights,
the likelihood of obtaining future commercial sales is reflected in the cost of the asset,
and thus the probability recognition criteria is always considered to be satisfied. As the
cost of acquired research and development projects can often be measured reliably,
these projects fulfil the capitalisation criteria as intangible assets on acquisition.
Subsequent milestone payments payable on achievement of a contingent event (e.g.,
commencement of phase 3 trials) are accrued and capitalised into the cost of the
intangible asset when the achievement of the event is probable. Development costs
incurred subsequent to acquisition are treated consistently with internal project
development costs.
Recognition and measurement
Intangible assets acquired separately are initially measured at cost and are
subsequently measured at cost less any accumulated amortisation and any
impairment loss. Identifiable intangible assets acquired in a business combination
are initially measured at fair value.
Amortisation of intellectual property rights is based on the straight-line method over
the estimated useful life. This corresponds to the legal duration or the economic
useful life depending on which is shorter, and not exceeding 25 years in either case.
The amortisation of intellectual property rights commences after regulatory approval
has been obtained or when assets are put in use.
Amortisation of know-how, which arises from business combinations, is based on
the straight-line method over the estimated useful life of 10 years corresponding
to the period in which economic benefits are expected to be realised.
Amortisation of software is based on the straight-line method over the estimated
useful life of 3-15 years. The amortisation commences when the asset is in the
location and condition necessary for it to be capable of operating in the manner
intended by Management.
3.2 Goodwill
DKK million 2025 2024
Cost at the beginning of the year 20,017 4,464
Additions during the year1
 — 15,275
Effect of exchange rate adjustment (172) 278
Cost at the end of the year 19,845 20,017
Carrying amount at the end of the year 19,845 20,017
1. Comparatives were restated to reflect changes in the provisional purchase price allocation
from business combination in 2024. Reference is made to note 5.3.
Impairment review of goodwill
Goodwill is allocated to the segments Obesity and Diabetes care by DKK 19,373 million
(DKK 19,545 million in 2024) and to Rare Disease by DKK 472 million (DKK 472 million
in 2024). The annual impairment review showed that the recoverable amount
significantly exceeds the carrying amount of the cash-generating
units to which goodwill was allocated.
Goodwill is monitored for impairment at the operating segment level, which is the lowest
level CGU to which consolidated goodwill is allocated and monitored by Management.
CGUs are therefore defined as Novo Nordisk's operating segments, Obesity and Diabetes
care and Rare disease. Goodwill is allocated to operating segments based on expected
future cash flow from products utilising the synergies. The recoverable amount is
estimated based on fair value, with fair value being estimated at net present value using
an income-approach. The applied post-tax discount rates are 7.0% (Pre-tax discount rate
of 8.3%). Cash flow projections are based on budgets approved by Management and
cover a five-year forecast period, supplemented by a terminal value to reflect cash flows
beyond this period.
The key estimations relate to volume of market share, growth rates, pricing,
development of new markets and the success rate for introducing new products and
treatments. Assumptions are affected by external factors such as market and generic
competition, and price regulation. Key assumptions reflect past experience adjusted
for market specific risks or expected changes. Fair value is determined using largely
unobservable inputs.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 3 Operating assets and liabilities 95
3.3 Property, plant and equipment
Depreciation
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Cost of goods sold 4,703 3,799 3,522
Sales and distribution costs 560 487 500
Research and development costs 1,439 1,120 1,053
Administrative costs 586 554 354
Other operating income and expenses 849 73 26
Total depreciation 8,137 6,033 5,455
Of which related to leased assets 1,671 1,500 1,251
Impairment losses and reversals
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Cost of goods sold 2,714 962 446
Sales and distribution costs 5 9 4
Research and development costs 1,588 78 260
Other operating income and expenses 249 — —
Total impairment losses and reversals 4,556 1,049 710
Of which related to leased assets 216 9 —
DKK million
Land and
buildings
Plant and
machinery
Other
equipment
Assets
under
construction
Property,
plant and
equipment
2025
Cost at the beginning of the year 61,374 57,039 10,166 85,497 214,076
Additions during the year 5,127 1,877 1,222 56,776 65,002
Disposals during the year (392) (509) (647) (3,612) (5,160)
Transfer and reclassifications 2,287 3,564 762 (6,613) —
Effect of exchange rate adjustment (2,837) (1,951) (390) (1,426) (6,604)
Cost at the end of the year 65,559 60,020 11,113 130,622 267,314
Depreciation and impairment losses at the beginning of the year 20,704 25,558 6,134 — 52,396
Depreciation for the year 3,438 3,382 1,317 — 8,137
Impairment losses for the year 401 400 180 3,575 4,556
Depreciation and impairment losses reversed on disposals during the year (321) (371) (589) (3,575) (4,856)
Effect of exchange rate adjustment (565) (493) (239) — (1,297)
Depreciation and impairment losses at the end of the year 23,657 28,476 6,803 — 58,936
Carrying amount at the end of the year 41,902 31,544 4,310 130,622 208,378
2024
Cost at the beginning of the year 48,990 40,951 8,979 39,663 138,583
Additions from acquisition of businesses (note 5.3)1
 5,937 12,325 276 6,104 24,642
Additions during the year 3,789 872 874 46,650 52,185
Disposals during the year (632) (1,305) (547) (524) (3,008)
Transfer and reclassifications 2,342 3,602 509 (6,453) —
Effect of exchange rate adjustment 948 594 75 57 1,674
Cost at the end of the year 61,374 57,039 10,166 85,497 214,076
Depreciation and impairment losses at the beginning of the year 18,325 23,834 5,463 — 47,622
Depreciation for the year 2,786 2,099 1,148 — 6,033
Impairment losses for the year 43 474 8 524 1,049
Depreciation and impairment losses reversed on disposals during the year (563) (918) (538) (524) (2,543)
Effect of exchange rate adjustment 113 69 53 — 235
Depreciation and impairment losses at the end of the year 20,704 25,558 6,134 — 52,396
Carrying amount at the end of the year 40,670 31,481 4,032 85,497 161,680
1. Comparatives were restated to reflect changes in the provisional purchase price allocation from business combination in 2024.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 3 Operating assets and liabilities 96
Novo Nordisk mainly leases office buildings, warehouses, laboratories and vehicles.
The right-of-use asset is presented in property, plant and equipment and the lease
liability in borrowings.
Leased property, plant and equipment
DKK million 2025 2024
Land and buildings 7,600 6,067
Other equipment 881 775
Total 8,481 6,842
The total cash outflow for leases amounted to DKK 2,447 million (DKK 2,211 million
in 2024 and DKK 2,022 million in 2023). Refer to note 4.6 for a maturity analysis of
lease payments and 5.2 for commitments not recognised in the balance sheet
related to leases.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Property, plant and equipment is measured at historical cost less accumulated
depreciations and any impairment losses. The cost of self-constructed assets includes
costs directly attributable to the construction of the assets. Any subsequent cost is
included in the asset’s carrying amount or recognised as a separate asset only when
it is probable that future economic benefits associated with the item will flow to Novo
Nordisk, and the cost of the item can be measured reliably. Depreciation is based on
the straight-line method over the estimated useful life of the assets (buildings: 10-50
years, plant and machinery: 5-25 years and other equipment: 3-10 years. Land is not
depreciated), unless another depreciation method better reflects how future economic
benefits are expected to be consumed. Climate-related matters, including the
commitment to reach net zero emissions, were considered when estimating the
useful lives of property, plant and equipment.
Depreciation commences when the asset is available for use, i.e. when it is in the location
and condition necessary for it to be capable of operating in the manner intended by
Management. The asset's residual value and useful life is reviewed and adjusted, if
appropriate, at the end of each reporting period. If an asset’s carrying amount is higher
than its estimated recoverable amount, it is written down to the recoverable amount.
Plant and equipment with no alternative use developed as part of a research and
development project are expensed. However, plant and equipment with an alternative
use or used for general research and development purposes are capitalised and
depreciated over the estimated useful life as research and development costs.
For contracts which are, or contain, a lease, a right-of-use asset and a lease liability is
recognised. Right-of-use assets are initially measured at cost, being the initial amount
of the lease liability. Right-of-use assets are subsequently depreciated using the
straight-line method over the lease term. The lease term comprises the noncancellable period of a lease, together with periods covered by extension options
if these are reasonably certain to be exercised.
3.4 Inventories
DKK million 2025 2024
Raw materials 17,436 13,369
Work in progress 25,858 22,335
Finished goods 11,990 8,873
Total inventories (gross) 55,284 44,577
Write-downs at year-end (5,661) (3,728)
Total inventories (net) 49,623 40,849
Indirect production costs included in work in
progress and finished goods 18,867 15,082
Share of total inventories (net) 38% 37%
Movements in inventory write-downs:
Write-downs at the beginning of the year 3,728 2,514
Write-downs during the year 4,272 2,660
Utilisation of write-downs (2,046) (1,401)
Reversal of write-downs (293) (45)
Write-downs at the end of the year 5,661 3,728
All write-downs in both 2025 and 2024 relate to fully impaired inventory.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Inventories are stated at cost or net realisable value, whichever is lower. Cost is
determined using the first-in, first-out method. Cost comprises direct production
costs such as raw materials, consumables and labour. Production costs for work in
progress and finished goods include indirect production costs such as employee costs,
depreciation, maintenance, etc. If the expected sales price less completion costs to
execute sales (net realisable value) is lower than the carrying amount, a write-down is
recognised for the amount by which the carrying amount exceeds its net realisable value.
Inventory manufactured prior to regulatory approval (prelaunch inventory) is
capitalised but immediately written down, until there is a high probability of regulatory
approval for the product. The cost is recognised in the income statement as research
and development costs. Once there is a high probability of regulatory approval being
obtained, the write-down is reversed, up to no more than the original cost.
3.5 Trade receivables
DKK million
Gross
carrying
amount
Loss
allowance
Net
carrying
amount
2025
Not yet due 70,034 (1,244) 68,790
1-90 days 1,813 (141) 1,672
91-180 days 295 (76) 219
181-270 days 212 (37) 175
271-360 days 114 (114) —
More than 360 days past due 375 (375) —
Trade receivables 72,843 (1,987) 70,856
2024
Not yet due 71,245 (1,049) 70,196
1-90 days 1,452 (230) 1,222
91-180 days 415 (110) 305
181-270 days 328 (102) 226
271-360 days 341 (341) —
More than 360 days past due 295 (295) —
Trade receivables 74,076 (2,127) 71,949
Allowance for doubtful trade receivables
DKK million 2025 2024
Carrying amount at the beginning of the year 2,127 1,794
Reversal of allowance on realised losses (70) (70)
Net movement recognised in income statement 44 445
Effect of exchange rate adjustment (114) (42)
Allowance at the end of the year 1,987 2,127
Novo Nordisk’s customer base is comprised of government agencies, wholesalers,
retail pharmacies and other customers. Novo Nordisk closely monitors the current
economic conditions of countries impacted by currency fluctuations, high inflation
and an unstable political climate. These indicators, as well as payment history, are
taken into account in the valuation of trade receivables.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 3 Operating assets and liabilities 97
No loss allowance has been recognised on trade receivables in trade receivable
programmes in 2025 and 2024. Refer to note 4.4 for more information on credit
exposures and trade receivable programmes.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Trade receivables are initially recognised at transaction price. Subsequently, trade
receivables eligible for factoring are measured at fair value with changes recognised in
other comprehensive income, while the remainder of trade receivables is measured at
amortised cost. The allowance for doubtful receivables is deducted from the carrying
amount of trade receivables, with changes recognised in sales and distribution costs.
Management measures allowance for doubtful trade receivables based on the
simplified approach to provide for expected credit losses, which requires the use
of the lifetime expected loss provision for all trade receivables. The allowance is an
estimate based on shared credit risk characteristics and the days past due. Generally,
invoices are due for payment within 90 days from shipment of goods. Loss allowance
is calculated using an ageing factor, geographical risk and specific customer
knowledge. The allowance is based on individual customer assessments, a provision
matrix based on days past due and a forward looking element relating to
incorporation of external country risk ratings.
Refer to note 4.4 for a general description of credit risk.
3.6 Provisions and contingent liabilities
DKK million
Provisions
for legal
disputes
Other
provisions2
2025
Total
Provisions
for legal
disputes
Other
provisions2
2024
Total
At the beginning of the year 4,179 3,092 7,271 3,786 1,931 5,717
Additional provisions, including increases to existing provisions 124 859 983 202 798 1,000
Additional provisions from acquisition of businesses (note 5.3) 1 — — — — 884 884
Amount used during the year (144) (343) (487) — (191) (191)
Adjustments regarding prior years, including unused amounts reversed during the year (506) (477) (983) (31) (320) (351)
Effect of exchange rate adjustment (489) (191) (680) 222 (10) 212
At the end of the year 3,164 2,940 6,104 4,179 3,092 7,271
Non-current liabilities3 3,139 2,591 5,730 4,154 2,828 6,982
Current liabilities 25 349 374 25 264 289
1. Comparatives were restated to reflect changes in the provisional purchase price allocation from business combination in 2024. 2. Other provisions consist of various types of provisions, including contingent payments
arising from business combinations and obligations in relation to employee benefits such as jubilee benefits. 3. For non-current liabilities related to legal disputes, the timing of settlement cannot be determined.
Contingent liabilities
Novo Nordisk is currently involved in pending litigations, arbitrations, claims and
investigations arising out of the normal conduct of its business. While provisions that
Management deems to be reasonable and appropriate have been made for probable
losses, there are inherent uncertainties connected with these estimates.
Since January 2021, Novo Nordisk Inc. (“NNI”) has made a number of changes to its
policy in the US related to facilitating delivery of its discounted medicines to
commercial pharmacies that contract with covered entities participating in the 340B
Drug Pricing Program. Novo Nordisk’s 340B policy has been the subject of legal
challenges. As a result, Novo Nordisk has only recognised revenue related to the 340B
Drug Pricing Program to the extent that in Management’s assessment it is highly
probable that its inclusion will not result in a significant revenue reversal in the future.
Management’s assessment considers interpretations of applicable laws, and legal and
administrative rulings, as well as attrition and experience from historical claims. As of
31 December 2025, provisions for 340B statutory discounts included in the ‘sales
deductions and product returns’ amounted to USD 4.2 billion.
On 30 January 2023, the US Court of Appeals for the Third Circuit issued a ruling
holding that Novo Nordisk’s drug distribution policy was consistent with the 340B
statute. On 21 May 2024, the US Court of Appeals for the DC Circuit issued a ruling in a
different case involving the drug distribution policies of other pharmaceutical
manufacturers that similarly held that their drug distribution policies were consistent
with the 340B statute. However, an appeal in another case involving the drug
distribution policy of another pharmaceutical manufacturer is still pending before the
US Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit, and as such these cases may be subject to
further discretionary appellate review before the US Supreme Court. Subsequent to
the ruling by the US Court of Appeals for the Third Circuit, covered entities filed ADR
petitions against the Company before the Health Resources and Services
Administration (“HRSA”) to recover alleged overcharges related to the 340B Drug
Pricing Program. On 4 December 2025, HRSA dismissed an ADR petition filed by two
covered entities, the University of Washington Medical Center (“UW”) and Harborview
Medical Center (“Harborview”), stating that Novo Nordisk’s 340B policy did not result in
overcharges to either covered entity, citing the ruling of the US Court of Appeals for
the Third Circuit. This decision, rendered by the ADR Panel even in the absence of a
ruling from the Seventh Circuit, is evidence that HRSA is applying the Third Circuit
ruling as the law governing overcharge claims alleged by covered entities relating to
Novo Nordisk’s 340B policy. Neither UW nor Harborview timely sought reconsideration
of the decision, which became final and effective on 20 January 2026 after the
expiration of the reconsideration deadline. As a result, Novo Nordisk has determined
that, as of 20 January 2026, it is highly probable that the inclusion of revenue relating
to the 340B Drug Pricing Program claims that was previously constrained will not
result in a significant reversal in the future. As such, the Company will in the first
quarter of 2026 recognise revenue of USD 4.2 billion comprising the entire amount of
provisions for 340B statutory discounts included in ‘sales deductions and product
returns’.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 3 Operating assets and liabilities 98
Pending litigation against Novo Nordisk
Mosaic Health Inc. and Central Virginia Health Services, Inc. (both 340B covered
entities) filed a putative class action lawsuit in Federal Court in New York against NNI,
Eli Lilly and Company, Sanofi and AstraZeneca alleging a conspiracy among the
manufacturers to artificially fix prices of diabetes medications through changes to
their policies relating to the distribution of 340B drugs. The lawsuit was subsequently
dismissed by the District Court on 2 September 2022, yet this ruling was reversed and
remanded back the District Court by the United States Court of Appeals for the Second
Circuit. Novo Nordisk does not expect this matter to have a material impact on Novo
Nordisk’s financial position, operating profit or cash flow.
Novo Nordisk is currently defending numerous lawsuits, including putative class
actions, relating to the pricing of diabetes medicines in the US. The first lawsuit was
filed in 2017 and in August 2023 a multi-district litigation was created in the United
States District court for the District of New Jersey. Nearly all pending matters also
name Eli Lilly and Company and Sanofi as defendants, while certain matters also name
Pharmacy Benefit Managers ("PBMs") and related entities. Plaintiffs generally allege that
the manufacturers and PBMs colluded to artificially inflate list prices paid by consumers
for diabetes products, while offering reduced prices to PBMs through rebates used to
secure formulary access. Novo Nordisk does not expect these matters to have a material
impact on Novo Nordisk’s financial position, operating profit or cash flow.
In 2015, a former Novo Nordisk employee (the “Relator”) filed a qui tam lawsuit
alleging Novo Nordisk provided kickbacks to patient and physicians and caused the
submission of false claims to Medicare, Medicaid, Federal Employees Health Benefits
Program and private insurers in California relating to NovoSeven®. After the US
Department of Justice (”DOJ”) declined to intervene in that lawsuit, the Relator and the
Washington State Attorney General (“WAG”) proceeded with the lawsuit. A jury trial
was conducted in this matter, which resulted in a defense verdict in favor of Novo
Nordisk in November 2025. Relator and WAG have filed an appeal to the US Court of
Appeals for the Ninth Circuit. Novo Nordisk does not expect this matter to have a
material impact on Novo Nordisk’s financial position, operating profit or cash flow.
In 2021, two former Novo Nordisk employees (the “Relators”) filed a qui tam lawsuit in
the United States District Court for the District of Columbia alleging Novo Nordisk
provided kickbacks to physicians and caused the submission of false claims to federal
healthcare programs relating to the promotion of Ozempic® and Rybelsus® and that
the Relators’ employment was wrongfully terminated. Novo Nordisk does not expect
this matter to have a material impact on Novo Nordisk’s financial position, operating
profit or cash flow.
Novo Nordisk, along with Eli Lilly, are defendants in numerous product liability
lawsuits (mainly in in the US) related to the use of GLP-1-based medicines. Plaintiffs
have alleged that the use of these medicines, including Victoza®, Ozempic®,
Wegovy® and Rybelsus®, have caused various gastrointestinal and other injuries.
The US lawsuits are pending in various federal and state courts, with many matters
having been consolidated in two multi-district litigations in the United States District
Court for the Eastern District of Pennsylvania. Novo Nordisk does not expect these
matters to have a material impact on Novo Nordisk’s financial position, operating
profit or cash flow.
On 13 September 2024, five former employees filed a putative class action against
NNI, the NNI Board of Directors, and the NNI Retirement Committee alleging claims
for breach of fiduciary duty in connection with the management of the NNI Retirement
Plan. The complaint alleges that, from September 2018 to the present, certain conduct
violated the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974. Novo Nordisk does not
expect this matter to have a material impact on Novo Nordisk’s financial position,
operating profit or cash flow.
On 24 January 2025, a class-action lawsuit was filed against Novo Nordisk A/S,
former Chief Executive Officer Lars Fruergaard Jørgensen and Executive Vice
President, R&D and Chief Scientific Officer Martin Holst Lange in the United States
District Court for the District of New Jersey by a proposed class of purchasers of Novo
Nordisk ADRs between 2 November 2022 and 19 December 2024. The lawsuit relates
to REDEFINE-1 and alleges that the company failed to disclose or otherwise misled
investors as to the nature of the dosages provided to patients in the study and that the
company misleadingly exhibited confidence in its expected 25% average weight loss
outcome. Novo Nordisk does not expect the litigation to have a material impact on
Novo Nordisk’s financial position, operating profit or cash flow.
On 1 August 2025, a class-action lawsuit was filed against Novo Nordisk A/S, former
Chief Executive Officer Lars Fruergaard Jørgensen, Chief Executive Officer Maziar Mike
Doustdar, Chief Financial Officer Karsten Munk Knudsen and Executive Vice President
Dave S. Moore in the United States District Court for the District of New Jersey by
proposed class of purchasers of Novo Nordisk ADRs between 7 May 2025 and 28 July
2025. The lawsuit alleges that the company misled investors as to its potential to
capitalise on the compounded market for GLP-1 medicines, understated the potential
impact of the personalised exception for compounding of GLP-1 medicines and
overstated the company’s ability to penetrate the GLP-1 market to achieve continued
growth. Novo Nordisk does not expect the litigation to have a material impact on Novo
Nordisk’s financial position, operating profit or cash flow.
Other provisions and contingent liabilities
In February 2023, a class action lawsuit was filed by the City of Warwick Retirement
System (”City of Warwick”) against Catalent, Inc. (”Catalent”) and co-defendants in the
United States District Court for the District of New Jersey. The lawsuit alleges that the
defendants artificially inflated Catalent’s revenue and made misleading statements
and omissions concerning Catalent’s quality control issues; compliance with the US
Generally Accepted Accounting Principles; and the general demand for non-vaccine
products. In December 2024, Novo Nordisk acquired three Catalent fill-finish sites
from Novo Holding A/S, including a portion of any potential financial liability
associated with the City of Warwick lawsuit. In November 2025, Catalent settled this
lawsuit for an amount fully covered through Catalent insurance policies. Final court
approval of the settlement is anticipated in mid-2026.
In addition to the above, Novo Nordisk is engaged in certain litigation proceedings
and various ongoing audits and investigations. In the opinion of Management, neither
settlement nor continuation of such proceedings, nor such pending audits and
investigations, are expected to have a material effect on Novo Nordisk’s financial
position, operating profit or cash flow.
KEY ACCOUNTING ESTIMATES REGARDING ONGOING LEGAL DISPUTES,
LITIGATION AND INVESTIGATIONS
Provisions for legal disputes consist of various types of provisions linked to ongoing
legal disputes. Management makes estimates regarding provisions and contingencies,
including the probability of pending and potential future litigation outcomes. These
are by nature dependent on inherently uncertain future events. When determining
likely outcomes of litigation, etc., Management considers the input of external counsel
on each case, as well as known outcomes in case law. Although Management believes
that the total provisions for legal proceedings are adequate based on currently
available information, there can be no assurance that there will not be any changes in
facts or matters, or that any future lawsuits, claims, proceedings or investigations will
not be material.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Provisions for legal disputes are recognised where a legal or constructive obligation
has been incurred as a result of past events and it is probable that there will be an
outflow of resources that can be reliably estimated. In this case, Novo Nordisk arrives
at an estimate based on an evaluation of the most likely outcome. Disputes for which
no reliable estimate can be made are disclosed as contingent liabilities.
Provisions are measured at the present value of the anticipated expenditure for
settlement. This is calculated using a pre-tax discount rate that reflects current market
assessments of the time value of money and the risks specific to the obligation.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 3 Operating assets and liabilities 99
Section 4
Capital structure and
financial items
4.1 Earnings per share
2025 2024 2023
Net profit DKK million 102,434 100,988 83,683
Average number of shares
outstanding1
in million
shares 4,443.0 4,453.9 4,482.8
Average dilutive effect of
restricted stock units
in million
shares 4.7 9.1 12.0
Average number of shares
outstanding, including
dilutive effect
in million
shares 4,447.7 4,463.0 4,494.8
Basic earnings per share DKK 23.06 22.67 18.67
Diluted earnings per share DKK 23.03 22.63 18.62
1. Excluding treasury shares.
The trading unit of the Novo Nordisk B shares listed on NASDAQ Copenhagen was
changed from DKK 0.20 to DKK 0.10 as of 13 September 2023. The ADRs listed on
the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE) were similarly split as of 20 September 2023.
4.2 Distribution to shareholders
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Interim dividend for the year 16,663 15,583 13,430
Dividend for prior year 35,100 28,557 18,337
Dividend payout in the year 51,763 44,140 31,767
Share repurchases for the year 1,388 20,181 29,924
Total distribution for the year 53,151 64,321 61,691
Novo Nordisk's dividend pay-outs in the year were complemented by a share
repurchase programme ending on 3 February 2025. Novo Nordisk's guiding principle
is that any excess capital after the funding of organic growth opportunities and
potential acquisitions should be returned to investors. No dividend is declared on
treasury shares.
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Interim dividend1 16,663 15,583 13,430
Final dividend2 35,312 35,100 28,557
Total dividend 51,975 50,683 41,987
DKK per share 2025 2024 2023
Interim dividend1 3.75 3.50 3.00
Final dividend2 7.95 7.90 6.40
Total dividend 11.70 11.40 9.40
1. Interim dividend was paid in August 2025. 2. Final dividend for 2025 is expected to be
distributed pending approval at the Annual General Meeting in March 2026. Final dividend for
2024 was approved in March 2025 and paid in March 2025 (final dividend on A shares) and April
2025 (final dividend on B shares).
4.3 Share capital, Treasury shares and Other reserves
Development in number of shares
Number of shares (million)
A
shares
B
shares
Total
issued
shares
Treasury
shares
Outstanding
shares
Shares beginning of 2024 1,075 3,435 4,510 (52) 4,458
Shares cancelled in 2024 — (45) (45) 45 —
Released allocated shares
to employees — — — 8 8
Shares purchased in 2024 — — — (25) (25)
Number of shares end
of 2024 1,075 3,390 4,465 (24) 4,441
Released allocated shares
to employees — — — 5 5
Shares purchased in 2025 — — — (2) (2)
Number of shares end
of 2025 1,075 3,390 4,465 (21) 4,444
The A share capital and number of A shares of DKK 0.10 was unchanged in 2025 and 2024.
In 2024, the B share capital decreased by DKK 4.5 million (equal to cancellation of 45
million shares of DKK 0.10).
Each A share of DKK 0.10 per share carries 100 votes and each B share of DKK 0.10 per
share carries 10 votes.
At the end of 2025, the holding of treasury shares amounted to 0.5% of the total
outstanding shares (0.5% of the outstanding shares in 2024). Treasury shares are
primarily acquired to reduce the company's share capital. In addition, a limited part is
used to finance Novo Nordisk's long-term share-based incentive programme and
restricted stock units to employees. Treasury shares are deducted from the share
capital on cancellation at their nominal value of DKK 0.10 per share. Differences
between this amount and the amount paid to acquire or received for disposing of
treasury shares are deducted directly in retained earnings.
The purchase of treasury shares during the year relates to the remaining part of the
DKK 20 billion Novo Nordisk B share repurchase programme for 2024/2025. The
programme ended on 3 February 2025.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 4 Capital structure and financial items 100
Specification of Other reserves
DKK million
Exchange
rate
adjustments
Cash flow
hedges1
Tax and
other items Total
Reserve at 1 January 2023 1,385 1,026 38 2,449
Other comprehensive
income, net (1,404) 586 (355) (1,173)
Reserve at 31 December 2023 (19) 1,612 (317) 1,276
Other comprehensive
income, net 3,096 (6,221) 1,343 (1,782)
Transferred to
intangible assets2 — (1,154) 254 (900)
Reserve at 31 December 2024 3,077 (5,763) 1,280 (1,406)
Other comprehensive
income, net (7,759) 10,102 (2,632) (289)
Reserve at 31 December 2025 (4,682) 4,339 (1,352) (1,695)
1. Refer to note 4.5 for information on cash flow hedges. 2. A gain from cash flow hedges related to
acquisition of businesses of DKK 1,154 million was transferred directly from the cash flow hedge
reserve on an after-tax basis to the initial cost of net assets acquired leading to a net hedging effect
of DKK 900 million.
According to Danish corporate law, reserves available for distribution as dividends
are based on the financial statements of the parent company, Novo Nordisk A/S.
Dividends are declared and paid from distributable reserves. As of 31 December
2025, distributable reserves total DKK 141,045 million (DKK 121,931 million in 2024),
corresponding to the parent company's retained earnings and Reserve for cash flow
hedges and exchange rate adjustments.
4.4 Financial risks
Management has assessed the following key financial risks:
Type Financial risk
Foreign exchange risk High
Credit risk Low
Interest rate risk Low
Liquidity risk Low
Novo Nordisk has centralised management of the Group's financial risks. The overall
objectives and policies for the company's financial risk management are outlined in
the internal Treasury Policy, which is approved by the Board of Directors. The Treasury
Policy consists of the Foreign Exchange Policy, the Investment Policy, the Financing
Policy and the Policy regarding Credit Risk on Financial Counterparts, and includes a
description of permitted use of financial instruments and risk limits.
Novo Nordisk only hedges commercial exposures and consequently does not enter
into derivative transactions for trading or speculative purposes. Novo Nordisk uses a
fully integrated treasury management system to manage all financial positions, and
all positions are marked-to-market.
Novo Nordisk's rating is AA and Aa3 from S&P and Moody's, respectively.
Foreign exchange risk
Foreign exchange risk is the largest financial risk for Novo Nordisk and can have a
significant impact on the income statement, statement of comprehensive income,
balance sheet and cash flow statement. The majority of Novo Nordisk's foreign
exchange exposure is in USD, EUR, CNY, and JPY combined. The foreign exchange risk
is most significant in USD. The exchange rate risk from EUR is regarded as low because
of Denmark's fixed exchange rate policy towards EUR. The overall objective of foreign
exchange risk management is to reduce the short-term negative impact of exchange
rate fluctuations on earnings and cash flow, thereby contributing to the predictability
of the financial results. In selected currencies, Novo Nordisk hedges assets and
liabilities as well as future expected cash flows up to a maximum of 24 months.
Hedge accounting is applied to match the impact of the hedged item and the hedging
instrument in the consolidated income statement. The currency hedging strategy
balances risk reduction and cost of hedging by use of foreign exchange forwards and
foreign exchange options matching the due dates of the hedged items. The approach
is dynamic as expected cash flows and hedging hereof are continually assessed using
historical inflows, budgets and monthly sales forecasts. Hedge effectiveness is
assessed on a regular basis.
Exchange rates applied for hedged currencies1
USD CNY JPY
Average exchange rate applied (DKK per 100)
2025 662 92 4.43
2024 689 96 4.56
2023 689 97 4.91
Year-end exchange rate applied (DKK per 100)
2025 635 91 4.07
2024 714 98 4.53
2023 674 95 4.77
1. Exchange rates applied for EUR are not included because the exchange rate risk exposure in EUR
is regarded as low.
Sensitivity on financial instruments of an immediate 5% decrease in currency
rates on 31 December vs DKK2
DKK million 2025 2024
Sensitivity of all currencies
Impact on profit before tax (153) (323)
Impact on equity 5,678 8,012
Total 5,525 7,689
Of which sensitivity to USD
Impact on profit before tax 348 148
Impact on equity 4,901 7,178
Total 5,249 7,326
2. An immediate 5% increase would have the opposite impact to the above.
The foreign exchange sensitivity analysis comprises effects from the Group's financial
instruments, including cash, trade receivables and trade payables, current loans,
current and non-current financial investments, lease liabilities and foreign exchange
forwards. Anticipated currency transactions, investments in foreign subsidiaries and
non-current assets are not included. The main impact is driven by forward contracts
used for hedging activities.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 4 Capital structure and financial items 101
Financial contracts coverage at year end
Months USD CNY3
JPY
2025 12 12 12
2024 12 12 12
3. Chinese yuan traded offshore (CNH) is used to hedge Novo Nordisk's CNY currency exposure.
The table above shows hedge coverage horizon existing at year-end to cover the
expected future cash flow for the disclosed number of months. Average hedge rate
for USD cash flow hedges is 653 at the end of 2025 (676 at the end of 2024).
Credit risk
Credit risk arises from the possibility that transactional counterparties may default
on their obligations towards the Group.
Credit exposure for cash at bank, marketable securities and
derivative financial instruments (fair value)
DKK million
Cash at
bank
Marketable
securities
Derivative
financial
instruments Total
2025
AAA range — 498 — 498
AA range 10,026 — 1,777 11,803
A range 15,457 — 4,905 20,362
BBB range 200 — — 200
Not rated or below
BBB range 781 — — 781
Total 26,464 498 6,682 33,644
2024
AAA range — 10,653 — 10,653
AA range 6,582 — 1,773 8,355
A range 8,278 — 4,553 12,831
BBB range 172 — — 172
Not rated or below
BBB range 623 — — 623
Total 15,655 10,653 6,326 32,634
Credit risk exposure to financial counterparties
Novo Nordisk considers its maximum credit exposure to financial counterparties
to be DKK 33,644 million (DKK 32,634 million in 2024).
To manage credit risk regarding financial counterparties, Novo Nordisk only enters
into derivative financial contracts and money market deposits with financial
counterparties possessing a satisfactory long-term credit rating from at least two
of the three selected rating agencies: Standard and Poor's, Moody's and Fitch.
Furthermore, maximum credit lines defined for each counterparty diversify the
overall counterparty risk. The credit risk on marketable securities is low, as
investments are made in highly liquid bonds with AAA credit ratings.
Credit risk exposure to non-financial counterparties
Novo Nordisk considers its maximum credit exposure to trade receivables, other
receivables (less prepayments and VAT receivables) and other financial assets to be
DKK 75,834 million (DKK 78,463 million in 2024). Refer to note 4.8 for details of the
Group's total financial assets.
Outside the US, Novo Nordisk has no significant concentration of credit risk related
to trade receivables or other receivables and prepayments, because the exposure in
general is spread over a large number of counterparties and customers. In the US, the
three major wholesalers account for a large proportion of total net sales, see note 2.1.
However, US wholesaler credit ratings are monitored, and part of the trade receivables
are sold on full non-recourse terms; see below for details.
Novo Nordisk closely monitors the current economic conditions of countries impacted
by currency fluctuations, high inflation and an unstable political climate. These
indicators, as well as payment history are taken into account in the valuation of
trade receivables.
Trade receivable programmes
Novo Nordisk's subsidiaries in the US and Japan employ trade receivable programmes
in which trade receivables are sold on full non-recourse terms to optimise working
capital. At year-end, the Group had derecognised receivables without recourse having
due dates after 31 December amounting to:
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
US 3,812 3,214 5,059
Japan 1,747 1,834 2,050
Interest rate risk
Novo Nordisk's exposure to interest rate risk is deemed low, because the company's
interest-bearing liabilities consist primarily of fixed rate bonds and, to a lesser extent,
floating rate bonds. Refer to note 4.6 for details on borrowings. The risk associated
with variable interest-bearing liabilities is offset by variable interest-bearing assets.
These assets consist of cash, cash equivalents, and marketable securities with a low
portfolio duration. Taking into account these balancing factors, the overall interest
rate risk is assessed to be low.
Liquidity risk
Novo Nordisk´s liquidity risk is considered to be low. The availability of the required
liquidity is ensured through a combination of cash pools for cash centralisation, highly
liquid investment portfolios and both uncommitted and committed credit facilities. In
combination these factors mitigate short-term liquidity risk.
Financial reserves
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Cash at bank 26,464 15,655 14,392
Marketable securities 498 10,653 15,838
Undrawn committed credit facility4 24,401 22,380 11,552
Undrawn bridge facility 7,469 6,341 —
Borrowings (10,681) (11,775) (5,431)
Financial reserves 48,151 43,254 36,351
4. The undrawn committed credit facility comprises a facility of EUR 3,267 million in 2025 (EUR
3,000 million in 2024 and EUR 1,550 million in 2023) committed by a portfolio of international banks.
The facility matures in 2030.
Financial reserves comprise sources of liquidity, as shown in the table above, less
borrowings that are contractually obliged to be repaid within 12 months. Borrowings,
which reduce the financial reserves, consist of current borrowings (DKK 12,017 million)
excluding leasing (DKK 1,336 million).
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 4 Capital structure and financial items 102
4.5 Derivative financial instruments
2025 2024
DKK million
Average
rate
Contract
amount
at year-end
Positive
fair value
at year-end
Negative
fair value
at year-end
Average
rate
Contract
amount
at year-end
Positive
fair value
at year-end
Negative
fair value
at year-end
Cash flow hedges
Forward contracts USD 653 101,884 4,316 497 676 137,781 13 5,704
Forward contracts CNH and JPY 16,356 598 78 16,910 109 181
Forward contracts recognised in other comprehensive income 118,240 4,914 575 154,691 122 5,885
Fair value hedges
Forward contracts USD 632 69,406 1,186 1,351 683 75,864 6,135 1,577
Forward contracts EUR1 102,282 272 1 10,597 15 3
Forward contracts CNH, JPY and others 11,492 310 99 6,854 54 66
Forward contracts recognised in the income statement 183,180 1,768 1,451 93,315 6,204 1,646
Total derivative financial instruments 301,420 6,682 2,026 248,006 6,326 7,531
1.The EUR forward contracts hedge the Eurobonds, see note 4.6. Despite the foreign exchange risk from EUR being considered low, the Eurobonds are hedged due to the size of the outstanding balance.
Deferred gains of DKK 4,339 million from cash flow hedges open at year-end were
recorded in Other Comprehensive Income. The corresponding amount of deferred
losses in 2024 was DKK 5,763 million.
Forward contracts are expected to impact the income statement within the next 12
months through financial income or expenses. There is no ineffectiveness recognised
at 31 December 2025.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
On initiation of the contract, Novo Nordisk designates each derivative financial
contract that qualifies for hedge accounting as one of:
• hedges of the fair value of a recognised asset or liability (fair value hedge)
• hedges of a forecast financial transaction (cash flow hedge).
All contracts are initially recognised at fair value and subsequently remeasured
at fair value at the end of the reporting period.
Fair value hedges
Value adjustments of fair value hedges are recognised in the income statement, along
with any value adjustments of the hedged asset or liability that are attributable to the
hedged risk.
Cash flow hedges
Value adjustments of the effective part of cash flow hedges are recognised in other
comprehensive income. The cumulative value adjustment of these contracts is
transferred to the income statement when the hedged transaction is recognised in the
income statement.
For cash flow hedges of foreign currency risk on highly probable non-financial asset
purchases, the cumulative value adjustments are transferred directly from the cash
flow hedge reserve to the initial cost of the asset when recognised.
Discontinuance of cash flow hedging
When a hedging instrument expires or is sold, or when a hedge no longer meets the
criteria for hedge accounting, any cumulative gain or loss existing in equity at that
time remains in equity and is transferred when the forecasted transaction is ultimately
recognised in the income statement. When a forecasted transaction is no longer
expected to occur, the cumulative gain
or loss that was reported in equity is immediately transferred to the income statement
under financial income or financial expenses.
For additional disclosures on accounting policies for financial instruments refer to
note 4.8.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 4 Capital structure and financial items 103
4.6 Borrowings
Liabilities arising from financing activities Non-cash movements
DKK million
Beginning of
the year
Repayments Proceeds Additions1 Disposals
Exchange
rates Other
End of the
year
2025
Lease liabilities 6,766 (1,503) — 3,935 (23) (628) 25 8,572
Eurobonds 50,528 (3,734) 74,091 — — 118 71 121,074
Loans 39,701 (45,898) 6,599 — — (18) — 384
Commercial papers 5,343 (27,865) 23,261 — — 6 — 745
Bank overdrafts 449 (188) (20) — — (58) — 183
Total borrowings 102,787 (79,188) 103,931 3,935 (23) (580) 96 130,958
2024
Lease liabilities 5,726 (1,417) — 2,383 (3) 71 6 6,766
Eurobonds 20,824 (4,849) 34,513 — — 12 28 50,528
Loans — — 39,494 201 — 6 — 39,701
Commercial papers — — 5,344 — — (1) — 5,343
Bank overdrafts 456 (69) 40 — — 22 — 449
Total borrowings 27,006 (6,335) 79,391 2,584 (3) 110 34 102,787
1. Non-cash additions in 2024 include additions from acquisitions of businesses.
Issuance of Eurobonds Nominal value in millions
Interest Issue date Maturity EUR DKK
3.375% Fixed May 2024 May 2026 1,300 9,710
3mEuribor + 30bp May 2025 May 2027 1,400 10,456
1.125% Fixed Mar 2022 Sep 2027 500 3,734
3mEuribor + 20bp Nov 2025 Nov 2027 650 4,855
2.375% Fixed May 2025 May 2028 1,450 10,830
0.125% Fixed Jun 2021 Jun 2028 650 4,855
3.125% Fixed May 2024 Jan 2029 1,000 7,469
2.500% Fixed Nov 2025 Feb 2029 650 4,855
1.375% Fixed Mar 2022 Mar 2030 500 3,734
2.875% Fixed May 2025 Aug 2030 1,000 7,469
3.250% Fixed May 2024 Jan 2031 1,000 7,469
3.000% Fixed Nov 2025 Feb 2032 600 4,481
3.125% Fixed May 2025 May 2033 900 6,722
3.375% Fixed May 2024 May 2034 1,350 10,083
3.375% Fixed Nov 2025 Feb 2035 600 4,481
3.625% Fixed May 2025 May 2037 1,250 9,336
3.625% Fixed Nov 2025 Feb 2038 750 5,602
4.000% Fixed Nov 2025 Nov 2045 750 5,602
Eurobonds
In 2025, eleven tranches of Eurobonds with an aggregate nominal amount of EUR 10
billion, corresponding to DKK 74.7 billion, were issued under the Novo Nordisk’s
European Medium Term Note (EMTN) programme. The fair value of Eurobonds
approximates the carrying value. Net proceeds were used in 2025 partly to repay the
temporary funding of three fill-finish sites acquired from Novo Holdings A/S in 2024 in
connection with a transaction where Novo Holdings A/S acquired Catalent, Inc. (note
5.3), and partly for the financing of the acquisition of Akero Therapeutics Inc.
Loans
Loans comprise bank loans which carry a combination of fixed and variable interest
rates. The fair value of the loans approximates their carrying value.
Commercial papers
Commercial papers comprise short-term, unsecured promissory notes, which carry
fixed interest rates. The fair value of the commercial papers approximates their
carrying value.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 4 Capital structure and financial items 104
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Issued bonds, loans, commercial papers and bank overdrafts are initially recognised
at the fair value of the proceeds received less transaction costs. In subsequent periods
these are measured at amortised cost using the effective interest method. The
difference between the proceeds received and the nominal value is recognised in
financial income or financial expenses over the term of the loan. For fair value
determination refer to note 4.8.
Lease liabilities are related to right-of-use assets primarily premises and company
cars and include the present value of future lease payments during the lease term.
Lease liabilities are initially measured at the present value of the lease payments
outstanding at the commencement date, discounted using the incremental borrowing
rate. Lease liabilities are measured using the effective interest method. Lease liabilities
are subsequently remeasured to reflect changes in future lease payments, e.g.,
changes in lease terms.
Contractual undiscounted cash flows 2025
DKK million Leases Eurobonds Loans
Commercial
papers
Bank
overdrafts Total
2025
Within 1 year 1,613 12,536 58 747 183 15,137
1-3 years 2,485 40,369 124 — — 42,978
3-5 years 1,785 27,999 39 — — 29,823
More than 5 years 4,740 64,137 256 — — 69,133
Total 10,623 145,041 477 747 183 157,071
Carrying amount end of the year 8,572 121,074 384 745 183 130,958
Non-current borrowings 7,236 111,373 332 — — 118,941
Current borrowings 1,336 9,701 52 745 183 12,017
2024
Within 1 year 1,510 4,842 3,279 5,356 449 15,436
1-3 years 2,327 11,829 37,945 — — 52,101
3-5 years 1,558 17,700 28 — — 19,286
More than 5 years 2,056 23,403 — — — 25,459
Total 7,451 57,774 41,252 5,356 449 112,282
Carrying amount end of the year 6,766 50,528 39,701 5,343 449 102,787
Non-current borrowings 5,428 46,799 37,447 — — 89,674
Current borrowings 1,338 3,729 2,254 5,343 449 13,113
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 4 Capital structure and financial items 105
4.7 Cash flow statement specifications
Other non-cash items
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Interest income and interest expenses, net
(note 4.9
) 2,938 (198) (527)
Capital gain/(loss) on investments, net
(note 4.9
) (80) 19 106
Results of associated companies (note 4.9
) 17 17 (81)
Share-based payment costs (note 5.1
) 1,435 2,289 2,149
Increase/(decrease) in provisions and
retirement benefit obligations
1
(1,209) 1,918 1,349
Exchange rate effects on provisions and
retirement benefit obligations
1 711 (230) 65
Adjustment for remeasurements of
retirement benefit obligations 26 (119) 13
Adjustment of provisions and retirement
benefit obligations related to acquisition
of businesses
— (1,088)
—
Unrealised gain/(loss) on fair value hedge
through profit or loss (note 4.9) 4,241 (5,098) (662)
Unrealised gain/(loss) from foreign exchange (9,432) 4,996 2,394
Other (1,769) (2,061) (4,382)
Total other non-cash items
1
(3,122) 445 424
1. Amounts relating to the reclassification from 'provisions' to 'sales deductions and product
returns' in 2024 and 2023 have been reclassified from 'Other non-cash items' to 'Changes in working
capital'.
Change in working capital
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Inventories (8,774) (9,038) (7,423)
Trade receivables 1,093 (7,179) (14,210)
Other current receivables and prepayments 21 (4,544) (2,063)
Sales deductions and product returns1 2 (1,509) 18,287 33,123
Trade payables
2 2,618 5,011 7,529
Other liabilities
2 4,349 9,264 5,436
Other non-current receivables
and prepayments (1,848) (2,586) (1,224)
Adjustment for payables related to
non-current assets 54 (3,520) (2,432)
Adjustment related to acquisition (note 5.3)
of businesses
— 1,134
—
Adjustment related to settlement for prior
year's acquisition of businesses (note 5.3) (1,004)
—
—
Change in working capital including
exchange rate adjustments (5,000) 6,829 18,736
Exchange rate adjustments
1 8,737 (4,240) 977
Cash flow change in working capital
1 3,737 2,589 19,713
1. Amounts relating to the reclassification from 'provisions' to 'sales deductions and product returns
relating to 2024 and 2023 have been reclassified from 'Other non-cash items' to 'Changes in
working capital'. 2. Amounts included in 'sales deductions and product returns relating to 2024 and
2023 have been reclassified from 'trade payables' and 'other liabilities'.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 4 Capital structure and financial items 106
4.8 Financial assets and liabilities
Financial instruments by measurement category
2025 2024
DKK million
Amortised
cost
Fair value
through the
income
statement
Fair value
through other
comprehensive
income
Derivatives
used as
hedging
instruments Total
Amortised
cost4
Fair value
through the
income
statement4
Fair value
through other
comprehensive
income
Derivatives
used as
hedging
instruments Total
Other receivables and
prepayments1 2,837 — — — 2,837 3,233 1,004 — — 4,237
Other financial assets 599 1,542 — — 2,141 747 1,530 — — 2,277
Trade receivables (note 3.5) 27,434 — 43,422 — 70,856 25,996 — 45,953 — 71,949
Marketable securities — 498 — — 498 — 10,653 — — 10,653
Derivative financial
instruments (note 4.5) — — — 6,682 6,682 — — — 6,326 6,326
Cash at bank (note 4.4) 26,464 — — — 26,464 15,655 — — — 15,655
Financial assets at the end
of the year 57,334 2,040 43,422 6,682 109,478 45,631 13,187 45,953 6,326 111,097
Borrowings (note 4.6) 130,958 — — — 130,958 102,787 — — — 102,787
Other liabilities2,3 38,804 — — — 38,804 34,412 — — — 34,412
Trade payables3 19,758 — — — 19,758 17,140 — — — 17,140
Sales deductions and
product returns (note 2.1)3 134,400 — — — 134,400 135,909 — — — 135,909
Derivative financial
instruments (note 4.5) — — — 2,026 2,026 — — — 7,531 7,531
Financial liabilities at the
end of the year 323,920 — — 2,026 325,946 290,248 — — 7,531 297,779
1. The balance sheet item 'other receivables and prepayments' includes prepayments and VAT receivables amounting to DKK 16,509 million (DKK 13,282 million in 2024) that are not financial instruments.
2. The balance sheet item 'other liabilities' includes VAT and duties payable amounting to DKK 917 million (DKK 960 million in 2024) that are not financial instruments.
3. Comparatives were restated to reflect the new balance sheet item 'sales deductions and product returns' and the reclassification of confirmed sales rebates from 'trade payables' and 'other liabilities' to 'sales
deductions and product returns'. Reference is made to note 2.1.
4. Comparatives for 'other receivables and prepayments' were restated to reflect changes in the provisional purchase price allocation from business combination in 2024. Reference is made to note 5.3.
Fair value measurement hierarchy
DKK million 2025 2024
Active market data (level 1) 800 10,833
Directly or indirectly observable market data (level 2) 6,682 6,326
Not based on observable market data (level 3)1 44,662 48,307
Total financial assets at fair value 52,144 65,466
Directly or indirectly observable market data (level 2) 2,026 7,531
Total financial liabilities at fair value 2,026 7,531
1. Comparatives were restated to reflect changes in the provisional purchase price allocation from
business combination in 2024. Reference is made to note 5.3.
Financial assets and liabilities measured at fair value can be categorised using the fair
value measurement hierarchy. There were no material transfers between the 'Active
market data' and 'Directly or indirectly observable market data' categories during 2025
or 2024.
Cash at bank at 31 December 2025 includes DKK 897 million that is restricted (DKK 867
million in 2024). The restricted cash balance relates to subsidiaries in which availability
of currency for remittance of funds is temporarily scarce.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Depending on purpose, Novo Nordisk classifies financial instruments into the
following categories:
• Financial assets at amortised cost
• Financial assets at fair value through the income statement
• Financial assets at fair value through other comprehensive income
• Financial liabilities at amortised cost
• Derivatives used as hedging instruments
Recognition and measurement
Financial assets measured at fair value through the income statement consist of other
financial assets, which are comprised of equity investments, and marketable
securities. These financial instruments are initially recognised at fair value. Net gains
and losses arising from changes in the fair value of equity instruments and marketable
securities are recognised in the income statement as financial income or expenses.
For a description of accounting policies on derivative financial instruments used as
hedging instruments, refer to note 4.5.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 4 Capital structure and financial items 107
Financial assets at amortised cost are cash at bank and non-derivative financial assets
solely with payments of principal and interest. Novo Nordisk normally 'holds-to-collect'
the financial assets to attain the contractual cash flows. These are initially measured at
fair value less transaction costs, except for trade receivables that are initially measured
at the transaction price. Subsequently, they are measured at amortised cost using the
effective interest method less impairment. For a description of accounting policies on
trade receivables, refer to note 3.5.
Financial assets at fair value through other comprehensive income are trade
receivables that are held to collect or to sell in factoring agreements.
Financial liabilities at amortised cost consist of borrowings (issued Eurobonds, bank
overdrafts and lease liabilities), trade payables, liabilities for sales deductions and
product returns as well as other liabilities (primarily accruals for promotional and
distribution activities, accrued employee-related costs and accrued payables related
to assets under construction). These are initially recognised at the fair value less
transaction costs. Subsequently, they are measured at amortised cost using the
effective interest method. For initial recognition of lease liabilities refer to note 4.6.
Fair value measurement
If an active market exists, the fair value of a financial instrument is based on the
most recently observed market price at the end of the reporting period. If a financial
instrument is quoted in a market that is not active, Novo Nordisk bases its valuation
on the most recent transaction price. Adjustment is made for subsequent changes
in market conditions, for instance by including transactions in similar financial
instruments assumed to be motivated by normal business considerations. The fair
values of quoted investments are based on current bid prices at the end of the
reporting period.
Financial assets for which no active market exists are carried at fair value based on a
valuation methodology. The fair value of such financial instruments is determined
on the basis of quoted market prices of financial instruments traded in active markets.
The fair value of standard and simple financial instruments, such as foreign exchange
forward contracts, interest rate swaps, currency swaps and unlisted bonds, is
measured according to generally accepted valuation techniques. Market-based input
is used to measure the fair value.
The fair value of trade receivables held to collect or sell in factoring agreements is
calculated based on the net invoice amount (invoice amount less charge-backs) less
the fee payable to the factoring entity. The factoring fee is insignificant due to the
short period between the time of sale to the factoring entity and the invoice due date
and the rate applicable. Inputs into the estimate of US wholesaler charge-backs are
described in note 2.1.
4.9 Financial income and expenses
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Financial income
Interest income1 1,269 1,838 1,069
Foreign exchange gain (net) 8,311 — 308
Financial gain from forward
contracts (net) — 4,358 1,344
Capital gain on investments 80 — —
Capital gain on marketable securities — 2 143
Result of associated companies — — 81
Total financial income 9,660 6,198 2,945
Financial expenses
Interest expenses on debts and
borrowings 4,207 1,640 542
Foreign exchange loss (net) — 5,381 —
Financial loss from forward
contracts (net) 2,304 — —
Capital loss on investments — 19 106
Capital loss on marketable securities 9 — —
Result of associated companies 17 17 —
Other financial expenses 241 289 197
Total financial expenses 6,778 7,346 845
1. Interest income include DKK 57 million from marketable securities at fair value through the
income statement (2024: DKK 399 million; 2023: DKK 370 million) while the remaining interest
income is derived from financial assets at amortised cost.
Financial impact from forward contracts, specified
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Income/(loss) transferred from other
comprehensive income (5,763) 1,612 1,026
Realised fair value adjustment of
transferred contracts 9,860 (2,903) 214
Unrealised fair value adjustments of
forward contracts2 317 4,558 (540)
Realised foreign exchange gain/(loss) on
forward contracts (6,718) 1,091 644
Financial income/(expense) from
forward contracts (2,304) 4,358 1,344
2. Refer to note 4.5 for information on open fair value hedge contracts at 31 December.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Management has chosen to classify the result of hedging activities as part of financial
items in the income statement, except for foreign currency-risk cash flow hedges on
highly probable non-financial asset purchases, where the cumulative value
adjustments are transferred directly from the cash flow hedge reserve to the initial
cost of the asset when recognised.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 4 Capital structure and financial items 108
Section 5
Other disclosures
5.1 Share-based payment schemes
Share-based payment expensed in the income statement
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Restricted stock units to employees 576 380 365
Long-term share-based incentive programme
(Management Board) 119 314 304
Long-term share-based incentive programme
(Management group below Management Board) 437 1,403 1,271
Restricted stock units to individual employees 303 192 209
Share-based payment expensed in the
income statement 1,435 2,289 2,149
General terms and conditions of 2025-2023 programmes
100 year
anniversary
programme Management Board
Management group below
Management Board Individual employees
Year of launch 2023 2025 2024 2023 2025 2024 2023 2025 2024 2023
Preliminary number of shares outstanding1
 (million) 3.3 0.3 0.2 0.3 1.5 0.9 1.3 0.6 0.1 0.1
Fair value per restricted stock unit at grant date (DKK) 446 545 767 456 545 767 456 331 794 544
Performance and vesting period 2023 to 2026 2025 to 2027 2024 to 2026 2023 to 2025 2025 to 2027 2024 to 2026 2023 to 2025 2025 to 2028 2024 to 2027 2023 to 2026
Allocation date Aug 2026 Feb 2028 Feb 2027 Feb 2026 Feb 2028 Feb 2027 Feb 2026 2028 2027 2026
Amortisation period 3.5 years 3 years 3 years 3 years 3 years 3 years 3 years 1 - 3 years 1 - 3 years 1 - 3 years
1. The number of shares to be allocated at target under the LTIPs to Management Board and management group below Management Board, respectively, may potentially be reduced or increased depending on whether Novo Nordisk's performance during the 3-year performance period is higher or lower compared
to targets determined by the Board of Directors. The maximum number is capped.
Restricted stock units to employees
In connection with Novo Nordisk's 100 year anniversary and in appreciation of the
efforts of employees during recent years, as of 1 February 2023, all eligible employees
in the company were offered 74 restricted stock units. Each restricted stock unit gives
the holder the right to receive one Novo Nordisk B share free of charge in August
2026, subject to continued employment. The cost of the programme is DKK 1,533
million and is amortised over the vesting period.
Long-term share-based incentive programme (LTIP)
Management Board
The LTIPs commenced in 2023, 2024 and 2025 have a three-year performance
period, subject to continued employment, and a subsequent two-year holding
period. Targets are set at the beginning of the performance period and include
determination of threshold, on-target level of performance and level of performance
to achieve maximum allocation of shares. The maximum share allocation at grant
cannot exceed 30 months' base salary for the CEO, 24 months' base salary for executive
vice presidents and up to 15.6 months' base salary for senior vice presidents. Hence the
LTIP is capped at a number of shares at the time of grant. For 2024 onward, the Board
sets both financial and non-financial targets for a three-year period which are linked to
three-year average growth in sales, operating profit and non-financial performance.
All targets are aligned to Novo Nordisk's Strategic Aspirations 2025: Purpose and
sustainability, Innovation and therapeutic focus, Commercial execution and Financials.
Target achievement is assessed by the Board of Directors.
The grant date of the 2025-programme was 5 February 2025, and the share price
used for the determining the grant date fair value of the award (DKK 545) was the
average share price for Novo Nordisk B shares on Nasdaq Copenhagen in the
period 5 February 2025 to 19 February 2025, adjusted for the expected dividend.
Based on the split of participants at the grant date, 50% of the shares are allocated
to Executives and 50% to other members of the Management Board.
All restricted stock units and shares allocated to Management are settled by transfers
of treasury shares at the time of vesting.
Management group below the Management Board
The Management group below the Management Board has a share-based
incentive programme with similar performance criteria to the Management Board.
For 2024 onward, the Board sets both financial and non-financial targets for a
three-year period.
On 31 December 2025, a total of 8.8 million shares (13.3 million in 2024 and 18.9
million in 2023) were expected to vest, including all ongoing programmes.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Novo Nordisk operates equity-settled, share-based compensation plans.
The fair value of the employee services received in exchange for the grant of
shares is recognised as an expense and allocated over the vesting period.
The total amount to be expensed over the performance and vesting period is
determined by reference to the fair value of the shares granted, excluding the
impact of any non-market vesting conditions. The fair value is fixed at the grant
date, and adjusted for expected dividends during the vesting period. Non-market
vesting conditions are included in assumptions about the number of shares that
are expected to vest. At the end of each reporting period, Novo Nordisk revises its
estimates of the number of shares expected to vest. Novo Nordisk recognises the
impact of the revision of the original estimates, if any, in the income statement and in
a corresponding adjustment to equity (change in proceeds) over the remaining vesting
period. Adjustments relating to previous years are included in the income statement
in the year of adjustment.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 5 Other disclosures 109
5.2 Commitments
Contractual obligations not recognised in the balance sheet
DKK million (undiscounted) Current
Noncurrent Total
2025
Leases1
 265 717 982
Research and development obligations 10,201 15,705 25,906
Research and development – potential
milestone payments2
 1,610 23,341 24,951
Commercial product launch – potential
milestone payments2
 278 27,721 27,999
Purchase obligations relating to investments
in property, plant and equipment 16,775 3,668 20,443
Purchase obligations relating to contract
manufacturers 15,746 75,285 91,031
Other purchase obligations 8,832 5,702 14,534
Total obligations not recognised
in the balance sheet 53,707 152,139 205,846
2024
Leases1
 288 3,893 4,181
Research and development obligations 12,101 23,215 35,316
Research and development – potential
milestone payments2
 2,076 32,507 34,583
Commercial product launch – potential
milestone payments2
 384 16,543 16,927
Purchase obligations relating to investments
in property, plant and equipment 8,305 3,354 11,659
Purchase obligations relating to contract
manufacturers 8,925 62,136 71,061
Other purchase obligations 10,531 8,463 18,994
Total obligations not recognised
in the balance sheet 42,610 150,111 192,721
1. Predominantly relates to estimated variable property taxes, leases committed but not yet
commenced and low value leases. 2. Potential milestone payments are associated with uncertainty
because they are linked to successful achievements in research activities.
Contractual obligations
Research and development obligations include commitments relating to external
research and development agreements, mainly related to costs for clinical trials.
Potential milestone payments tied to external research and development are
contingent upon successful progress in research and development activities.
Commercial product launch milestones include contingent payments solely related
to achievement of a commercial product launch following regulatory approval.
Commercial milestones, royalties and other payments based on a percentage of
sales generated from sale of goods following marketing approval are excluded from
the contractual commitments analysis because of their contingent nature, related
to future sales.
Potential milestone payments entail uncertainties in relation to the period in
which payments are due because a proportion of the obligations are dependent on
milestone achievements. Exercise fees and subsequent milestone payments under inlicensing option agreements are excluded, because Novo Nordisk is not contractually
obligated to make such payments. The increase in research and development
obligation is driven by the general increase in business activities.
Purchase obligations relating to investments in property, plant and equipment
primarily relates to production capacity expansion projects. Novo Nordisk expects
to fund these commitments with existing cash and cash flow from operations.
Purchase obligations related to contract manufacturers relate to commitments
entered to secure future manufacturing capacity.
Other purchase obligations mainly consist of commitments related to promotional and
media activities, professional and consulting activities and strategic sourcing contracts.
The contractual obligations not recognised in the balance sheet are not discounted
and are not risk-adjusted.
Other guarantees
Other guarantees amount to DKK 3,053 million (DKK 2,380 million in 2024) and
primarily relate to performance guarantees issued by Novo Nordisk.
5.3 Acquisition of businesses
Business combinations in 2025
In 2025, no business combinations were completed. The purchase price allocation for
the former Catalent fill-finish sites remained provisional at the end of 2024 and was
finalised in 2025. Refer to below section.
Business combinations in 2024
Three fill-finish sites (Catalent)
On 18 December 2024, Novo Nordisk acquired three fill-finish sites from Novo
Holdings A/S in connection with a transaction where Novo Holdings A/S acquired
Catalent, Inc. (“Catalent”), a global contract development and manufacturing
organisation. Total cash consideration transferred in 2024 amounted to USD
11,723 million (DKK 82,146 million including hedging effects). The final purchase
price allocation is shown in the table below.
Fair value recognised at date of acquisition (final)
2024
Fill-finish sites Other
acquisiDKK million Provisional Final tions Total
Know-how 41,102 41,102 — 41,102
Intellectual property rights and
other intangible assets 311 90 52 142
Property, plant and equipment 24,839 24,034 608 24,642
Deferred tax assets (liabilities), net 992 924 (7) 917
Provisions (1,084) (884) — (884)
Other net assets 1,290 1,228 (2) 1,226
Net identifiable assets acquired 67,450 66,494 651 67,145
Goodwill 15,293 15,245 30 15,275
Purchase price 82,743 81,739 681 82,420
Settlement from closing
mechanism (receivable) — 1,004 — 1,004
Settlement of pre-existing
relationships (597) (597) — (597)
Cash consideration transferred 82,146 82,146 681 82,827
Cash acquired (664) (664) — (664)
Cash used for acquisition of
businesses; net of cash acquired 81,482 81,482 681 82,163
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 5 Other disclosures 110
The finalisation of the purchase price allocation in 2025 resulted in a retrospective
restatement of the net assets recognised. Primary changes to the provisional
purchase price allocation included a decrease in fair value of 'Property, plant and
equipment' (DKK 805 million) and 'Intellectual property rights and other intangible
assets' (DKK 221 million), as well as related tax effects.
Further, the acquisition of the three fill-finish sites from Novo Holdings A/S included
closing mechanisms. During the measurement period, confirmed amounts from these
closing mechanisms amounted to DKK 1,004 million and were recognised as a
receivable at the combination date. Potential future adjustments from these closing
mechanisms are yet to be confirmed with Novo Holdings A/S and will be recognised
outside the measurement period (in profit or loss). Material transactions with Novo
Holdings A/S in 2025 are disclosed in note 5.4.
As a result of the adjustments made in the measurement period, goodwill decreased
by DKK 48 million. Goodwill primarily reflects the value of a highly-skilled assembled
workforce in place at the three fill-finish sites and expected synergies from Novo
Nordisk’s existing know-how and production capabilities. Goodwill is fully allocated to
the Obesity and Diabetes care segment.
The fair value of know-how remained unchanged from the provisional purchase price
allocation. Know-how is primarily comprised of the documented processes and
systems for efficient and large-scale production of GLP-1 products as well as knowhow to expand capacity in an efficient way. The fair value of both property, plant and
equipment and know-how incorporate a significant value of accelerated access to
capacity as a reflection of the current shortage of fill-finish capacity and high demand
for GLP-1 products in the market.
All changes made to provisional amounts recognised at 31 December 2024 were restated.
Other acquisitions
Other acquisitions of businesses in 2024 comprise the acquisition of a production
site in Ireland for a total purchase price of DKK 681 million. The provisional purchase
price allocation was finalised in 2025 without any adjustments.
KEY ACCOUNTING ESTIMATES IN DETERMINING THE FAIR VALUE OF
ASSETS ACQUIRED IN PRIOR YEAR'S BUSINESS COMBINATIONS
The application of the acquisition method of accounting involves the use of significant
estimates because the identifiable net assets of the acquiree are recognised at their
fair value for which observable market prices are typically not available. This is
particularly relevant for assets which require use of valuation techniques typically
based on estimates of present value of future cash flows.
The fair value is based on assumptions made by market participants, which in case of
the Catalent transaction is assessed to be a company with similar needs and capacity
to acquire assets of the same nature and size as those of the acquired business.
The valuation of know-how identified in the acquisition of the three fill-finish sites is
based on the multi-period excess earnings method, which is used to value unique
assets that generate earnings. The economic benefit of the know-how is comprised by
net cash flows attributable to the asset which also includes the benefit of accelerated
access to production capacity compared to a greenfield construction scenario without
the know-how required for commercial production at scale. The net present value of
future estimated cash flows is based on projections of sales volumes and prices,
valuation period and royalty rates.
The valuation of property, plant and equipment identified in the acquisition of the
three fill-finish sites is mainly based on the depreciated replacement cost method in
combination with the present value of accelerated access to production facilities. The
depreciated replacement cost method reflects adjustments for physical deterioration
as well as functional and economic obsolescence. Land has been valued using the
market approach based on comparable transactions.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
The acquisition method of accounting is used to account for all business combinations.
The purchase price for a business comprises the fair value of the assets transferred,
liabilities incurred to the former owners including warrant holders of the acquired
business and the fair value of any asset or liability resulting from a contingent
consideration arrangement. Any amount of the purchase price which effectively
comprises a settlement of a pre-existing relationship is not part of the exchange for
the acquiree and is therefore not included in the consideration for the purpose of
applying the acquisition method. Settlements of pre-existing relationships are
accounted for as separate transactions in accordance with the relevant IFRS
Accounting Standards.
Identifiable assets and liabilities and contingent liabilities assumed are measured
at fair value at the date of acquisition by applying relevant valuation methods.
Acquisition-related costs are expensed as incurred. Goodwill is recognised as the
excess of purchase price over the fair value of net identifiable assets acquired and
liabilities assumed.
5.4 Related party transactions
Material transactions with related parties
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Novo Holdings A/S
Purchase of Novo Nordisk B shares — 10,164 8,775
Acquisition of fill-finish sites (note 5.3) — 82,146 —
Settlement for prior year's acquisition of
fill-finish sites (note 5.3) (1,004) — —
Dividend payment to Novo Holdings A/S 14,591 12,502 9,028
Services provided by Novo Nordisk (55) (33) (17)
Subsidiaries of Novo Holding A/S
• Catalent Group
 Services provided by Catalent 743 — —
• Novonesis Group
 Services provided by Novo Nordisk (42) (48) (48)
 Services provided by Novonesis 280 117 112
 Assets purchased from Novonesis 125 — —
• Altasciences Group
 Services provided by Altasciences 103 146 229
• Other subsidiaries
 Services provided to Novo Nordisk 139 93 —
NNIT Group
Services provided by NNIT 237 257 436
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 5 Other disclosures 111
Novo Nordisk A/S is controlled by Novo Holdings A/S (incorporated in Denmark), which
owns 28.1% of the share capital in Novo Nordisk A/S, representing 77.3% of the total
number of votes. The remaining shares are widely held. The ultimate parent of the
Group is the Novo Nordisk Foundation (incorporated in Denmark). Both entities are
considered related parties.
Novonesis Group, Catalent Group, Altasciences Company Inc., and other subsidiaries
of Novo Holdings A/S are considered related parties to Novo Nordisk A/S. As an
associated company of Novo Nordisk A/S, NNIT Group is also considered a related
party.
In 2025, Novo Nordisk A/S and Novonesis entered into a joint liability agreement with
a local utilities provider for a shared project. Novo Nordisk A/S has guaranteed
Novonesis’ obligations under the agreement.
In 2025, Novo Nordisk A/S did not acquire B shares from Novo Holdings A/S as part of
the DKK 20,000 million share repurchase programme.
Remuneration to Executives and Board of Directors
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Salary and short-term incentive 127 180 173
Pension 11 18 17
Benefits 16 10 12
Long-term incentive1 100 112 121
Termination payments2 220 45 7
Executives in total3, 4 474 365 330
Fees to Board of Directors5 24 23 22
Total 498 388 352
1. Refer to note 5.1 for further information on share-based payment schemes.
2. Includes recruitment-related payments for all years which for 2025 amounted to DKK 6 million.
3. Total remuneration for persons registered as members of Executive Management with the
Danish Business Authority amounts to DKK 46 million (DKK 88 million in 2024 and DKK 195 million in
2023).
4. Executive Management comprises the Chief Executive Officer, Executive Vice Presidents and two
Senior Vice Presidents. The remuneration disclosed includes only the Executives, meaning the Chief
Executive Officer and Executive Vice Presidents.
5. All members of the Board of Directors are registered with the Danish Business Authority. Fees
paid to observers in Novo Nordisk's board meetings amounted to DKK 0.9 million and are not
included in the table above (no payments to observers in 2024 and 2023).
There were no transactions with Executives or the Board of Directors besides
remuneration.
There were no material unsettled balances with related parties at the end of the year.
5.5 Fees to statutory auditors
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Statutory audit1 43 35 30
Audit-related services 6 5 3
Tax advisory services 10 9 8
Other services 6 13 18
Total fees to statutory auditors 65 62 59
1. Statutory audit fees in 2024 include DKK 5 million of additional fees mainly related to business
acquisitions.
Fees for services other than statutory audit of the financial statements amount to
DKK 22 million (DKK 27 million in 2024 and DKK 29 million in 2023).
In 2025, Deloitte Statsautoriseret Revisionspartnerselskab provided other services
than statutory audit in the amount of DKK 10 million (DKK 6 million in 2024 and
DKK 18 million in 2023) which primarily relate to ESG assurance, tax and financial due
diligence relating to acquisitions, and other tax and accounting compliance services.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 5 Other disclosures 112
5.6 Companies in the Novo Nordisk Group
Activity: • Sales and marketing • Production
• Research and development • Services/investments
Subsidiaries by geographical area
Company and country Percentage of shares owned Activity
US Operations
Novo Nordisk Inc., US 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharmaceutical Industries LP, US 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharmatech US, Inc., US 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharma, Inc., US 100 •
Novo Nordisk Corporate Development US, Inc., US 100 •
Novo Nordisk Research & Development US, Inc., US 100 •
Novo Nordisk US Bio Production, Inc., US 100 •
Novo Nordisk US Holdings Inc., US 100 •
Akero Therapeutics Inc., US 100 •
Catalent Indiana LLC, US 100 •
Dicerna Pharmaceuticals, Inc., US 100 •
Emisphere Technologies, Inc., US 100 •
Forma Therapeutics, Inc., US 100 •
International Operations
Aldaph SpA, Algeria 100 • •
Novo Nordisk Pharma Argentina S.A., Argentina 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharmaceuticals Pty. Ltd., Australia 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharma GmbH, Austria 100 •
Novo Nordisk Azerbaijan LLC, Azerbaijan 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharma (Private) Limited, Bangladesh 100 •
Novo Nordisk Production Belgium S.A, Belgium 100 •
S.A. Novo Nordisk Pharma N.V., Belgium 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharma d.o.o., Bosnia and Herzegovina 100 •
Novo Nordisk Farmacêutica do Brasil Ltda., Brazil 100 •
Novo Nordisk Produção Farmacêutica do Brasil Ltda., Brazil 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharma EAD, Bulgaria 100 •
Inversago Pharma Inc., Canada 100 •
Novo Nordisk Canada Inc., Canada 100 •
Novo Nordisk Farmacéutica Limitada, Chile 100 •
Beijing Novo Nordisk Pharmaceuticals Science & Technology
Co., Ltd., China 100 •
Novo Nordisk (China) Pharmaceuticals Co. Ltd., China 100 • •
Novo Nordisk Region China A/S, Denmark 100 •
Novo Nordisk (Shanghai) Pharma Trading Co., Ltd., China 100 •
Novo Nordisk Colombia SAS, Colombia 100 •
Company and country Activity
Parent company
Novo Nordisk A/S, Denmark • • • •
Company and country Percentage of shares owned Activity
Novo Nordisk Hrvatska d.o.o., Croatia 100 •
Novo Nordisk Production Czech s.r.o, Czech Republic 100 •
Novo Nordisk s.r.o., Czech Republic 100 •
Novo Nordisk Denmark A/S, Denmark 100 •
Novo Nordisk North America Operations A/S, Denmark 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharmaceuticals A/S, Denmark 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharma Operations A/S, Denmark 100 • •
Novo Nordisk Region AAMEO and LATAM A/S, Denmark 100 •
Novo Nordisk Region Europe A/S, Denmark 100 •
Novo Nordisk Region Japan & Korea A/S, Denmark 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharmatech A/S, Denmark 100 • •
Novo Nordisk Egypt LLC, Egypt 100 •
Novo Nordisk Egypt Pharmaceuticals Ltd., Egypt 100 •
Novo Nordisk Estonia OÜ, Estonia 100 •
Novo Nordisk Farma OY, Finland 100 •
Biocorp Production S.A., France 100 • •
Novo Nordisk Production SAS, France 100 •
Novo Nordisk, France 100 •
Cardior Pharmaceuticals GmbH, Germany 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharma GmbH, Germany 100 •
Novo Nordisk Hellas Epe., Greece 100 •
Novo Nordisk Hong Kong Limited, Hong Kong 100 •
Novo Nordisk Hungária Kft., Hungary 100 •
Novo Nordisk India Private Limited, India 100 •
Novo Nordisk Service Centre (India) Pvt. Ltd., India 100 •
PT. Novo Nordisk Indonesia, Indonesia 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pars Co. (PJS), Iran 100 • •
Novo Nordisk Limited, Ireland 100 •
Novo Nordisk Production Ireland Ltd., Ireland 100 •
Novo Nordisk Ltd, Israel 100 •
Catalent Anagni S.R.L, Italy 100 •
Novo Nordisk S.P.A., Italy 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharma Ltd., Japan 100 • •
Novo Nordisk Kazakhstan LLP, Kazakhstan 100 •
Novo Nordisk Kenya Ltd., Kenya 100 •
Novo Nordisk Latvia SIA, Latvia 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharma SARL, Lebanon 100 •
UAB Novo Nordisk Pharma, Lithuania 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharma (Malaysia) Sdn Bhd, Malaysia 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharma Operations (Business Area) Sdn,
Malaysia 100 •
Novo Nordisk Mexico S.A. de C.V., Mexico 100 •
Novo Nordisk Service Centre Mexico, S.A., Mexico 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharma SAS, Morocco 100 •
Novo Nordisk B.V., Netherlands 100 •
Company and country Percentage of shares owned Activity
Novo Nordisk Finance (Netherlands) B.V., Netherlands 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharmaceuticals Ltd., New Zealand 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharma Limited, Nigeria 100 •
Novo Nordisk Farma dooel, North Macedonia 100 •
Novo Nordisk Norway AS, Norway 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharma (Private) Limited, Pakistan 100 •
Novo Nordisk Panama S.A., Panama 100 •
Novo Nordisk Peru S.A.C., Peru 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharmaceuticals (Philippines) Inc., Philippines 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharma Sp.z.o.o., Poland 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharmaceutical Services Sp. z.o.o., Poland 100 •
Novo Nordisk Portugal, Lda., Portugal 100 •
Novo Nordisk Farma S.R.L., Romania 100 •
Novo Nordisk Limited Liability Company, Russia 100 • •
Novo Nordisk Production Support LLC, Russia 100 •
Novo Nordisk Saudi for Trading, Saudi Arabia 100 •
Novo Nordisk Regional Headquarters Company, Saudi Arabia 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharma d.o.o. Belgrade (Serbia), Serbia 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharma (Singapore) Pte Ltd., Singapore 100 •
Novo Nordisk Slovakia s.r.o., Slovakia 100 •
Novo Nordisk, d.o.o., Slovenia 100 •
Novo Nordisk (Pty) Limited, South Africa 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharma Korea Ltd., South Korea 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharma S.A., Spain 100 •
Novo Nordisk Lanka (PVT) Ltd, Sri Lanka 100 •
Novo Nordisk Scandinavia AB, Sweden 100 •
Novo Nordisk Health Care AG, Switzerland 100 • • •
Novo Nordisk Pharma AG, Switzerland 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharma (Taiwan) Ltd., Taiwan 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharma (Thailand) Ltd., Thailand 100 •
Novo Nordisk Tunisie SARL, Tunisia 100 •
Novo Nordisk Saglik Ürünleri Tic. Ltd. Sti., Turkey 100 •
Novo Nordisk Ukraine, LLC, Ukraine 100 •
Novo Nordisk Pharma Gulf FZE, United Arab Emirates 100 •
Novo Nordisk Limited, UK 100 •
Novo Nordisk Research Centre Oxford Limited, UK 100 •
Novo Nordisk Vietnam Ltd., Vietnam 100 •
Other subsidiaries and associated companies
NNE A/S, Denmark 100 •
NNIT A/S, Denmark 18 •
CS Solar Fund XIV, LLC, US 99 •
Companies without significant activities are not included in the list.
NNE A/S subsidiaries are not included in the list.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Consolidated financial statements / Notes to the Consolidated financial statements / Section 5 Other disclosures 113
Definitions of key figures and ratios
(part of the Annual review – not audited)
Key figures and financial ratios have been calculated in accordance with the guidelines
from the Danish Society of Financial Analysts, and supplemented by certain key ratios
for Novo Nordisk. Financial ratios are described below and in the section 'Non-IFRS
financial measures'.
KEY FIGURES AND FINANCIAL DEFINITIONS
ADR
An American Depository Receipt (ADR) represents ownership of shares in a non-US
company and trades in US financial markets.
EBITDA
EBITDA is defined as ’net profit’, adjusted for 'income taxes', 'financial items',
'depreciation and amortisation' and 'impairment losses and reversals'.
Number of shares outstanding
The total number of shares, excluding the holding of treasury shares.
Shares
The share capital of Novo Nordisk comprises of A shares and B shares, with B shares
listed on Nasdaq Copenhagen in trading units of nominal value DKK 0.10 and ADRs,
that equal B shares of nominal value DKK 0.10, being listed on New York Stock
Exchange (NYSE). Key ratios per share, including number of outstanding shares, are
aligned with trading units of nominal value DKK 0.10.
Working capital
Working capital is the net of operating assets and operating liabilities.
FINANCIAL RATIOS
Basic earnings per share (EPS)
Net profit divided by the average number of shares outstanding.
Diluted earnings per share
Net profit divided by average number of shares outstanding, including the dilutive
effect of the outstanding restricted stock units.
Dividend payout ratio
Total dividends for the year as a percentage of net profit. Total dividends for the year
comprise interim dividends paid during the year and proposed ordinary dividend for
the year.
Effective tax rate
Income taxes as a percentage of profit before income taxes.
Gross margin
Gross profit as a percentage of net sales.
Operating margin
Operating profit as a percentage of net sales.
Net profit margin
Net profit as a percentage of net sales.
––– Part of the Annual review – not audited 114
Non-IFRS financial measures
(part of the Annual review – not audited)
In the Annual review, Novo Nordisk discloses certain financial measures of the
Group’s financial performance, financial position and cash flows that reflect
adjustments to the most directly comparable measures calculated and presented
in accordance with IFRS Accounting Standards. These non-IFRS financial measures
may not be defined and calculated by other companies in the same manner, and
may therefore not be comparable.
The non-IFRS financial measures presented in the Annual review are:
• Net sales and operating profit growth in constant exchange rates (CER)
• EBITDA and EBITDA at CER
• Adjusted net profit and Adjusted diluted earnings per share (”Adjusted diluted EPS”)
• Free cash flow
• Return on invested capital (ROIC)
• Cash to earnings
• Net debt and Net debt/EBITDA
In addition, the 2026 outlook is provided for growth in Adjusted sales and growth in
Adjusted operating profit. These additional measures will be presented as non-IFRS
financial measures from the first quarter of 2026.
IFRS refers to an IFRS financial measure.
Net sales and operating profit in constant exchange rates
'Growth at CER’ means that the effect of changes in exchange rates is excluded. It is
defined as the relevant measure for the period calculated using the average exchange
rates for the same period prior year compared with the same measure for the same
period prior year. Price adjustments within hyperinflation countries, as defined in IAS
29 ‘Financial reporting in hyperinflation economies’, are excluded from the calculation
to avoid growth at CER being artificially inflated.
Growth at CER is considered to be relevant information for investors in order to
understand the underlying development in net sales and operating profit by adjusting
for the impact of currency fluctuations.
Net sales in constant exchange rates
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Net sales IFRS 309,064 290,403 232,261
Effect of exchange rate 11,219 1,575 7,658
Net sales in constant exchange rates 320,283 291,978 239,919
Net sales previous year 290,403 232,261 176,954
% increase/(decrease) in reported
currencies 6.4% 25.0% 31.3%
% increase/(decrease) in constant
exchange rates 10.3% 25.7% 35.6%
Operating profit in constant exchange rates
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Operating profit IFRS 127,658 128,339 102,574
Effect of exchange rate 8,419 1,096 4,898
Operating profit in constant
exchange rates 136,077 129,435 107,472
Operating profit previous year 128,339 102,574 74,809
% increase/(decrease) in reported
currencies (0.5%) 25.1% 37.1%
% increase/(decrease) in constant
exchange rates 6.0% 26.2% 43.7%
EBITDA and EBITDA growth at constant exchange rates
Novo Nordisk defines EBITDA as ’Net profit’ adjusted for 'income taxes', 'financial
items', 'depreciation and amortisation' and 'impairment losses and reversals'. EBITDA
is a measure that is widely used by investors and analysts as it helps analyse operating
results from core business operations without including the effects of capital
structure, tax rates and depreciation and amortisation and impairment losses.
These factors can vary substantially between companies.
EBITDA and EBITDA growth at constant exchange rates
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Net profit IFRS 102,434 100,988 83,683
Income taxes IFRS 28,106 26,203 20,991
Financial income IFRS (9,660) (6,198) (2,945)
Financial expenses IFRS 6,778 7,346 845
Operating profit (EBIT) IFRS 127,658 128,339 102,574
Depreciation and amortisations IFRS 14,666 8,545 7,289
Impairment losses and reversals IFRS 7,316 10,562 2,124
EBITDA 149,640 147,446 111,987
Effect of exchange rate 8,632 1,146 5,043
EBITDA in constant exchange rates 158,272 148,592 117,030
EBITDA previous year 147,446 111,987 82,171
% increase/(decrease) in reported
currencies 1.5% 31.7% 36.3%
% increase/(decrease) in constant
exchange rates 7.3% 32.7% 42.4%
––– Part of the Annual review – not audited 115
Adjusted net profit and Adjusted diluted earnings per share (”EPS”)
Novo Nordisk defines Adjusted net profit as ‘Net profit’ excluding the following items
and related tax effects:
• Impairment losses and reversals on intangible assets
• Amortisations on intangible assets
• Major restructuring costs
Adjusted net profit is considered to be relevant information for investors as it helps
analyse financial performance from core business operations from period to period
and enhances comparability against peer companies. Adjusted EPS is calculated as
Adjusted net profit divided by average number of shares outstanding, including the
dilutive effect of the outstanding restricted stock units.
Major restructuring costs
Major restructuring costs refer to costs incurred in connection with substantial
restructuring plans where the accumulated costs exceed DKK 1,000 million. Costs
included under ‘Major restructuring costs’ are considered exceptional and nonrecurring, as they arise from strategic restructurings that are not reflective of the
Group’s ongoing operating activities. Such costs include costs of severance and
termination benefits, impairments of tangible assets and committed expenses for
contract or projects terminated as part of substantial restructuring plans. Impairments
of intangible assets are included in the line ‘Impairment losses and reversals on
intangible assets’ even if related to substantial restructuring plans.
The company-wide transformation plan announced on 10 September 2025 is an
example of such substantial restructuring plan. As part of the restructuring, the global
workforce was being reduced by approximately 9,000 positions. No other major
restructuring plans have been undertaken within the past two years.
Adjusted net profit and Adjusted diluted EPS
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Net profit IFRS 102,434 100,988 83,683
Impairment losses and reversals on
intangible assets1
IFRS 2,760 9,513 1,414
Amortisations on intangible assets IFRS 6,529 2,512 1,834
Major restructuring costs 8,014 — —
Tax effects of adjustments (3,330) (2,456) (702)
Adjusted net profit 116,407 110,557 86,229
Average number of shares outstanding,
including dilutive effect (million) 4,447.7 4,463.0 4,494.8
Adjusted diluted EPS 26.17 24.77 19.18
1. In 2025, impairment losses on intangible assets (DKK 2,760 million) include impairments related
to substantial restructuring plans (DKK 1,352 million). These are detailed in the table 'Specification of
major restructuring costs'
Specification of major restructuring costs
DKK million
Costs of
goods
sold
Sales and
distributi
on costs
Research
and
develop
ment
costs
Administ
rative
costs 2025
Severance and termination
benefits 1,685 1,600 1,126 809 5,220
Committed expenses for
contracts or projects
terminated — — 424 — 424
Impairment losses on
property, plant and
equipment 1,369 — 1,001 — 2,370
Major restructuring costs
excluded from
Adjusted net profit 3,054 1,600 2,551 809 8,014
Impairment losses on
intangible assets — — 1,352 — 1,352
Total major restructuring
costs 3,054 1,600 3,903 809 9,366
Free Cash Flow
Free cash flow is a measure of the amount of cash generated in the period which is
available for the Board of Directors to allocate between Novo Nordisk's capital
providers, through measures such as dividends, share repurchases and repayment of
debt (excluding lease liabilities) or for retaining within the business to fund future
growth.
The following table shows a reconciliation of Free cash flow with net cash generated
from operating activities, the most directly comparable IFRS financial measure:
Free Cash Flow
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Net cash generated from operating
activities IFRS 119,102 120,968 108,908
Purchase of property,plant and
equipment IFRS (60,140) (47,164) (25,806)
Purchase of intangible assets IFRS (29,973) (4,145) (13,090)
Cash used for acquisition of
businesses IFRS — (82,163) —
Settlement for prior year's acquisition of
businesses IFRS 1,004 — —
Proceeds from other financial assets IFRS 30 — 33
Purchase of other financial assets IFRS (225) (786) (271)
Repayment of lease liabilities IFRS (1,503) (1,417) (1,448)
Free cash flow 28,295 (14,707) 68,326
––– Part of the Annual review – not audited 116
Cash to earnings
Cash to earnings is defined as 'free cash flow as a percentage of net profit'.
Management believes that cash to earnings is an important performance metric
because it measures the Group’s ability to turn earnings into cash. Since Management
wants this measure to capture the ability of the Group’s operations to generate cash,
free cash flow is used as the numerator instead of net cash flow.
The following table shows the reconciliation of cash to earnings to the most directly
comparable IFRS financial measure:
Cash to earnings
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Free cash flow 28,295 (14,707) 68,326
/ Net profit IFRS 102,434 100,988 83,683
Cash to earnings 27.6% (14.6%) 81.6%
Net debt and Net debt/EBITDA
Net debt comprises of current and non-current ‘Borrowings’, excluding lease liabilities,
less ‘Cash at bank’ and ‘Marketable securities’. Net Debt and Net debt/EBITDA is
considered relevant information for investors as it provides a clear indicator of Novo
Nordisk’s leverage position.
The following table shows a reconciliation of Net debt with the balance sheet items,
the most directly comparable IFRS financial measures:
Net debt and Net debt/EBITDA
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Borrowings, non-current IFRS (118,941) (89,674) (20,528)
Borrowings, current IFRS (12,017) (13,113) (6,478)
Add-back of lease liabilities IFRS 8,572 6,766 5,726
Cash at bank IFRS 26,464 15,655 14,392
Marketable securities IFRS 498 10,653 15,838
Net debt (95,424) (69,713) 8,950
EBITDA 149,640 147,446 111,987
Net debt/EBITDA 64% 47% (8%)
Return on invested capital (ROIC)
ROIC is defined as 'operating profit after tax' (using the effective tax rate) as a
percentage of average inventories, receivables, property, plant and equipment,
intangible assets and deferred tax assets, less non-interest-bearing liabilities including
provisions and deferred tax liabilities (where the average is the sum of the above
assets and liabilities at the beginning of the year and at year-end divided by two).
Management believes ROIC is a useful measure for providing investors and
Management with information regarding the Group's performance. The calculation
of this financial target is a widely accepted measure of earnings efficiency in relation
to total capital employed.
The following tables show the reconciliation of ROIC with reconciliation to the most
directly comparable IFRS financial measure:
ROIC
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Operating profit after tax 100,212 101,901 81,957
/ Average net operating assets 254,687 159,548 92,566
ROIC in % 39.3% 63.9% 88.5%
Reconciliation of net operating assets to equity IFRS
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Equity IFRS 194,047 143,486 106,561
Investment in associated companies (366) (400) (410)
Other financial assets (2,141) (2,277) (1,253)
Marketable securities (498) (10,653) (15,838)
Derivative financial instruments (6,682) (6,326) (2,344)
Cash at bank (26,464) (15,655) (14,392)
Borrowings – non-current 118,941 89,674 20,528
Borrowings – current 12,017 13,113 6,478
Derivative financial instruments 2,026 7,531 1,272
Net operating assets 290,880 218,493 100,602
ROIC numerator
Reconciliation of operating profit to operating profit after tax
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Operating profit IFRS 127,658 128,339 102,574
Tax on operating profit (using effective
tax rate) (27,446) (26,438) (20,617)
Operating profit after tax 100,212 101,901 81,957
ROIC denominator
DKK million 2025 2024 2023
Intangible assets 110,208 90,804 55,941
Goodwill 19,845 20,017 4,465
Property, plant and equipment 208,378 161,680 90,961
Deferred income tax assets 23,647 24,648 20,380
Other receivables and prepayments (noncurrent) 5,864 4,016 1,430
Inventories 49,623 40,849 31,811
Trade receivables 70,856 71,949 64,770
Tax receivables 4,848 2,853 2,423
Other receivables and prepayments
(current) 13,482 13,503 8,068
Deferred income tax liabilities (6,611) (5,515) (10,162)
Retirement benefit obligations (861) (903) (742)
Provisions (non-current) (5,730) (6,982) (5,585)
Sales deductions and product returns
(non-current) (1,051) (1,456) (1,064)
Trade payables (19,758) (17,140) (12,130)
Tax payables (8,416) (9,716) (7,116)
Other liabilities (current) (39,721) (35,372) (26,159)
Provisions (current) (374) (289) (132)
Sales deductions and product returns
(current) (133,349) (134,453) (116,557)
Net operating assets 290,880 218,493 100,602
Average net operating assets 254,687 159,548 92,566
––– Part of the Annual review – not audited 117
New non-IFRS measures effective from 2026
To enhance transparency and comparability of underlying performance, Novo Nordisk
will, with effect from the financial year 2026, present outlook and expectations for
sales growth and operating profit growth using new non-IFRS measures that better
reflect underlying developments by excluding certain exceptional and non-recurring
effects, primarily of non-cash nature.
Definitions of the new non-IFRS measures are presented below. From the first quarter
of 2026, management will present a reconciliation of these adjusted measures to the
most directly comparable IFRS measure.
Adjusted sales as reported and at constant exchange rates
The introduction of Adjusted sales as reported and at constant exchange rates (”CER”)
is driven by the impact of reversing a provision for sales rebates of USD 4.2 billion in
the first quarter of 2026 related to the 340B Drug Pricing Program in the US, that was
previously constrained. The effect is considered exceptional and non‑recurring and is
not reflective of the Group’s normal course operating activities. Adjusted sales growth
as reported and at CER will exclude this specific effect to provide a clearer view of
underlying operating performance.
Adjusted operating profit as reported and at constant exchange rates
Adjusted operating profit as reported and at constant exchange rates (”CER”) will
likewise exclude the impact of reversing the provision for sales rebates of USD 4.2
billion in the first quarter of 2026 related to the 340B Drug Pricing Program in the US,
that was previously constrained, as well as other exceptional and non-recurring items
related to effects from major legal matters and major impairment losses.
Major legal matters
Major legal matters refers to legal matters (such as legal or administrative disputes,
litigations, investigations or settlements) where any such matter, or series of related
matters, has an impact (net of insurance recoveries) in excess of DKK 1,000 million on
Novo Nordisk in any given year. Expenses incurred for Novo Nordisk’s legal counsel
and consultants in advising, defending, litigating or negotiating settlements are not
excluded. Major legal matters are considered exceptional and non‑recurring and not
reflective of the Group’s normal course operating activities.
Major impairments
Major impairments refers to impairment losses on intangible assets and property,
plant and equipment in excess of DKK 1,000 million. Major impairments are
considered exceptional and non‑recurring and not reflective of the Group’s normal
course operating activities.
Free cash flow
With effect from 2026, Novo Nordisk defines Free cash flow as ’net cash generated
from operating activities’, less ‘Purchase of property, plant and equipment’. The
change has been made to align with guidance metric and improve peer comparability.
Adjusted net profit
With effect from 2026, adjusted net profit will further adjust for the impact of
reversing the provision for sales rebates of USD 4.2 billion in the first quarter of 2026
related to the 340B Drug Pricing Program in the US, that was previously constrained,
'Major legal matters' and 'Major impairments on property, plant and equipment'. This
change is made to align with new guidance metrics, i.e. Adjusted operating profit. The
additional adjustments, which are implemented in 2026, are primarily of non-cash
nature.
––– Part of the Annual review – not audited 118
Sustainable tax approach
Our overall guiding principle within taxation is to have a sustainable tax approach,
emphasising our business-anchored approach to managing the impact of taxes while
remaining true to the Novo Nordisk values of operating our business in a responsible
and transparent manner. Our legal structures are based on business-anchored
considerations and substance.
Consequently, we pay tax where value is generated and always respect international
and domestic tax rules. As a global business, we conduct cross-border trading, which
is subject to transfer pricing regulations.
We apply a ‘Principal structure’ in line with OECD principles, meaning all legal entities,
except for the principals, perform their functions under contract on behalf of the
principals. As a result, entities contracted by the principals are allocated an activitybased profit according to a benchmarked profit margin. The tax outcome of this
operational model is reflected in the overview below, which shows our corporate
income taxes and paid taxes by region.
To ensure alignment between tax authorities regarding the allocation of profit
between our entities, we aim to have Advance Pricing Agreements and similar tax
rulings in place for geographies representing around 70% of our revenue worldwide.
Our tax policy has been approved by the Board of Directors. Read more about this at:
www.novonordisk.com/sustainable-business/esg-portal/principles-positions-andpolicies/tax-policy.html.
TAXES BY REGION (THREE-YEAR AVERAGE 2023-2025)
Region
Intellectual
property
rights1 Production2 Sales3
Corporate
income
taxes
(DKK billion)
Paid taxes
(DKK billion)
International Operations 23.4 24.1
Denmark 20.4 21.4
EUCAN (excl. Denmark) 1.5 1.0
Emerging Markets 0.3 0.4
APAC 0.3 0.4
Region China 0.9 1.0
US Operations 1.7 5.1
Total 25.1 29.2
1: Intellectual property rights based on sales from where intellectual property rights are located. 2: Production
based on number of production employees in the region. 3: Sales based on location of the customer.
––– Part of the Annual review – not audited 119
Statement by the Board of Directors and Executive Management
The Board of Directors and Executive Management have today considered
and approved the Annual Report of Novo Nordisk A/S for the financial year
1 January 2025 – 31 December 2025.
The Consolidated financial statements are prepared in accordance with IFRS
Accounting Standards as adopted by the EU and disclosure requirements for listed
companies in Denmark. The parent financial statements are presented in accordance
with the Danish Financial Statements Act. Furthermore, the Annual Report is prepared
in accordance with disclosure requirements for listed companies.
In our opinion, the Consolidated financial statements and the parent financial
statements give a true and fair view of the Group’s and the Parent's financial position
at 31 December 2025 as well as of the results of their operations and the Group's
cash flows for the financial year 1 January 2025 – 31 December 2025.
In our opinion, the Management report is prepared in accordance with relevant laws
and regulations and contains a fair review of the development of the Group's and the
In our opinion, the Management report is prepared in accordance with relevant laws
and regulations and contains a fair review of the development of the Group's and the
Parent’s business and financial matters, the results for the year and of the Parent’s
financial position and the financial position as a whole of the entities included in the
Consolidated financial statements, together with a description of the principal risks
and uncertainties that the Group and the Parent face.
The Sustainability statement is prepared in accordance with the European
Sustainability Reporting Standards (ESRS) as required by the Danish Financial
Statements Act, as well as article 8 in the EU Taxonomy regulation.
Furthermore, in our opinion, the Annual Report of Novo Nordisk A/S for the financial
year 1 January 2025 – 31 December 2025, with the file name NOVO-2025-12-31-1-en, is
prepared, in all material respects, in accordance with the ESEF Regulation.
We recommend the Annual Report for adoption at the Annual General Meeting.
Bagsværd, 4 February 2026
Registered Executive Management Board of Directors
Maziar Mike Doustdar
President and Chief Executive
Officer (CEO)
Karsten Munk Knudsen
Chief Financial Officer (CFO)
Lars Rebien Sørensen
Chair
Cees de Jong
Vice Chair
Elisabeth Dahl Christensen Stephan Engels
Liselotte Hyveled Mette Bøjer Jensen Britt Meelby Jensen Kasim Kutay
Tanja Villumsen
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Statements and auditor's report / Statement by the Board of Directors and Executive Management 120
Independent auditor’s report
To the shareholders of Novo Nordisk A/S
Report on the Financial Statements
Opinion
We have audited the consolidated financial statements and the parent financial statements of
Novo Nordisk A/S for the financial year 1 January 2025 – 31 December 2025, which comprise the
income statement, balance sheet, equity statement and notes, including a summary of material
accounting policy information, for the Group as well as the Parent, and the statement of
comprehensive income and the cash flow statement of the Group (collectively referred to as the
“Financial Statements”). The Consolidated financial statements are prepared in accordance with
IFRS Accounting Standards as endorsed by the EU and additional disclosure requirements for
listed entities in Denmark, and the parent financial statements are prepared in accordance with
the Danish Financial Statements Act.
In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements give a true and fair view of the Group’s
financial position at 31 December 2025, and of the results of its operations and cash flows for the
financial year 1 January 2025 – 31 December 2025 in accordance with IFRS Accounting Standards
as endorsed by the EU and additional disclosure requirements for listed entities in Denmark.
Furthermore, in our opinion, the parent financial statements give a true and fair view of the
Parent’s financial position at 31 December 2025, and of the results of its operations for the
financial year 1 January 2025 – 31 December 2025 in accordance with the Danish Financial
Statements Act.
Our opinion is consistent with our long-form auditor's report issued to the Audit Committee and
the Board of Directors.
Basis for opinion
We conducted our audit in accordance with International Standards on Auditing (ISAs) and the
additional requirements applicable in Denmark. Our responsibilities under those standards and
requirements are further described in the ”Auditor’s responsibilities for the audit of the Financial
Statements” section of this auditor’s report. We are independent of the Group in accordance with
the International Ethics Standards Board for Accountants’ International Code of Ethics for
Professional Accountants (IESBA Code), as applicable to audits of financial statements of public
interest entities, and the additional ethical requirements applicable in Denmark to audits of
financial statements of public interest entities. We have also fulfilled our other ethical
responsibilities in accordance with these requirements and the IESBA Code. We believe that the
audit evidence we have obtained is sufficient and appropriate to provide a basis for our opinion.
To the best of our knowledge and belief, we have not provided any prohibited non-audit services
as referred to in Article 5(1) of Regulation (EU) No 537/2014.
We were appointed auditors of Novo Nordisk A/S for the first time on 25 March 2021, for the
financial year 2021. We have been reappointed annually by decision of the general meeting for a
total continuous engagement period of five years up to and including the financial year 2025.
Key audit matters
Key audit matters are those matters that, in our professional judgement, were of most
significance in our audit of the consolidated financial statements and the parent financial
statements for the financial year 1 January 2025 – 31 December 2025. These matters were
addressed in the context of our audit of the consolidated financial statements and the parent
financial statements as a whole, and in forming our opinion thereon, and we do not provide a
separate opinion on these matters.
Key audit matter How the matter was addressed in our audit
US sales rebates
Refer to notes 2.1 and 3.6 in the consolidated financial statements.
In the United States (US), sales rebates are paid in connection with public healthcare
insurance programs, namely Medicare and Medicaid, as well as rebates to pharmacy
benefit managers and managed healthcare plans. In January 2021, the Company changed
its policy in the US related to the 340B Drug Pricing Program, whereby Novo Nordisk no
longer provides 340B statutory discounts to certain pharmacies that contract with covered
entities participating in the 340B Drug Pricing Program. Novo Nordisk has only recognised
revenue related to the 340B Drug Pricing Program to the extent that it is highly probable
that its inclusion will not result in a significant revenue reversal in the future. When sales
are recognised, Novo Nordisk also records provisions for the expected value of the sales
deductions (variable consideration) at the time the related sales are recorded.
We identified the US sales rebates, including provisions related to the 340B Drug Pricing
Program, as a key audit matter due to the significant measurement uncertainty involved in
developing these provisions, as the provisions are based on legal interpretations of
applicable laws and regulations, historical claims experience, payer channel mix, current
contract prices, unbilled claims, claims submission time lags and inventory levels in the
distribution channel. In addition, significant judgment was required to determine whether,
at 31 December 2025, it was deemed highly probable that a significant reversal of revenue
would not occur. This led to a high degree of auditor judgment and an increased extent of
effort in applying procedures relating to these provisions.
We evaluated the appropriateness of the Company’s methodology used to develop their
sales rebates provisions, including provisions related to the 340B Drug Pricing Program,
by involving audit professionals with industry and quantitative analytics experience to
assist us in performing our auditing procedures.
We tested the effectiveness of controls relating to sales rebates, including controls over
the assumptions and data used to estimate these rebates.
We tested rebate claims processed by the Company, including evaluating those claims for
consistency with the conditions and terms of the Company’s rebate arrangements.
We tested the overall reasonableness of the accruals recorded at period end by
developing an expectation for comparison to actual recorded balances.
We evaluated the Company’s ability to estimate sales rebates accurately by considering
the historical accuracy of the Company’s estimates in prior year.
We evaluated the accounting for subsequent events related to the 340B Drug Pricing
Program, including consulting with our accounting specialists related to the Company’s
conclusions.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Statements and auditor's report / Independent auditor’s report 121
Statement on the Management report
Management is responsible for the Management report.
Our opinion on the consolidated financial statements and the parent financial statements
does not cover the Management report, and we do not express any form of assurance
conclusion thereon.
In connection with our audit of the consolidated financial statements and the parent financial
statements, our responsibility is to read the Management report and, in doing so, consider
whether the Management report is materially inconsistent with the consolidated financial
statements and the parent financial statements or our knowledge obtained in the audit or
otherwise appears to be materially misstated.
Moreover, it is our responsibility to consider whether the Management report provides the
information required by the Danish Financial Statements Act. This does not include the
requirements in section 99a related to the Sustainability statement covered by the
separate auditor’s limited assurance report hereon.
Based on the work we have performed, we conclude that the Management report is in
accordance with the consolidated financial statements and the parent financial statements and
has been prepared in accordance with the requirements of the Danish Financial Statements Act
except for the requirements in section 99a related to the Sustainability statement, cf. above. We
did not identify any material misstatement in the Management report.
Management’s responsibilities for the Financial Statements
Management is responsible for the preparation of consolidated financial statements that give a
true and fair view in accordance with IFRS Accounting Standards as endorsed by the EU and
additional disclosure requirements for listed entities in Denmark as well as the preparation of
parent financial statements that give a true and fair view in accordance with the Danish Financial
Statements Act, and for such internal control as Management determines is necessary to enable
the preparation of consolidated financial statements and parent financial statements that are
free from material misstatement, whether due to fraud or error.
In preparing the consolidated financial statements and the parent financial statements,
Management is responsible for assessing the Group’s and the Parent’s ability to continue as a
going concern, for disclosing, as applicable, matters related to going concern, and for using the
going concern basis of accounting in preparing the consolidated financial statements and the
parent financial statements unless Management either intends to liquidate the Group or the
Entity or to cease operations, or has no realistic alternative but to do so.
Auditor’s responsibilities for the audit of the Financial Statements
Our objectives are to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial
statements and the parent financial statements as a whole are free from material misstatement,
whether due to fraud or error, and to issue an auditor’s report that includes our opinion.
Reasonable assurance is a high level of assurance, but is not a guarantee that an audit conducted
in accordance with ISAs and the additional requirements applicable in Denmark will always detect
a material misstatement when it exists. Misstatements can arise from fraud or error and are
considered material if, individually or in the aggregate, they could reasonably be expected to
influence the economic decisions of users taken on the basis of these consolidated financial
statements and these parent financial statements.
As part of an audit conducted in accordance with ISAs and the additional requirements applicable
in Denmark, we exercise professional judgement and maintain professional scepticism
throughout the audit. We also:
• Identify and assess the risks of material misstatement of the consolidated financial
statements and the parent financial statements, whether due to fraud or error, design and
perform audit procedures responsive to those risks, and obtain audit evidence that is
sufficient and appropriate to provide a basis for our opinion. The risk of not detecting a
material misstatement resulting from fraud is higher than for one resulting from error, as
fraud may involve collusion, forgery, intentional omissions, misrepresentations, or the
override of internal control.
• Obtain an understanding of internal control relevant to the audit in order to design audit
procedures that are appropriate in the circumstances, but not for the purpose of
expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of the Group’s and the Parent’s internal control.
• Evaluate the appropriateness of accounting policies used and the reasonableness of
accounting estimates and related disclosures made by Management.
• Conclude on the appropriateness of Management’s use of the going concern basis of
accounting in preparing the consolidated financial statements and the parent financial
statements, and, based on the audit evidence obtained, whether a material uncertainty
exists related to events or conditions that may cast significant doubt on the Group's and
the Parent’s ability to continue as a going concern. If we conclude that a material
uncertainty exists, we are required to draw attention in our auditor’s report to the related
disclosures in the consolidated financial statements and the parent financial statements or,
if such disclosures are inadequate, to modify our opinion. Our conclusions are based on
the audit evidence obtained up to the date of our auditor’s report. However, future events
or conditions may cause the Group and the Entity to cease to continue as a going concern.
• Evaluate the overall presentation, structure and content of the Financial Statements,
including the disclosures in the notes, and whether the Financial Statements represent the
underlying transactions and events in a manner that gives a true and fair view.
• Plan and perform the group audit to obtain sufficient appropriate audit evidence regarding
the financial information of the entities or business units within the group as a basis for
forming an opinion on the Financial Statements. We are responsible for the direction,
supervision and review of the audit work performed for purposes of the group audit. We
remain solely responsible for our audit opinion.
We communicate with those charged with governance regarding, among other matters, the
planned scope and timing of the audit and significant audit findings, including any significant
deficiencies in internal control that we identify during our audit.
We also provide those charged with governance with a statement that we have complied with
relevant ethical requirements regarding independence, and to communicate with them all
relationships and other matters that may reasonably be thought to bear on our independence,
and, where applicable, safeguards put in place and measures taken to eliminate threats.
From the matters communicated with those charged with governance, we determine those
matters that were of most significance in the audit of the Financial Statements of the current
period and are therefore the key audit matters. We describe these matters in our auditor’s report
unless law or regulation precludes public disclosure about the matter.
Report on compliance with the ESEF Regulation
As part of our audit of the Financial Statements of Novo Nordisk A/S, we performed
procedures to express an opinion on whether the annual report for the financial year 1
January 2025 – 31 December 2025, with the file name NOVO-2025-12-31-1-en, is prepared, in
all material respects, in compliance with the Commission Delegated Regulation (EU) 2019/815
on the European Single Electronic Format (ESEF Regulation), which includes requirements
related to the preparation of the annual report in XHTML format and iXBRL tagging of the
consolidated financial statements including notes.
Management is responsible for preparing an annual report that complies with the ESEF
Regulation. This responsibility includes:
• The preparing of the annual report in XHTML format;
• The selection and application of appropriate iXBRL tags, including extensions to the ESEF
taxonomy and the anchoring thereof to elements in the taxonomy, for financial
information required to be tagged using judgement where necessary;
• Ensuring consistency between iXBRL tagged data and the consolidated financial statements
presented in human readable format; and
• For such internal control as Management determines necessary to enable the preparation
of an annual report that is compliant with the ESEF Regulation.
Our responsibility is to obtain reasonable assurance on whether the annual report is
prepared, in all material respects, in compliance with the ESEF Regulation based on the
evidence we have obtained, and to issue a report that includes our opinion. The nature,
timing and extent of procedures selected depend on the auditor’s judgement, including the
assessment of the risks of material departures from the requirements set out in the ESEF
Regulation, whether due to fraud or error. The procedures include:
• Testing whether the annual report is prepared in XHTML format;
• Obtaining an understanding of the Company’s iXBRL tagging process and of internal
control over the tagging process;
• Evaluating the completeness of the iXBRL tagging of the consolidated financial statements
including notes;
• Evaluating the appropriateness of the Company’s use of iXBRL elements selected from the
ESEF taxonomy and the creation of extension elements where no suitable element in the
ESEF taxonomy has been identified;
• Evaluating the use of anchoring of extension elements to elements in the ESEF taxonomy;
and
• Reconciling the iXBRL tagged data with the audited consolidated financial statements.
In our opinion, the annual report of Novo Nordisk A/S for the financial year 1 January 2025 –
31 December 2025, with the file name NOVO-2025-12-31-1-en is prepared, in all material
respects, in compliance with the ESEF Regulation.
Copenhagen, 4 February 2026
Deloitte
Statsautoriseret Revisionspartnerselskab
Business Registration No 33 96 35 56
Anders Vad Dons Sumit Sudan
State-Authorised Public Accountant State-Authorised Public Accountant
mne25299 mne33716
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Statements and auditor's report / Independent auditor’s report 122
Independent auditor’s limited assurance report on Sustainability statement
To the stakeholders of Novo Nordisk A/S
Limited assurance conclusion
We have conducted a limited assurance engagement on the Sustainability statement of Novo
Nordisk A/S (the “Group”) included in the Management Report (the “Sustainability statement”),
for the financial year 1 January – 31 December 2025.
Based on the procedures we have performed and the evidence we have obtained, nothing
has come to our attention that causes us to believe that the Sustainability statement is not
prepared, in all material respects, in accordance with the Danish Financial Statements Act
section 99a, including:
• compliance with the European Sustainability Reporting Standards (ESRS), including that the
process carried out by the management to identify the information reported in the
Sustainability statement (the “Process”) is in accordance with the description set out in 1.4
Double materiality assessment; and
• compliance of the disclosures in 10. EU Taxonomy within the Other material topics
information and EU Taxonomy – Contextual information, accounting policies and templates
within the section Additional Sustainability statement information with Article 8 of EU
Regulation 2020/852 (the “Taxonomy Regulation”).
Basis for conclusion
We conducted our limited assurance engagement in accordance with ISAE 3000 (Revised),
Assurance engagements other than audits or reviews of historical financial information, and
additional requirements applicable in Denmark.
The procedures in a limited assurance engagement vary in nature and timing from, and are
less in extent than for, a reasonable assurance engagement. Consequently, the level of
assurance obtained in a limited assurance engagement is substantially lower than the
assurance that would have been obtained had a reasonable assurance engagement been
performed.
We believe that the evidence we have obtained is sufficient and appropriate to provide a basis
for our conclusion. Our responsibilities under this standard are further described in the
“Auditor’s responsibilities for the assurance engagement” section of our report.
Our independence and quality management
We are independent of the Group in accordance with the International Ethics Standards
Board for Accountants’ International Code of Ethics for Professional Accountants (IESBA Code)
and the additional ethical requirements applicable in Denmark. We have also fulfilled our
other ethical responsibilities in accordance with these requirements and the IESBA Code.
Deloitte Statsautoriseret Revisionspartnerselskab applies International Standard on Quality
Management 1, ISQM1, which requires the firm to design, implement and operate a system
of quality management including policies or procedures regarding compliance with ethical
requirements, professional standards and applicable legal and regulatory requirements.
Other matter
The comparative information included in the Sustainability statement of the Group for the
financial year 2023 was not subject to an assurance engagement on sustainability information
prepared in accordance with the Danish Financial Statements Act section 99a. Our conclusion is
not modified in respect of this matter.
Inherent limitations in preparing the Sustainability statement
In reporting forward-looking information in accordance with ESRS, management is required to
prepare the forward-looking information on the basis of disclosed assumptions about events
that may occur in the future and possible future actions by the Group. Actual outcomes are
likely to be different since anticipated events frequently do not occur as expected.
Management’s responsibilities for the Sustainability statement
Management is responsible for designing and implementing a process to identify the
information reported in the Sustainability statement in accordance with the ESRS and for
disclosing this Process as part of the General information. This responsibility includes:
• understanding the context in which the Group’s activities and business relationships take
place and developing an understanding of its affected stakeholders;
• the identification of the actual and potential impacts (both negative and positive) related to
sustainability matters, as well as risks and opportunities that affect, or could reasonably be
expected to affect, the Group’s financial position, financial performance, cash flows, access
to finance or cost of capital over the short-, medium-, or long-term;
• the assessment of the materiality of the identified impacts, risks and opportunities related
to sustainability matters by selecting and applying appropriate thresholds; and
• making assumptions that are reasonable in the circumstances.
Management is further responsible for the preparation of the Sustainability statement, in
accordance with the Danish Financial Statements Act section 99a, including:
• compliance with the ESRS;
• preparing the disclosures within the Environmental information of the Sustainability
statement, in compliance with Article 8 of the Taxonomy Regulation;
• designing, implementing and maintaining such internal control that management
determines is necessary to enable the preparation of the Sustainability statement that is
free from material misstatement, whether due to fraud or error; and
• the selection and application of appropriate sustainability reporting methods and making
assumptions and estimates that are reasonable in the circumstances.
Auditor’s responsibilities for the assurance engagement
Our objectives are to plan and perform the assurance engagement to obtain limited
assurance about whether the Sustainability statement is free from material misstatement,
whether due to fraud or error, and to issue a limited assurance report that includes our
conclusion. Misstatements can arise from fraud or error and are considered material if,
individually or in the aggregate, they could reasonably be expected to influence decisions of
users taken on the basis of the Sustainability statement as a whole.
As part of a limited assurance engagement in accordance with ISAE 3000 (Revised) we
exercise professional judgement and maintain professional scepticism throughout the
engagement.
Our responsibilities in respect of the Process include:
• Obtaining an understanding of the Process but not for the purpose of providing a
conclusion on the effectiveness of the Process, including the outcome of the Process;
• Considering whether the information identified addresses the applicable disclosure
requirements of the ESRS, and
• Designing and performing procedures to evaluate whether the Process is consistent with
the Group’s description of its Process, as disclosed in 1.4 Double materiality assessment of
the Sustainability statement.
Our other responsibilities in respect of the Sustainability statement include:
• Identifying disclosures where material misstatements are likely to arise, whether due to
fraud or error; and
• Designing and performing procedures responsive to disclosures in the Sustainability
statement where material misstatements are likely to arise. The risk of not detecting a
material misstatement resulting from fraud is higher than for one resulting from error, as
fraud may involve collusion, forgery, intentional omissions, misrepresentations, or the
override of internal control.
Summary of the work performed
A limited assurance engagement involves performing procedures to obtain evidence about
the Sustainability statement.
The nature, timing and extent of procedures selected depend on professional judgement,
including the identification of disclosures where material misstatements are likely to arise,
whether due to fraud or error, in the Sustainability statement.
In conducting our limited assurance engagement, with respect to the Process, we:
• Obtained an understanding of the Process by performing inquiries to understand the
sources of the information used by management; and reviewing the Group’s internal
documentation of its Process; and
• Evaluated whether the evidence obtained from our procedures about the Process
implemented by the Group was consistent with the description of the Process set out in 1.4
Double materiality assessment of the Sustainability statement.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Statements and auditor's report / Independent auditor’s limited assurance report on Sustainability statement 123
In conducting our limited assurance engagement, with respect to the Sustainability
statement, we: • Obtained an understanding of the Group’s reporting processes relevant to the preparation
of its Sustainability statement (including the consolidation processes) by obtaining an
understanding of the Group’s control environment, processes and information systems
relevant to the preparation of the Sustainability statement but not evaluating the design of
particular control activities, obtaining evidence about their implementation or testing their
operating effectiveness;
• Evaluated whether material information identified by the Process is included in the
Sustainability statement;
• Evaluated whether the structure and the presentation of the Sustainability statement are in
accordance with the ESRS;
• Performed inquiries of relevant personnel and analytical procedures on selected
information in the Sustainability statement;
• Performed substantive assurance procedures on selected information in the Sustainability
statement;
• Evaluated methods, assumptions and data for developing material estimates and forwardlooking information and how these methods were applied; and • Obtained an understanding of the process to identify taxonomy-eligible and taxonomyaligned economic activities and the corresponding disclosures in the Sustainability
statement.
Copenhagen, 4 February 2026
Deloitte
Statsautoriseret Revisionspartnerselskab
Business Registration No. 33 96 35 56
Anders Vad Dons Sumit Sudan
State-Authorised Public Accountant State-Authorised Public Accountant
mne25299 mne33716
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Statements and auditor's report / Independent auditor’s limited assurance report on Sustainability statement 124
Financial statements of the parent company
The following pages comprise the financial statements of the parent company, the legal entity Novo Nordisk A/S. Apart from ownership of the subsidiaries in the
Novo Nordisk Group, activities of the parent company mainly comprises sales, research and development, production, corporate activities and support functions.
Income statement
For the year ended 31 December
DKK million Note 2025 2024
Net sales 2 289,015 261,712
Cost of goods sold 3 (73,168) (48,930)
Gross profit 215,847 212,782
Sales and distribution costs 3 (49,129) (48,921)
Research and development costs 3 (49,049) (40,296)
Administrative costs 3 (2,561) (1,905)
Other operating income and expenses 1,095 692
Operating profit 116,203 122,352
Profit in subsidiaries, net of tax 8 7,070 8,578
Financial income 4 10,348 6,230
Financial expenses 4 (10,495) (12,568)
Profit before income taxes 123,126 124,592
Income taxes (22,744) (22,908)
Net profit 100,382 101,684
Balance sheet
At 31 December
DKK million Note 2025 2024
Assets
Intangible assets 6 86,049 93,202
Property, plant and equipment 7 119,882 86,376
Financial assets 8 145,275 116,186
Other receivables and prepayments 9 5,697 3,429
Total non-current assets 356,903 299,193
Raw materials 13,678 11,075
Work in progress 23,062 20,439
Finished goods 6,276 5,038
Inventories 43,016 36,552
Trade receivables 3,115 3,289
Amounts owed by affiliated companies 42,674 47,106
Tax receivables — 7
Other receivables and prepayments 9 6,795 6,402
Receivables 52,584 56,804
Marketable securities 498 10,653
Derivative financial instruments 11 6,682 6,326
Cash at bank 21,112 11,750
Total current assets 123,892 122,085
Total assets 480,795 421,278
DKK million Note 2025 2024
Equity and liabilities
Share capital 10 446 446
Net revaluation reserve 12,907 18,952
Development costs reserve 2,104 1,994
Reserve for cash flow hedges and
exchange rate adjustments 3,570 (4,243)
Proposed dividends 35,330 35,100
Retained earnings 137,475 91,074
Total equity 191,832 143,323
Borrowings 12 113,360 85,368
Deferred income tax liabilities 5 5,802 4,886
Other provisions 1,799 1,576
Total non-current liabilities 120,961 91,830
Borrowings 12 10,764 11,557
Derivative financial instruments 11 2,026 7,531
Trade payables 10,906 9,099
Amounts owed to affiliated companies 119,090 137,678
Tax payables 4,196 3,883
Other liabilities 21,020 16,377
Total current liabilities 168,002 186,125
Total liabilities 288,963 277,955
Total equity and liabilities 480,795 421,278
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Financial statements of the parent company 125
Equity statement
DKK million
Share
capital
Net
revaluation
reserve
Development
costs reserve
Reserve for
cash flow
hedges and
exchange rate
adjustments
Proposed
dividends
Retained
earnings 2025 2024
Balance at the beginning of the year 446 18,952 1,994 (4,243) 35,100 91,074 143,323 105,682
Net profit 7,057 51,993 41,332 100,382 101,684
Dividend received from subsidiaries (4,676) 4,676 — —
Exchange rate adjustments (7,692) (67) (7,759) 3,066
Development costs 110 (110) — —
Realisation of previously deferred (gains)/losses on cash flow hedges 5,763 5,763 (1,547)
Deferred gains/(losses) on cash flow hedges open at year-end 4,339 4,339 (5,763)
Transactions with owners:
Reduction of the B share capital — —
Dividends paid during the period (51,763) (51,763) (44,140)
Purchase of treasury shares (1,439) (1,439) (20,181)
Share-based payments 983 452 1,435 2,289
Other adjustments (1,717) 1,791 74 401
Tax on equity entries (2,222) (301) (2,523) 1,832
Balance at the end of the year 446 12,907 2,104 3,570 35,330 137,475 191,832 143,323
Refer to note 4.3 in the Consolidated financial statements for details on the number of shares, treasury shares and total number of A and B shares in Novo Nordisk A/S.
Refer to note 4.2 in the Consolidated financial statements for details on the dividends paid and shares repurchased in Novo Nordisk A/S.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Financial statements of the parent company 126
Notes
1 Accounting policies
The financial statements of the parent company have been prepared in accordance
with the Danish Financial Statements Act (Class D) and other accounting regulations
for companies listed on Nasdaq Copenhagen.
The accounting policies for the financial statements of the parent company are
unchanged from the previous financial year. The accounting policies are the same as
for the Consolidated financial statements with the differences described below. For a
description of the accounting policies of the Group, refer to the Consolidated
financial statements.
No separate statement of cash flows has been prepared for the parent company;
refer to the statement of cash flows for the Group.
Supplementary accounting policies for the parent company
In the Parent Financial Statements the acquisition of three fill-finish sites from Novo
Holdings A/S during 2024 is accounted for as acquisition of shares in subsidiaries and
intangible assets (access to capacity).
Intangible assets (access to capacity)
Access to capacity asset represents a right that Novo Nordisk A/S has acquired to
access and control the production capacity of three fill-finish sites acquired by
subsidiaries of Novo Nordisk A/S in 2024. Access to capacity asset is amortised
over 10 years.
Financial assets
In the financial statements of the parent company, investments in subsidiaries and
associated companies are recorded under the equity method, using the respective
share of the net asset values in subsidiaries and associated companies. The equity
method is used as a measurement method rather than a consolidation method.
The net profit of subsidiaries and associated companies less unrealised intra-group profits
and amortisation of goodwill is recorded in the income statement of the parent company.
To the extent that net profit exceeds declared dividends from such companies, the net
revaluation of investments in subsidiaries and associated companies is transferred to net
revaluation reserve under equity according to the equity method.
Goodwill recognised in subsidiaries is amortised over 3-23 years, which reflects
the useful life of the underlying assets and activities generating the goodwill.
Amounts owed by affiliates, where settlement is neither planned nor likely within
the foreseeable future, are treated as part of net-investments in subsidiaries, with
exchange rate adjustments recognised directly in equity through reserve for cash
flow hedges and exchange rate adjustments.
Tax
For Danish tax purposes, the parent company is assessed jointly with its Danish
subsidiaries. The Danish jointly taxed companies are included in a Danish on-account
tax payment scheme for Danish corporate income tax. All current taxes under the
scheme are recorded in the individual companies. Novo Nordisk A/S and its jointly
taxed subsidiaries are included in the joint taxation of the parent company,
Novo Holdings A/S.
2 Net sales
DKK million 2025 2024
Net sales by segment
Obesity and Diabetes care 288,847 261,556
Rare disease 168 156
Total net sales 289,015 261,712
Net sales by geographical segment
US Operations 159,077 155,197
International Operations:
EUCAN 57,313 47,855
Emerging Markets 25,527 22,879
APAC 17,506 12,425
Region China 29,592 23,356
Total net sales 289,015 261,712
Net sales are attributed to a geographical segment based on location of the customer.
For definitions of segments, refer to note 2.2 in the Consolidated financial statements.
3 Employee costs
DKK million 2025 2024
Wages and salaries 29,821 25,252
Share-based payment costs 452 626
Pensions 2,531 2,211
Other social security contributions 466 417
Other employee costs 1,548 1,371
Total employee costs 34,818 29,877
Average number of full-time employees 31,059 29,288
Year-end number of full-time employees 26,773 31,096
For information regarding remuneration to the Board of Directors and Executive
Management, refer to note 5.4 in the Consolidated financial statements.
4 Financial income and financial expenses
DKK million 2025 2024
Interest income relating to subsidiaries 418 227
Interest income relating to external counterparties 1,089 1,589
Foreign exchange gain (net) 8,675 —
Financial gain from forward contracts (net) — 4,355
Capital gain from marketable securities (net) — 2
Other financial income 166 57
Total financial income 10,348 6,230
Interest expenses relating to subsidiaries 6,369 6,763
Interest expense relating to external counterparties 1,547 529
Result of associated company 13 4
Foreign exchange loss (net) — 5,076
Financial loss from forward contracts (net) 2,405 —
Capital loss from marketable securities (net) 9 —
Other financial expenses 152 196
Total financial expenses 10,495 12,568
5 Deferred income tax assets/(liabilities)
DKK million 2025 2024
Net deferred tax asset/(liability) at the beginning
of the year (4,886) (6,282)
Income/(charge) to the income statement 1,699 (349)
Additions from acquisitions — 254
Income/(charge) to equity (2,615) 1,491
Net deferred tax asset/(liability)
at the end of the year (5,802) (4,886)
The Danish corporate tax rate is 22% in 2025 (22% in 2024), which is used for the
calculation of the deferred tax liability.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Financial statements of the parent company 127
6 Intangible assets
DKK million
Intellectual
property rights
and similar
rights
Software and
other
intangibles 2025 2024
Cost at the beginning of the year 102,660 4,670 107,330 35,657
Additions during the year 3,561 439 4,000 72,692
Disposals during the year (1,184) (31) (1,215) (1,019)
Cost at the end of the year 105,037 5,078 110,115 107,330
Amortisation and impairment losses at the beginning of the year 12,015 2,113 14,128 6,902
Amortisation during the year 7,214 260 7,474 1,399
Impairment losses for the year 2,456 39 2,495 6,056
Amortisation and impairment losses reversed on disposals during the year — (31) (31) (229)
Amortisation and impairment losses at the end of the year 21,685 2,381 24,066 14,128
Carrying amount at the end of the year 83,352 2,697 86,049 93,202
Intangible assets primarily relate to intellectual property rights and similar rights, which includes access to capacity asset (acquired in 2024) amounting to DKK 50,665 million
(DKK 57,496 million in 2024), and software and other intangibles, which mainly consists of internally developed software and costs related to major IT projects. Intangible assets
which are not yet available for use amount to DKK 15,854 million (DKK 17,610 million in 2024). For further information on impairments, refer to note 3.1 in the Consolidated
financial statements.
7 Property, plant and equipment
DKK million
Land and
buildings
Plant and
machinery
Other
equipment
Assets
under
construction 2025 2024
Cost at the beginning of the year 27,168 27,904 5,134 61,030 121,236 86,351
Additions during the year 2,270 1,683 365 35,925 40,243 35,819
Disposals during the year (99) (162) (145) (3,211) (3,617) (934)
Transfer from/(to) other items 1,102 1,452 398 (2,952) — —
Cost at the end of the year 30,441 30,877 5,752 90,792 157,862 121,236
Depreciation and impairment losses at the beginning of the year 13,338 18,230 3,292 — 34,860 32,529
Depreciation for the year 1,417 1,283 418 — 3,118 2,938
Impairment losses for the year 64 186 105 3,211 3,566 322
Depreciation reversed on disposals during the year (85) (159) (109) (3,211) (3,564) (929)
Depreciation and impairment losses at the end of the year 14,734 19,540 3,706 — 37,980 34,860
Carrying amount at the end of the year 15,707 11,337 2,046 90,792 119,882 86,376
Of which related to leased property, plant and equipment 1,832 — 81 — 1,913 1,461
Leased property, plant and equipment primarily relates to lease of office buildings, warehouses, laboratories and vehicles.

––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Financial statements of the parent company 128
8 Financial assets
DKK million
Investments
in subsidiaries
Amounts
owed by
affiliated
companies
Investment in
associated
company
Other
securities and
investments 2025 2024
Cost at the beginning of the year 93,778 2,839 105 963 97,685 63,171
Investments during the year 33,757 1,703 82 35,542 34,990
Divestments and repayments during the year (373) (130) (503) (476)
Cost at the end of the year 127,535 4,169 105 915 132,724 97,685
Value adjustments at the beginning of the year 18,904 (90) 48 (361) 18,501 24,372
Profit/(loss) after tax 7,070 (13) 7,057 8,574
Dividends received (4,676) (4,676) (21,762)
Divestments during the year 94 94 —
Effect of exchange rate adjustment charged to the income statement 63 63 42
Effect of exchange rate adjustment charged to equity (7,692) (67) (7,759) 3,066
Share-based payments 983 983 1,663
Other adjustments (1,717) 5 (1,712) 2,546
Value adjustments at the end of the year 12,872 (157) 35 (199) 12,551 18,501
Carrying amount at the end of the year 140,407 4,012 140 716 145,275 116,186
The presentation of Financial assets was updated to enhance clarity and readability by grouping items into broader categories of a similar nature. Comparative figures impacted
were restated accordingly without impact on net book values.
For a list of companies in the Novo Nordisk Group, refer to note 5.6 in the Consolidated financial statements.
9 Other receivables and prepayments
Other receivables and prepayments includes prepayments of DKK 10,134 million
(DKK 7,571 million in 2024), primarily related to prepaid contract manufacturing
and R&D activities
10 Share capital
For information on share capital, refer to note 4.3 in the Consolidated financial
statements.
11 Derivatives
For information on derivative financial instruments, refer to note 4.5 in the
Consolidated financial statements. All derivatives in the group are entered into
with Novo Nordisk A/S as the counterpart.
12 Borrowings
DKK million 2025 2024
Within 1 year 10,764 11,557
1-5 years 59,378 63,815
More than 5 years 53,982 21,553
Total borrowings 124,124 96,925
Borrowings mainly consist of loans from Novo Nordisk Finance (Netherlands) B.V.
related to issuance of Eurobonds to fund the acquisition of subsidiaries and intangible
assets. For further information on borrowings, refer to note 4.6 in the Consolidated
financial statements.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Financial statements of the parent company 129
13 Related party transactions
The parent company's transactions and obligations with related parties correspond to
those reported in note 5.4 to the Consolidated financial statements, except for those
listed below where the parent company's share is reported.
Parent company's share of transactions with related parties
DKK million 2025 2024
Catalent Group
Services provided by Catalent 526 —
Novonesis Group
Services provided by Novo Nordisk (37) (38)
Services provided by Novonesis 167 115
Other subsidiaries of Novo Holding A/S
Services provided to Novo Nordisk 78 34
NNIT Group
Services provided by NNIT 168 189
Novo Nordisk A/S is included in the Consolidated financial statements of the Novo
Nordisk Foundation.
14 Fee to statutory auditors
DKK million 2025 2024
Statutory audit
1
 14 14
Audit-related services 4 3
Tax advisory services 7 4
Other services 6 13
Total fee to statutory auditors 31 34
1. 2024 statutory audit fee includes DKK 5 million of additional fees mainly related to business
acquisitions.
15 Commitments and contingencies
DKK million 2025 2024
Commitments
Leases1,4 511 1,346
Research and development obligations 21,523 31,511
Research and development - potential milestones
2
 18,744 33,614
Commercial product launch - potential milestones
2
 25,561 15,749
Purchase obligations relating to investments in
property plant and equipment 6,750 4,956
Purchase obligation relating to contract manufacturers 91,031 71,061
Other purchase obligations
4
 5,618 6,338
Guarantees given for subsidiaries
3
 140,183 68,081
Other guarantees 1,014 1,003
1. Lease commitments predominantly relate to lease agreements executed but not commenced
and estimated variable property taxes and low value assets. 2. Potential milestone payments are
associated with uncertainty because they are linked to successful achievements in research
activities; refer to note 5.2 in the Consolidated financial statements. 3. Guarantees given for
subsidiaries mainly relate to guarantees towards Novo Nordisk Finance (Netherlands) B.V. related to
issuance of Eurobonds. 4. Committed service costs have been reclassified from ‘Leases’ to ‘Other
purchase obligations’ to better reflect the nature of these commitments. Comparative figures have
been restated accordingly.
Novo Nordisk A/S and its Danish subsidiaries are jointly taxed with the Danish
companies in Novo Holdings A/S. The joint taxation also covers withholding taxes
in the form of dividend tax, royalty tax and interest tax. The Danish companies are
jointly and severally liable for the joint taxation. Any subsequent adjustments to
income taxes and withholding taxes may lead to a larger liability. The tax for the
individual companies is allocated in full on the basis of the expected taxable income.
For information on Purchase obligations related to contract manufacturers, refer to
note 5.2 in the Consolidated financial statements. For information on pending
litigation and other contingencies, refer to notes 3.6 and 5.2 in the Consolidated
financial statements.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Financial statements / Financial statements of the parent company 130
More information
Additional reporting
Novo Nordisk provides additional disclosure to satisfy legal requirements and stakeholder interests.
Supplementary reports can be downloaded at: www.novonordisk.com/annualreport, while additional information
can be found at: www.novonordisk.com.
Annual Report
This Annual Report is Novo Nordisk’s full statutory Annual Report pursuant to Section 149(1) of the Danish
Financial Statements Act. The statutory Annual Report will be presented and adopted at the Annual General
Meeting on 26 March 2026 and will subsequently be submitted to and be available at the Danish Business
Authority. The consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report have been prepared in
accordance with IFRS Accounting Standards (IFRS) as issued by the International Accounting Standards Board
(IASB) and in accordance with IFRS Accounting Standards endorsed by the EU and further requirements in the
Danish Financial Statements Act.
The Sustainability statement included in this Annual Report has been prepared in accordance with the European
Sustainability Reporting Standards (ESRS) as required by the Danish Financial Statement Act, as well as article 8
in the EU Taxonomy regulation.
Form 20-F
The Form 20-F is filed using a standardised reporting form so that investors can evaluate the company alongside
US domestic equities. It is an annual reporting requirement of the US Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC)
for foreign private issuers with equity shares listed on exchanges in the United States.
Corporate Governance Report
The Corporate Governance Report discloses Novo Nordisk’s compliance with corporate governance to
meet the requirements of the Danish Financial Statements Act.
Remuneration Report
The Remuneration Report describes the remuneration awarded or due during 2025 to members of the Board
and Executive Management registered with the Danish Business Authority in accordance with section 139b of
the Danish Companies Act. The Remuneration Report is submitted to the Annual General Meeting for an
advisory vote.
Disclaimer
The patients, employees and relatives portrayed in this Annual Report and ancillary reports have participated
of their own accord and solely to express their own personal opinions on topics referred to, which do not
necessarily reflect the views and opinions of Novo Nordisk. Use of the pictures as illustrations is in no way
intended to associate the patients, employees or relatives with the promotion of any Novo Nordisk products.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / More information 131
Additional Sustainability statement information
(part of Sustainability statement)
Table 1 - Sustainability statement policy overview
Policy Most senior accountable Scope Internationally recognised instruments Availability Pages covered
OneCode Executive Management All Representatives UN Guiding Principles on Business and Human Rights Externally, Link 51, 52, 53, 55, 75-77
Labour Code of Conduct Executive Management All Employees* ILO's Declaration on Fundamental Principles and Rights at Work Externally, Link 57
Health and Safety Executive Management All Operations* ISO 45001 Externally, Link 57, 59
Diversity and Inclusion Executive Management All Employees* N/A Externally, Link 57, 60
Responsible Sourcing Standards Senior VP of Global Solutions Global Activities UN Guiding Principles on Business and Human Rights
OECD Guidelines for Multinational Enterprises on Responsible
Business Conduct
Eight ILO Conventions
International Bill of Human Rights
Externally, Link 63, 71, 75, 77
Human Rights Commitment Chief Compliance Officer All Activities International Bill of Human Rights
ILO Declaration on Fundamental Principles and Rights at Work
The Convention on the Rights of the Child
Externally, Link 51-52, 71
Environmental Executive Management Global Activities ISO 14001
ISO 50001
Externally, Link 63, 68, 72, 74
Anti-retaliation Chief Compliance Officer All Representatives N/A Externally, Link 76
Global Procurement Corporate VP of Corporate Procurement All Sourced Goods and Services N/A N/A 76
Bioethics Policy Executive Management Global Activities Declaration of Helsinki
ICH Good Clinical Practice
Nuremberg Code
Belmont Report
UN Guiding Principles on Business and Human Rights
UNESCO’s Universal Declaration on Bioethics and Human Right
Externally, Link 75, 78
 *Policies related to 'Own workforce' excludes NNE, as the subsidiary has its own process in place.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Additional Sustainability statement information (part of the Sustainability statement) 132
Tables in accordance with ESRS 2 General Disclosures and the EU Taxonomy Regulation:
Table 2 – Other legislation
The table below includes all of the data points that derive from other EU legislation as listed in ESRS 2 appendix B,
indicating where the data points can be found in our report and which data points are assessed as not applicable to
Novo Nordisk.
Disclosure requirement Data point
SFDR
reference
Pillar 3
reference
Benchmark
regulation
reference
EU Climate
Law
reference Page
ESRS 2 GOV-1 21 (d) x x 61
ESRS 2 GOV-1 21 (e) x 39
ESRS 2 GOV-4 30 x 47
ESRS 2 SBM-1 40 (d) i x x x Not applicable
ESRS 2 SBM-1 40 (d) ii x x Not applicable
ESRS 2 SBM-1 40 (d) iii x x Not applicable
ESRS 2 SBM-1 40 (d) iv x Not applicable
ESRS E1-1 14 x 64
ESRS E1-1 16 (g) x x Not material
ESRS E1-4 34 x x x 64
ESRS E1-5 38 x 65
ESRS E1-5 37 x 65
ESRS E1-5 40-43 x 65
ESRS E1-6 44 x x x 66
ESRS E1-6 53-55 x x x 66
ESRS E1-7 56 x Not applicable
ESRS E1-9 66 x Phase-in
ESRS E1-9 66 (a); 66 (c) x Phase-in
ESRS E1-9 67 (c) x Phase-in
ESRS E1-9 69 x Phase-in
ESRS E2-4 28 x Not applicable
ESRS E3-1 9 x 72
ESRS E3-1 13 x Not applicable
ESRS E3-1 14 x Not applicable
ESRS E3-4 28 (C) x 73
ESRS E3-4 29 x Not material
ESRS 2- IRO 1 - E4 16 (a) i x Phase-in
ESRS 2- IRO 1 - E4 16 (b) x Phase-in
ESRS 2- IRO 1 - E4 16 (c) x 72, 73
ESRS E4-2 24 (b) x 72
ESRS E4-2 24 (c) x Not applicable
ESRS E4-2 24 (d) x 72
Disclosure requirement Data point
SFDR
reference
Pillar 3
reference
Benchmark
regulation
reference
EU Climate
Law
reference Page
ESRS E5-5 37 (d) x 70
ESRS E5-5 39 x 70
ESRS 2- SBM 3 - S1 14 (f) x Not material
ESRS 2- SBM 3 - S1 14 (g) x Not material
ESRS S1-1 20 x Not material
ESRS S1-1 21 x 57
ESRS S1-1 22 x Not material
ESRS S1-1 23 x 59
ESRS S1-3 32 (c) x 58, 76
ESRS S1-14 88 (b), 88 (c) x x 59
ESRS S1-14 88 (e) x Phase-in
ESRS S1-16 97 (a) x x 60
ESRS S1-16 97 (b) x 60
ESRS S1-17 103 (a) x 58
ESRS S1-17 104 (a) x x Not material
ESRS 2- SBM 3 - S2 11 (b) x 71
ESRS S2-1 17 x 71
ESRS S2-1 18 x 71
ESRS S2-1 19 x x 71
ESRS S2-1 19 x 71
ESRS S2-4 36 x Phase-in
ESRS S3-1 16 x Not material
ESRS S3-1 17 x x Not material
ESRS S3-4 36 x Not material
ESRS S4-1 16 x 52
ESRS S4-1 17 x x 53, 55
ESRS S4-4 35 x Phase-in
ESRS G1-1 10 (b) x Not applicable
ESRS G1-1 10 (d) x Not applicable
ESRS G1-4 24 (a) x x 76
ESRS G1-4 24 (b) x 76
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Additional Sustainability statement information (part of the Sustainability statement) 133
Table 3 – Disclosure requirements in ESRS covered by the Sustainability statement Table 4 – List of incorporations by reference
ESRS 2 – General disclosures ESRS E2 – Pollution ESRS E5 – Resource use and
circular economy
ESRS S2 – Workers in the
value chain
ESRS disclosure requirement Incorporation by reference
Disclosure requirement Page Disclosure requirement Page ESRS 2 GOV-1 (21 a-e, 22a-d, 23 a, b); G1
GOV-1 (5 a, b): Roles and responsibilities
of the Board of Directors and Executive
Management
See Annual review, section 'Governance' pages 35-40 (incl. Sustainability
statement: table 3.3.3 'Diversity metrics – Management levels' on page 61).
For additional details on Board competences, see Corporate Governance
Report p. 4, section 'Board competences and composition'
BP-1: Basis for preparation 47 ESRS 2 IRO-1: Processes 74 Disclosure requirement Page Disclosure requirement Page
BP-2: Specific circumstances 47 E2-1: Policies 74 ESRS 2 IRO-1: Processes 68 ESRS 2 SBM 2: Stakeholders 48
GOV-1: Governance roles 40 E2-2: Actions 74 E5-1: Policies 68 ESRS 2 SBM 3: Strategy 71 ESRS 2 GOV-2 (26 a-c): Overseeing
sustainability matters and sustainability
matters discussed; ESRS 2 GOV-5 (36e):
Periodic reporting of risks
See Corporate Governance Report, page 4-7, sub-section ‘4. Board of
Directors' and '5. Board Committees', Annual review, section 'Governance'
pages 35-40, 'Sustainability commitment' pages 32-34, and 'Risk
management' section pages 41-42
GOV-2: Governance 40 E2-3: Targets N/A E5-2: Actions 68, 69 S2-1: Policies 71
GOV-3: Incentives schemes 40 E2-4: Pollution N/A E5-3: Targets 69 S2-2: Processes 71, 76
GOV-4: Due diligence 47 E2-5: Substances 74 E5-4: Resource inflows 69 S2-3: Remediate impacts 71, 76 ESRS 2 GOV-3 (29 a-e): Incentive schemes
dependent on sustainability-related targets
and performance metrics
See Remuneration Report, pages 13-15, 3.5 ‘Short-term incentive programme
2025’ and pages 16-19, 3.6-3.8 ‘Long-term incentive programmes 2023, 2024
and 2025– programme design’, page 5, table 1, rows: Short-term cash-based
incentive programme and Long-term share-based incentive programme for
the Board of Directors, and page 9, table 7, rows: Short-term incentive
programme (STIP) and Long-term incentive programme (LTIP) for
Executive Management
GOV-5: Risk management 47 E2-6: Financial effects N/A E5-5: Resource outflows 69, 70 S2-4: Actions 71
SBM-1: Value chain 10 E5-6: Financial effects N/A S2-5: Targets N/A
SBM-2: Stakeholders 48 ESRS E3 – Water and
marine resources SBM-3: Strategy 9, 49 ESRS S1 – Own workforce ESRS S4 – Patient protection and
IRO-1: Processes 49 Disclosure requirement Page Disclosure requirement Page quality of life ESRS E1, 13 (related to ESRS 2 GOV-3):
Portion of total expensed remuneration to
registered executives dependent on
performance against climate related
targets; ESRS 2 GOV-3 (29 d): Portion of
total expensed variable remuneration to
registered executives dependent on
performance against ESG related targets
See Remuneration Report, pages 13-15, 3.5 ‘Short-term incentive programme
2025’, pages 16-19, 3.6-3.8 ‘Long-term incentive programmes 2023, 2024 and
2025– programme design’, and page 20, table 24 IRO-2: ESRS DR's covered 134 ESRS 2 IRO-1: Processes 72 ESRS 2 SBM 2: Stakeholders 48 Disclosure requirement Page
E3-1: Policies 72 ESRS 2 SBM 3: Strategy 57 ESRS 2 SBM 2: Stakeholders 48
ESRS E1 – Climate change E3-2: Actions 73 S1-1: Policies 57, 59, 60 ESRS 2 SBM 3: Strategy 51
Disclosure requirement Page E3-3: Targets N/A S1-2: Processes 57, 58, 76 S4-1: Policies 52, 53, 55
ESRS 2 GOV-3: Governance 134 E3-4: Water consumption 73 S1-3: Remediate impacts 58, 76 S4-2: Processes 52, 55
E1-1: Transition plan 63, 64, 65 E3-5: Financial effects N/A S1-4: Actions 58, 59, 60 S4-3: Remediate impacts 52, 55 ESRS 2 SBM-1 (40 a i, ii, e-f): Sustainabilityrelated goals and significant products
See Annual review, section 'Product overview' on p. 25 for product overview,
'Sustainability commitment' pages 32-34, and 'Commercial execution' p. 20-25
for key markets (and as additional reference within the Sustainability
statement: see p. 58, table 3.1.1 'Employees and employee turnover')
ESRS 2 SBM-3: Strategy 63 S1-5: Targets 59 S4-4: Actions 52-56
ESRS 2 IRO-1: Processes 63 ESRS E4 – Biodiversity
and ecosystems
S1-6: Own employees 58 S4-5: Targets 54
E1-2: Policies 63 S1-7: Non-employees N/A ESRS 2 BP-2 (12): Forward-looking information See Annual review, page 17, section ‘Financial performance’, sub-chapter
'Forward-looking statements' E1-3: Actions 65 Disclosure requirement Page S1-8: Bargaining coverage 58 ESRS G1 – Business conduct
E1-4: Targets 64 E4-1: Transition plan 72 S1-9: Diversity 60-61 Disclosure requirement Page ESRS 2 SBM-1 (40g; 42, b-c): Business model
and value chain
See Annual review, section 'Purpose, strategy and culture' p. 9 and p. 10 on
'Value creation' showcasing the stages from resources to patients, and
Strategic Aspirations on p. 13 E1-5: Energy consumption 65 ESRS 2 SBM-3: Strategy 72 S1-10: Adequate wages 57 ESRS 2 GOV-1: Governance 37, 38, 40
E1-6: Scopes 1, 2, and 3 66 ESRS 2 - IRO 1: Processes 72 S1-11: Social protection N/A ESRS 2 IRO-1: Processes 75
E1-7: GHG removals N/A E4-2: Policies 72 S1-12: Disabilities N/A G1-1: Corporate culture 75, 76 ESRS S4-4 MDR-A (33b): Overview of what
action is planned or underway to pursue
material opportunities for the undertaking
in relation to consumers and/or end-users
See Annual review, section 'Innovation and therapeutic focus', p. 27-32,
for an overview of opportunities to accelerate healthcare innovation
across obesity, diabetes and rare diseases E1-8: Internal carbon pricing N/A E4-3: Actions 73 S1-13:Training N/A G1-2: Suppliers 77
E1-9: Financial effects N/A E4-4: Targets N/A S1-14: Health and safety 59 G1-3: Prevention 76
E4-5: Impacts 72, 73 S1-15: Work-life balance 57 G1-4: Incidents 76
E4-6: Financial effects N/A S1-16: Compensation 60 G1-5: Political influence 77, 78
S1-17: Complaints 58 G1-6: Payment practices 77
1. In addition, a detailed description of the material IROs is given in the topical sections of this Sustainability statement.
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Additional Sustainability statement information (part of the Sustainability statement) 134
EU Taxonomy – Contextual information, accounting policies and templates
Taxonomy-related disclosure process
The Taxonomy disclosure process follows three main steps: screening, assessment and eligibility
and alignment reporting. Potentially eligible economic activities are identified in line with the
technical annexes of the Climate Delegated Act (Annex I on the climate change mitigation and
Annex II on climate change adaptation) and the Environmental Delegated Act (Annexes I–IV). In
line with the amended Annex I of the Disclosures Delegated Act, and following changes in our
reporting scope, heating and cooling (4.15), wastewater (5.3), passenger vehicles (6.5), and land
acquisition (7.7) have been reviewed at a high level and deemed non-assessed and non-material
for the reporting period, and are therefore excluded from further EU Taxonomy assessment.
Taxonomy-alignment – Minimum safeguards
Novo Nordisk upholds responsible business practices in line with minimum safeguards.
• We are committed to respecting human rights across our value chain, with due diligence aligned
to the Guiding Principles on Business and Human Rights and OECD Guidelines for Multinational
Enterprises on Responsible Business Conduct (see section 6 'Workers in the Value Chain', p. 71)
• We strictly prohibit bribery and corruption and comply with all relevant laws and industry codes.
Our anti-corruption programme includes audits, training and third-party due diligence (see
section 9 'Business conduct' on p. 75).
• We act responsibly and transparently in all tax matters, in full compliance with applicable tax
regulations and the spirit of the law.
• We value fair competition and comply with laws governing our relationships with suppliers,
customers, and competitors. Employees are trained to uphold these standards.
Table 5a – Proportion of turnover and CapEx from products or services associated with Taxonomy-eligible
or Taxonomy-aligned economic activities – disclosure covering year 2025
Financial year 2025
KPI (1)
Total
(2)
Proportion of
Taxonomyeligible
activities
(3)
Taxonomyaligned
activities
(4)
Proportion of
Taxonomyaligned
activities
(5)
Breakdown by environmental objectives of Taxonomy-aligned activities
Proportion of
enabling
activities
(12)
Proportion of
transitional
activities
(13)
Not assessed
activities
considered
non-material
(14)
Taxonomyaligned
activities in
previous
financial year
(N-1)
(15)
Proportion of
Taxonomyaligned activities
in previous
financial year
(N-1)
(16)
Climate
change
mitigation
(6)
Climate
change
adaptation
(7)
Water
(8)
Circular
Economy
(9)
Pollution
(10)
Biodiversity
(11)
mDKK % mDKK % % % % % % % % % % mDKK %
Turnover 309,064 100 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0
CapEx 94,249 63 5,835 6 6 0 0 0 0 0 3 3,494 3
Contextual information
On 04 July 2025, the European Commission introduced simplification measures for the EU Taxonomy
under a new Delegated Act, effective 1 January 2026 and applicable to the 2025 financial year. We have
chosen to adopt the new rules already, for financial year 2025.
In 2025, the reporting scope and data collection process remained unchanged. The Taxonomy
KPIs include all fully consolidated companies of the Novo Nordisk Group. As no activities
contribute to multiple environmental objectives, KPI disaggregation is not applicable. For
Turnover and CapEx allocation, we identify relevant income, purchases, and measures, linking
them to primary economic activities in the Climate and Environmental Delegated Acts to avoid
double counting. No restatements of 2024 figures.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Total Turnover
Total revenue from sale of goods, as defined under IFRS Accounting Standards (see note 2.1 'Net sales
and rebates' on p. 88 in the Consolidated financial statements). The turnover KPI is defined as
Taxonomy-eligible turnover divided by total turnover.
Capital expenditures (CapEx)
Additions to fixed assets (including finance leases) and intangible assets. Additions resulting from
business combinations are also included. Goodwill is not included in CapEx because it is not defined as
an intangible asset in accordance with IAS 38. The eligible CapEx KPI is defined as Taxonomy-eligible
CapEx divided by total CapEx (see notes 3.1 'Intangible assets' on p. 94 and 3.2 'Property, plant and
equipment' on page 96 in the Consolidated financial statements). The aligned CapEx KPI is defined as
Taxonomy-aligned CapEx divided by total CapEx.
OpEx immateriality
• In accordance with the new
Delegated Act, we have opted to
not report on OpEx eligibility due
to immateriality.
• Eligible OpEx only includes R&D
costs directly related to the
manufacturing process.
• We allocate only a small part of
R&D related to CMC (Chemistry,
Manufacturing and Control
Development and Scaling), and
the remaining R&D is related to
patents etc.).
• For this reason, OpEx is
immaterial.
• Total OpEx: 49,308 mDKK
––– Novo Nordisk Annual Report 2025 / Additional Sustainability statement information (part of the Sustainability statement) 135
Table 5b – Proportion of turnover from products or services associated with Taxonomy-eligible
or Taxonomy-aligned economic activities – disclosure covering year 2025
Reported KPI Turnover
Financial year (N) 2025
Economic Activities (1)
Code
(2)
Proportion of
Taxonomy
eligible
Turnover
(3)
Taxonomyaligned KPI
(4)
Taxonomyaligned KPI
(5)
Environmental objective of Taxonomy-aligned activities
Enabling
activity
(12)
Transitional
activity
(13)
Proportion of
Taxonomyaligned in
Taxonomyeligible
(14)
Climate change
mitigation
(6)
Climate change
adaptation
(7)
Water
(8)
Circular
Economy
(9)
Pollution
(10)
Biodiversity
(11)
% mDKK % % % % % % %
(E where
applicable)
(T where
applicable) %
Manufacture of medical products 1.2 100 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0
Sum of aligned per objective 0 0 0 0 0 0 0
Total KPI (Turnover) 100 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0
Table 5c – Proportion of CapEx from products or services associated with Taxonomy-eligible
or Taxonomy-aligned economic activities – disclosure covering year 2025
Reported KPI CapEx
Financial year (N) 2025
Economic Activities (1)
Code
(2)
Proportion of
Taxonomyeligible CapEx
(3)
Taxonomyaligned KPI
(4)
Taxonomyaligned KPI
(5)
Environmental objective of Taxonomy-aligned activities
Enabling
activity
(12)
Transitional
activity
(13)
Proportion of
Taxonomyaligned in
Taxonomyeligible
(14)
Climate change
mitigation
(6)
Climate change
adaptation
(7)
Water
(8)
Circular
Economy
(9)
Pollution
(10)
Biodiversity
(11)
% mDKK % % % % % % %
(E where
applicable)
(T where
applicable) %
Manufacture of medical products 1.2 42 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0
Construction of new buildings 7.1 18 5,835 6 6 0 0 0 0 0 34
Renovation of existing buildings 7.2 3 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0
Sum of aligned per objective 6 6 0 0 0 0 0
Total KPI (CapEx) 63 5,835 6 6 0 0 0 0 0 10










